 14 (Bloomberg) -- GPT Group said it won’t increase its takeover offer for the office fund controlled by Commonwealth Bank of Australia, clearing the path for a rival bid from Dexus Property Group and the Canada Pension Plan Investment Board.
 (OSKV MK) said its board of directors has no intention to seek an alternative takeover offer for its shares, according to a stock exchange filing.
 Simon more than a decade ago dropped an unsolicited takeover offer for Taubman after Michigan enacted a law allowing the Taubman family to block the effort.
 Nomura is facing increasing competition in investment banking from lenders such as Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group Inc, particularly in advising companies on takeovers.
 Compuware Chief Executive Officer Bob Paul has spent the past year trying to show shareholders he can increase their return without a takeover.
 Nine years later, London-based lender Abbey National rebuffed NAB’s takeover attempts.
 
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Forest Laboratories Inc, the maker of the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda, raised $18 billion with a two-part bond offering to fund the takeover of Aptalis Pharma, more than doubling its debt.
 Its shares have rallied 11 percent since Forest announced the $29 billion takeover Jan.
 
 Proceeds last year were mostly used on dividend payouts to private-equity sponsors and to refinance debt rather than to help fund leveraged buyouts, as was the case before the financial crisis when PIKs were used for the takeovers of Energy Future Holdings Corp.
 whiskey maker at the fourth-highest takeover multiple in the spirits industry in the last decade, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Standalone companies like this are becoming more rare” Suntory was willing to strike the deal this week even after Beam’s market value climbed $14 billion since December 2012 when Suntory had balked at Beam’s takeover price.
 That compares with a median multiple of 138 for a wine or liquor maker takeover since 2004, the data show.
 AT&T is still assessing a takeover, and made a public announcement on Jan.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- RSA Insurance Group Plc reached its highest level in a month in London trading amid speculation a competitor may make a takeover offer.
 The stock rallied 93 percent this week as analysts at UBS AG and Berenberg AG cited the company as a potential takeover target.
 UBS’s James Shuck said a takeover and break-up of RSA remained a possibility, citing Finland’s Sampo Oyj as a potential “orchestrator” Jon Sellors, a spokesman at RSA, declined to comment on the speculation today.
 The Beam takeover would be largest overseas by a Japanese company since SoftBank Corp.
 The 68-year-old executive was willing to strike the deal even after Beam’s market value climbed $14 billion since December 2012, when Suntory had balked at the Deerfield, Illinois-based company’s takeover price.
 A person familiar with the matter said Statoil ASA, Norway’s national oil company, has analyzed the London-listed oil-and-gas explorer as a potential takeover target.
 The price the technology giant paid to acquire the Dallas-based company last year was the biggest it has disclosed for a takeover since the purchase of software company Lotus Development Corp.
 Data Centers SoftLayer has added about 2,400 customers since the takeover, up from about 20,000 at the time of the acquisition, Crosby said.
 It’s examining takeovers that would allow it to diversify away from Norway while diluting the state’s $51 billion shareholding, said the people, asking not to be identified because the deliberations are private.
 Lowest Debt Diluting the government stake to 51 percent could allow the issuance of more than $22 billion in new shares for use in a takeover, at current prices.
 To be sure, Statoil could also dilute the government by raising equity for purposes other than a takeover, like building out its activities in East Africa, the people said.
 
 Hong Kong’s family-controlled banks, squeezed for years by larger competitors from HSBC Holdings Plc to Bank of China Ltd, are attracting takeover bids as the city’s role in cross-border financing expands.
 A group led by Apollo acquired EP Energy, El Paso Corp’s oil and natural gas exploration business, in 2012 for $715 billion in the second-biggest private equity takeover of an energy producer.
 takeover rules, according to F&C.

 bank) exceeds 3x Ebitda or where total debt exceeds 4x Ebitda, and which says that "a leverage level after planned asset sales (that is, the amount of debt that must be serviced from operating cash flow) in excess of 6X Total Debt/EBITDA raises concerns for most industries" 2 What is going on here? First of all I assume that our buyout comes at an enterprise value to Ebitda ratio of about 102x, which I get from running Bloomberg MA on (1) all asset sales, company takeovers, going-privates, management buyouts, reverse mergers, tender offers and PE buyouts (the Bloomberg MA categories) (2) where target and acquirer are in the US.
 Raiffeisen’s share sale is Austria’s biggest since Erste Group Bank AG raised 29 billion euros in 2006 to fund its takeover of Banca Comerciala Romana SA.
 Hewlett-Packard and Seiko Epson may decide it makes more sense to buy their way into the industry via a Stratasys takeover, said Lewis of BB&T.
 ‘Big Dog’ A takeover is “possible, but not probable at this stage, given the size of the company,” said Bichelmeyer, whose firm advises the Buffalo Funds and manages shares of Stratasys.
 
 The timing and size of the trades were deemed highly suspicious by the SEC as the accounts used had no history of trading Heinz securities in the previous six months and the only trading in the account involving Heinz occurred the day before the takeover was announced.
 to tack on almost $8 billion to its takeover bid.
 to complete the takeover.
 

 7 (Bloomberg) -- Barrick Gold Corp’s $3 billion share sale led the biggest year of equity financings exceeding $1 billion since 2009, with offerings to fund drug, grocery and power takeovers accounting for a quarter of Canadian deals.
 
 That would be more logical than a takeover by a major oil company such as China Petroleum & Chemical Corp, or Sinopec, he said.
 Standard Chartered Plc climbed 23 percent after a report that analysts see the bank as a takeover target.
 The Financial Times cited unnamed investment bankers as saying the lender is the “most likely target of a big banking takeover” SDL surged 10 percent to 373 pence as the maker of translation software forecast full-year revenue of 2658 million pounds to 2663 million pounds.
 “And it means GPT is then in a position to recommence a buyback, which is far more accretive to shareholders” Dexus Edge Yesterday’s deal gives the takeover proposal by Dexus and the Canadian fund a further edge over GPT’s, after CPA’s board and Commonwealth Bank both backed their bid last month.
 So many pharmaceutical companies are switching addresses that bankers are pitching takeovers of Irish drugmakers based on the tax benefits.
 He estimated the total cost savings from the takeover at $400 million a year, including the tax savings from using the Irish address as well as job cuts and other operational changes.
 In the intervening years, takeovers shifted Warner Chilcott’s ultimate corporate parent to Ireland, Northern Ireland, Bermuda, and back to Ireland.
 AB InBev, the world’s biggest beermaker, is buying back a business it sold to KKR in 2009 for $18 billion when it sought to cut debt following InBev NV’s $52 billion takeover of Anheuser-Busch Cos.
 AB InBev’s purchase would be the second takeover of an alcoholic beverage company this year after Japan’s Suntory Holdings Ltd.
 The deal is one of almost $91 billion of takeover agreements and offers yesterday.
 Last year, Centerview ranked 16th, with a role on the takeovers of HJ Heinz Co, Dell Inc.
 The long-standing subject of takeover speculation is increasing revenue faster than every major US.
 Nuclear Advantage It was also involved in the financial talks surrounding the takeover of struggling PVC producer Kem One SAS by buyout firm OpenGate Capital and Alain de Krassny.
 The takeover would be the largest overseas acquisition by a Japanese company since SoftBank Corp.
 Year’s Biggest The takeover is 2014’s biggest and the sixth-largest ever in the beverage industry, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 to help sell some technology businesses it acquired as part of its takeover of New York Stock Exchange owner NYSE Euronext, people with knowledge of the matter said this month.
 The Gulf states respect this mentality” The first test of al-Seesi’s ballot-box appeal was this week’s referendum on a new constitution, widely seen in Egypt as a vote of confidence in the army takeover.
 investment fund, for about 697 million pounds ($12 billion) in what would be the second-largest takeover in its 196-year history.
 The acquisition would be the firm’s second-largest, following its C$41 billion takeover of Milwaukee-based bank Marshall & Ilsley Corp.
 takeover rules, F&C said in the statement.
 and Japan are circling in to snap up cheap assets in the northernmost euro nation, including a $156 billion takeover offer for steelmaker Rautaruukki Oyj by Sweden’s SSAB.
 Ship-engine maker Waertsilae said this month it ended takeover talks initiated by Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc.
 Still, some politicians say it’s far from clear Finland will benefit from the takeover.
 According to Maliranta, the takeovers are a positive sign and will help in the long run.
 Last month, BlackBerry co-founder and former Chief Executive Officer Mike Lazaridis walked away from a possible takeover plan and reduced his stake in the smartphone maker after it ended an attempt to sell itself.
 A second round of $20 billion came in January 2009 after Merrill’s losses in its final quarter as an independent firm surpassed $15 billion, raising doubts about the company’s stability if the takeover proceeded.
 Busiest Dealmaker Since failing to get a hold of Actavis last year, 

 The recent stock gain is more likely “a reflection of investor awareness that Teva is on the block” Allergan Inc, the subject of takeover speculation last year when its stock price dipped, would complement Valeant’s interest in skin and eye care, Herman Saftlas, a New York-based equity analyst at S&P Capital IQ, said in a phone interview.
 We talked the other day about the new anti-activist poison pills that are sweeping the nation, designed not to prevent coercive takeovers but just to make it really difficult for activists to accumulate shares, communicate with each other, or otherwise mount a challenge to entrenched managers2 Those pills, y'know, come from somewhere.
 But for the most part this story isn't that story: The main advice the banks are offering seems to be less "how to prevent activists from getting what they want" and more "how to do what activists want before they ask" Young himself comes to Credit Suisse from Institutional Shareholder Services, the governance watchdog-ish thing, where he "advised investors on contested takeovers and activist campaigns" Deutsche Bank's activism group is having "frank conversations with our clients about things activists care about," including stock price and governance.
 2 I should say, though, that I was maybe a bit hasty in thinking that Hertz's poison pill was hard to justify because the rumored activists in the stock -- Corvex and Third Point -- seemed unlikely to mount a hostile takeover.
 T-Mobile also has been the source of takeover speculation, and its parent company Deutsche Telekom AG has indicated that it would be willing to sell its stake.
 AT&T had to walk away from the $39 billion takeover after facing opposition from regulators.
 Cable takeovers fit the expansion strategy of London-based Liberty Global, which has spent almost $50 billion on European assets over the past decade.
 Liberty Global’s agreement to buy Utrecht-based Ziggo came after the Dutch company rejected an initial takeover, calling it “inadequate” In mid-December Ziggo said those talks had been revived.
 Obermann Future Ziggo slipped 03 percent to 3239 euros in Amsterdam, adding to yesterday’s 29 percent decline after the takeover agreement.
 Third Point was attracted by T-Mobile’s takeover prospects, as well as its improving operating performance and relative valuation compared with peers.
 Constellation’s takeover last year of US.
 phone company said it doesn’t plan to make an offer for Vodafone Group Plc, responding to speculation over a possible takeover bid for the UK.
 takeover rules.
 takeover panel.
 
 
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Goldcorp Inc, which yesterday made a C$26 billion ($24 billion) unsolicited offer for Osisko Mining Corp, said the bid followed five years of “frustrated attempts” to engage in takeover talks.
 investor sued to block Suntory Holdings Ltd’s $16 billion takeover of the company, a plan that would create the world’s third-largest premium spirits company.
 
 said the biggest challenge will be convincing Riverbed’s management to sell after the company adopted a poison pill to thwart unwanted takeover attempts.
 
 No other North American takeover target is trading higher above pending or proposed bids of more than $500 million, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The takeover will see Amec’s revenue in “growth regions” doubling.
 “The fact that there is no real premium offered to shareholders is not really surprising as takeover rumors made the round already,” said Geoffroy Stern, a Kepler Cheuvreux analyst in Paris.
 The company could spend tens of billions of yen on its next takeover, Fujimori added.
 was sued over its proposed $16 billion takeover by Suntory Holdings Ltd.
 The company has been dogged by issues including a failed takeover bid by Aluminum Corp.
 Operations at its Ovoot Tolgoi mine were halted in June 2012 on uncertainty caused by the takeover bid and deteriorating market conditions.
 
 Jackson Tai was the lender’s president and chief operating officer during the Dao Heng takeover and was CEO from 2002 to 2007.
 
 That could be put toward financing a Time Warner Cable deal” Charter, meanwhile, is preparing a takeover offer of about $135 a share for Time Warner Cable, people familiar with the situation have said.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Jazz Pharmaceuticals Plc just got more alluring as a takeover target after adding to its suite of medicines for rare diseases.
 ‘Feeding Frenzy’ It’s been a “feeding frenzy,” Timothy Chiang, an analyst at CRT Capital Group LLC, said in August, when investors began speculating that Jazz may be among the next Ireland-based pharmaceutical targets after the takeovers of Elan and Warner Chilcott.
 
 Preemptive Efforts Credit Suisse has emphasized preemptive efforts since hiring Young in June 2010 from Institutional Shareholder Services, where he advised investors on contested takeovers and activist campaigns.
 The takeover is the largest this year and the sixth-largest ever in the beverages industry, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Bega Cheese Ltd, the second-largest shareholder in takeover target Warrnambool Cheese & Butter Factory Co, received approaches from global groups for its stake in the Australian dairy producer.
 Fonterra Cooperative Group Ltd, which acquired a stake in Bega in November, hasn’t approached the dairy producer over any takeover, Irvin said.
 NiSource shares surged to an all-time high last week amid takeover speculation fueled by a December report that Dominion Resources Inc.
 The shares of the Cambridge, Massachusetts-based company increased 12 percent yesterday after a report by the UK’s Daily Mail of takeover interest from bigger companies.
 “This is a positive surprise as the takeover talks with the state government had recently hit a brick wall,” Sharizan said.
 


 Norilsk, the world’s biggest nickel producer, acquired the mines through the $64 billion takeover of LionOre Mining International Ltd.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- A former aide to Banco Santander SA’s ex-Chief Executive Officer Alfredo Saenz was cleared by Spanish judges of insider trading ahead of BHP Billiton Ltd’s 2010 takeover bid for Potash Corp.
 may be the best takeover option for beverage companies anxious to corner a piece of Asia’s expanding instant-coffee market, as long as they’re willing to pay up.
 in a C$5 billion ($45 billion) hostile takeover last year.
 Inmet spent $913 million on the project before the takeover, First Quantum said.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Royal KPN NV’s shareholders approved the redemption of a stake held by its independent foundation that blocked a 72 billion-euro ($98 billion) takeover bid by billionaire Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB in October.
 Not Cheap A takeover of Marketo would be expensive.
 
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Lufthansa AG and Air France-KLM Group, absorbed with plans to end short-haul losses, saw their lead in European aviation slip last year as British Airways owner IAG SA bulked up by extending a takeover spree.
 The London-based company completed the takeover of Spain’s Vueling SA in August following the purchase of UK.
 It’s scheduled this month to complete a full takeover of Munich-based Realtime Technology AG.
 Beyond that are more general provisions governing foreign takeovers in Canada, requiring all acquisitions worth more than C$354 million to be reviewed and possibly subjecting them to a national security test.
 Too generous a payout would risk leaving Nokia with insufficient funds for investments and takeovers as it builds a future without the mobile-phone business that made it famous.
 He also supervised a $150 million settlement with Bank of America for failing to properly disclose employee bonuses and financial losses at Merrill Lynch before shareholders approved a takeover of the brokerage in December 2008.
 A successful takeover would be the largest of a cable company since Comcast Corp.
 Since 2009, there have been just two larger takeover offers, and both were accepted.
 blocked its takeover by AT&T Inc.
 The takeover was later abandoned.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Alfa SAB’s plan to sell stock in its Sigma Alimentos food unit is getting a boost from a $970 million joint takeover offer with a Chinese partner for Spanish meat processor Campofrio Food Group SA.
 The two left Xstrata after Glencore International Plc last year completed its $29 billion all-share takeover of the Zug, Switzerland-based company.
 Davis left as CEO of Glencore Xstrata in May, opting not to stay in the role for six months after the takeover, as had been planned.
 Zachert also helped engineer a takeover bid for AZ Electronic Materials SA worth about 16 billion pounds ($26 billion) at the end of last year, a move intended to strengthen the industrial-materials unit that’s driven Merck’s sales growth in recent years as the drug business suffered setbacks.
 If Sprint agrees to host Dish’s wireless airwaves on its network, allowing the satellite company to enter the mobile-phone business, regulators may approve a Sprint takeover of T-Mobile because a new competitor would emerge, Chaplin said.
 Riverbed Bid The hedge fund has taken large stakes in companies including Juniper rival Riverbed Technology Inc, which earlier this month rejected a $308 billion takeover offer from Elliott.
 Vattenfall’s decision to exit via an accelerated bookbuilding “suggests the government’s plans to find a strategic buyer for the company remain on hold, so there is no takeover story on the horizon,” Bram Buring, a Prague-based analyst at Wood & Co, said in a note today.
 The takeover of Ziggo, with 27 million customers and about 31 billion euros of borrowings, will be funded with new debt that will push up its leverage ratio to about five times from 35 times, according to company statements.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Hudson City Bancorp Inc, the target of the biggest pending bank takeover in the US, said it’s planning to reduce interest-rate risks and that the effort will produce an unspecified loss.
 Regulators haven’t given any assurance they’ll approve the takeover, so Hudson City has said it will proceed with its own strategic plan.
 Japan’s biggest banks have relied on overseas takeovers as a shrinking population and benchmark interest rates near zero constrain loan profitability at home.
 Riverbed Bid The hedge fund has taken large stakes in companies including Juniper rival Riverbed Technology Inc, which earlier this month rejected a $308 billion takeover offer from Elliott.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Warrnambool Cheese & Butter Factory Co, the Australian target of a two-way takeover battle, says a stalemate is possible between rival suitors for the nation’s oldest dairy producer.
 takeover panel that it does not intend to make an offer for Vodafone.
 takeover rules.
 KKR’s entrance into Calgary comes as announced Canadian energy takeovers slid to $251 billion last year, the lowest since 2004, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 
 Compuware Agreement Elliott also reached a standstill agreement last week with Compuware Corp, which spurned a takeover bid from the firm last year.
 The transaction also may make T-Mobile a more attractive takeover target, said Markus Friebel, an analyst at Independent Research GmbH in Frankfurt.
 shareholders today to convince them to support their $613 billion takeover offer.
 
 
 Mizuho, which lags behind Mitsubishi UFJ and Sumitomo Mitsui in Southeast Asian takeovers, is facing a deadlock in talks to buy a stake in PT Bank Pan Indonesia, people familiar with the matter said last week.
 “We believe MyAssist’s list of customers speaks volumes about the appeal of its products” Buffett, 83, built Berkshire into a $275 billion business over five decades through takeovers.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co’s industrial businesses will consider takeovers as the company targets 70 percent of sales in the sector, according to the executive in charge of its unit that manufactures wind-, steam- and gas-powered electrical turbines.
 phone company continues to study a Vodafone takeover, and made a public announcement Jan.
 rejected Elliott Management Corp’s $308 billion takeover bid and released preliminary fourth-quarter earnings results that show its business is gaining momentum.
 The firm said yesterday in a letter to Riverbed’s board that it has spoken to the majority of the company’s shareholder base and investors were “overwhelmingly supportive” about its takeover efforts.
 It expects to complete the takeover of Verizon Wireless on Feb.
 cable provider, fell after the company rejected Charter Communications Inc’s $61 billion takeover offer.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- 
 takeover rules.
 takeover panel.
 AT&T has also considered other European takeover targets, examining candidates including Spain’s Telefonica and EE, the UK.
 takeover rules, AT&T’s statement means it can’t offer to buy Vodafone or a stake of 30 percent or more in the company for the next six months, except under certain conditions.
 Too generous a payout would risk leaving Nokia with insufficient funds for investments and takeovers as it builds a future without the mobile-phone business that made it famous.
 to advise companies that are seeking takeovers abroad.
 McKesson would have to file a new offer by midnight tonight if the company wants to get an extension of the acceptance deadline by two weeks, according to German takeover law.
 If a deal between Charter and Time Warner Cable gets done, Comcast may acquire divested assets after the initial takeover is completed to avoid increased regulatory delays, the people said.
 
 Bank’s board of directors, led by Chairman Robert Wildrick, is mounting after it refused to negotiate with Men’s Wearhouse and instead toughened the company’s anti-takeover defenses.
 Bank released today, Men’s Wearhouse said Wildrick has a conflict of interest in assessing it’s takeover offer.
 
 
 Bank’s independent directors to form a committee to evaluate the takeover offer and start discussions.
 told shareholders to reject a $161 billion takeover proposal from Men’s Wearhouse Inc, saying it undervalues the company.
 Bank’s independent directors to form a committee to evaluate the takeover offer and start discussions.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Osisko Mining Corp, subject of a hostile takeover offer from Goldcorp Inc, said it started legal action in the Quebec Superior Court seeking to stop the bid, alleging the larger miner misused confidential information.
 Comcast also is near a deal to buy cable systems in New York City, New England and North Carolina from Charter Communications Inc, if Charter succeeds in its takeover bid for Time Warner Cable Inc, people with knowledge of the matter said yesterday.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Turkey is poised to see the pace of takeovers slow by 50 percent as the government struggles to contain a corruption scandal that has roiled currency and equity markets.
 The value of deals in Turkey announced this year may fall by half from 2013, when companies led $175 billion of takeovers, Kerim Kotan, managing director of Pragma Corporate Finance, which worked on 11 transactions last year, said in an interview.
 Italian Industry Minister Flavio Zanonato said in a statement today that his government is ready to support the Fiat-Chrysler expansion, and that the full takeover agreement is “very positive” The time line for a merger may be outlined as soon as late January, when Fiat’s board meets, said two people familiar with the situation who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 Prado “misappropriated information” he learned from a client to trade in advance of 3G’s takeover of Burger King, which was announced on Sept.
 last week, strengthened its acquisition-defense plan to head off moves its larger rival could make in their continuing takeover battle.
 The stronger takeover protections, which Jos.
 Bank detailed in a filing and statement today, mark the latest move in the takeover battle of men’s apparel chains that began in October when Jos.
 Bank said that its poison pill’s new 10 percent threshold levels “the playing field” by matching Men’s Wearhouse’s takeover defense.
 
 in 2009 to pay down debt after the $52 billion takeover by InBev NV of Anheuser-Busch Cos.
 (For one thing, it ruled out revising the constitution to let Fernandez run for a third term) She installed a new cabinet and moved to resolve Argentina’s disagreements with foreign creditors, the International Monetary Fund and Spain’s Repsol SA (over the 2012 takeover of a local oil unit).
 In a letter to Riverbed’s board, Elliott said it has spoken to the majority of the company’s shareholder base and investors were “overwhelmingly supportive” about pushing for a takeover.
 Buying Tognum A takeover of Waertsilae, the largest maker of engines for tankers, cruise ships and navy vessels with sales of 13 billion euros ($18 billion) in 2012, would strengthen Rolls-Royce’s marine unit, which cut its profit outlook in November.
 
andatory takeover offer will also take into account “further relevant conditions” of the transaction, including the deferred payment of part of the purchase price, PPF said in a statement on its website today.
 Johannesburg-based Adcock, South Africa’s largest supplier of hospital products, is a takeover target for CFR Pharmaceuticals SA, Chile’s biggest drugmaker, which raised an acquisition offer by 2 percent to 128 billion rand ($12 billion) on Dec.
 10 on whether to sell new stock to fund the takeover.
 Standard & Poor’s, Fitch Ratings and Moody’s Investors Service all raised Continental’s debt last year to investment grade after borrowings stemming from the takeover of the former Siemens AG car-electronics unit VDO in 2007 were scaled back.
 “There’s more of a willingness to look at it” The ILFC takeover should close in April following regulatory clearances, Kelly added.
 Earlier deals included Schiphol, Netherlands-based Aercap’s 2009 takeover of Genesis Lease Ltd.
 to help sell some technology businesses it acquired as part of its takeover of New York Stock Exchange owner NYSE Euronext, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 failed to get support from the German drug distributor’s shareholders for a takeover.
 The fund would have been prepared to help increase capital and to make a full takeover bid for Barcelona-based Colonial if Spain’s stock market regulator required it to, Brookfield said in its offer.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Violin Memory Inc, the maker of flash-memory storage that’s plunged in value since its initial public offering last year, has attracted takeover interest, the Clinton Group Inc, an activist shareholder, said.
 Following a number of takeovers in past years, including buying BBC Worldwide out of its joint venture in Animal Planet in 2010, Zaslav said Discovery would invest in existing businesses and look “opportunistically for additional assets” Shares Rise Shares in Societe Television Francaise rose as much as 61 percent in Paris trading and were 32 percent higher at 1480 euros as of 9:27 am.
 investment fund, for 708 million pounds ($12 billion) in the second-largest takeover in its 196-year history.
 wealth management platform with its biggest takeover, the C$41 billion purchase of Milwaukee-based consumer bank Marshall & Ilsley Corp.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- LSI Corp’s directors didn’t get the best price for the computer chipmaker in a $66 billion takeover by Avago Technologies Ltd.
 It sold the business to KKR in 2009 for $18 billion when it sought to cut debt following InBev NV’s $52 billion takeover of Anheuser-Busch Cos.
 Proposed deals by companies including Charter and Google brought the value of takeover offers worldwide this year to $130 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The figure included $585 million of financial-advisory revenue, including fees for takeover advice, an increase of 15 percent.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- For Tom Rutledge, the man orchestrating a $61 billion takeover battle for Time Warner Cable Inc, the role of dealmaker came late in his career.
 While billionaire cable veteran John Malone is seen as the top proponent of industrywide mergers, Rutledge has been quietly plotting a takeover strategy for more than two years, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 After Time Warner Cable CEO Rob Marcus called the $13250-a-share price “a lowball offer,” Charter fired back that the takeover target’s management was ruining the company with a “failed operational strategy” Investor Pitch Rutledge is now taking his case directly to shareholders.
 If Charter is successful with its takeover attempt, Rutledge would run the combined company, according to people familiar with the plan.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Adcock Ingram Holdings Ltd, the South African drugmaker that’s a $12 billion takeover target, plans to double its sales from African countries outside its home market to 1 billion rand ($925 million) within four years.
 A takeover, however, is unlikely given the publisher’s dual-class share structure, which gives the Ochs-Sulzberger family a firm grip over the company’s board.
 local time pending a statement under the city’s takeover code, according to an exchange announcement.
 Hertz Global Holdings Incrallied 11 percent after adopting a takeover-defense plan amidspeculation activist investors were taking stakes.
 The boardvoted unanimously for the plan, which Hertz said wasn’t adoptedin response to any specific takeover bid or proposal to acquirethe company, according to a statement.
 There has been speculation that ONO may be a takeover target for Newbury, England-based mobile-phone operator Vodafone Group Plc as Europe’s telecommunications industry undergoes a wave of mergers and acquisitions.
 Pinnacle Vodka The Beam takeover, 2014’s biggest, would be the largest overseas acquisition by a Japanese company since SoftBank Corp.
 Poor, Poorer Noisy takeovers of Brazilian shopping malls by youths from lower-income neighborhoods, and protests against entrenched rulers in Turkey and Ukraine were much-discussed examples at the Forum.
 “A takeover remains a possibility” The shares closed at 979 pence, up 62 percent.
 established a floor price for a technology takeover, won board seats at another, persuaded an oil company to prepare to spin off its retail unit, and reaped a higher price for a European drug distributor -- all in two days.
 One technique Elliott has repeated: making a takeover offer for a targeted company to flush out higher-paying buyers.
 Ten of Elliott’s 13 takeover targets have been technology companies, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The latest event came yesterday morning when Elliott reached a standstill accord over board nominees with Compuware Corp, which spurned a takeover bid from the activist last year.
 New Board Under Elliott pressure, Compuware Chief Executive Officer Bob Paul has spent the past year trying to show shareholders he can increase their return without a takeover.
 8 after the takeover offer was announced.
 14 filing that its unsolicited offer followed five years of “frustrated attempts” to engage in takeover talks and that Osisko refused to provide information Goldcorp needed for due diligence.
 Merger Advice The figure included $585 million of financial-advisory revenue, including fees for takeover advice, an increase of 15 percent.
 valued at more than $61 billion including debt, spurning the biggest unsolicited takeover bid since 2008.
 A successful takeover would be the largest of a cable company since Comcast Corp.
 Since 2009, there have been just two larger takeover offers, and both were accepted.
 The $613 billion offer is also the largest unsolicited takeover attempt since BHP Billiton Ltd’s $115 billion bid for Rio Tinto Plc in 2008, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “The question is: Can you position it as a consumer brand?” Buffett’s track record building Berkshire from a failing textile maker in the mid-1960s through stock picks and takeovers into a $287 billion business has made him an investing legend.
 At HomeServices, that’s meant takeovers.
 Canadian securities firms last year were hurt by reduced trading, stock sales and takeovers among resource companies, sapping revenue for businesses that rely on doing deals for mining and energy companies.
 Announced mining and energy takeovers involving Canadian companies sunk last year to the lowest level since 2004, the data show.
 Moynihan, 54, has spent his four years atop Bank of America resolving disputes tied to shoddy home loans and foreclosures, mostly from his predecessor’s 2008 takeover of Countrywide Financial Corp.
 The CEO has been pursuing cuts at the ketchup maker to speed decision making, boost margins and pay down debt supporting the takeover.
 If Sprint agrees to host Dish’s wireless airwaves on itsnetwork, allowing the satellite company to enter the mobile-phone business, regulators may approve a Sprint takeover of T-Mobile because a new competitor would emerge, Chaplin saidSprint has begun to test a wireless Internet service with Dishin Corpus Christi, Texas, a potential prelude to a futurepartnership, Chaplin said.
 Leuven, Belgium-based AB InBev is seeking to regain a business it sold to KKR in 2009 for $18 billion in a bid to cut debt following InBev NV’s $52 billion takeover of Anheuser-Busch Cos.
 The deal would be the second takeover of an alcoholic beverage company this year after Japan’s Suntory Holdings Ltd.
 Safeway felt obligated to tell shareholders that it was discussing a sale because management had announced plans to buy back shares, one of the people said, and if it had gone through with the repurchase and a sale eventually happened, shareholders could have sued for tendering shares and missing a takeover premium.
 The company previously held takeover talks with Augusta starting in 2010, HudBay said in a statement dated yesterday.
 HudBay is valuing the resource at Augusta’s Rosemont mine at about 45 cents per pound of copper equivalent, versus an average multiple of about 54 cents per pound for comparable takeovers in the last few years, said Christopher Chang of Laurentian Bank.
 The rule states that an acquiring company’s investors get to vote on takeovers that would dilute their ownership by 25 percent or more.
 overplayed its hand in negotiations with Comcast to buy Time Warner Cable in a joint takeover.
 The Colorado-based billionaire, whose cable cowboy nickname became the title of a biography, is now left with smaller takeover options such as Sirius XM Holdings Inc.
 Baar, Switzerland-based Glencore is selling the Las Bambas mine as part of an agreement to win Chinese regulatory authorization for its $29 billion takeover of Xstrata Plc last year.
 Led by billionaire Chief Executive Officer Ivan Glasenberg, Glencore is now the world’s fourth-largest mining company following the Xstrata takeover.
 and Riverbed Technology Inc, which last month rejected a $308 billion takeover offer from Elliott.
 Under terms of the takeover, that money technically counts as a return on the government’s stake and not as a repayment of the $1875 billion bailout.
 in a C$5 billion ($45 billion) hostile takeover last year, included earnings and output from three mines it inherited from that deal.
 The takeover agreement includes a “go-shop” period, during which Chindex is permitted to solicit and consider alternative proposals through April 3, with a potential 15-day extension, the hospital operator said.
 Canaccord expanded beyond Canada with its 2012 takeover of UK.
 The gauge rose 06 percent yesterday as better-than-forecast earnings and a $452 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Osisko is seeking to block the takeover and says Goldcorp misused confidential data in making its cash-and-stock bid.
 The equities gauge climbed 06 percent yesterday as a $452 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Standard & Poor’s, Fitch Ratings and Moody’s Investors Service all raised Continental’s credit rating last year to investment grade after borrowings stemming from the takeover of the former Siemens AG car-electronics unit VDO in 2007 were reduced.
 Fiat, which owned 585 percent of Chrysler prior to the full takeover, relies on the US.
 The firm’s international ambitions were dented when former Treasurer Wayne Swan rejected the tieup, saying the move amounted to a takeover and wasn’t in the national interest.
 The strategy limits options for closely held banks looking to sell and deters takeover sprees that built today’s biggest lenders.
 Before the crisis, 41 percent of the 152 deals in 2006 and 2007 were fractional takeovers, the data show.
 M&T’s experience has made other bankers reconsider their takeover strategy, said BankUnited Inc.
 Whole takeovers now require at least five months to be approved and “markets change during those kinds of lengthy time periods, which adds more business risks,” he said.
 became the second Chinese company in two weeks to see its shares surge in the days leading up to a takeover announcement, raising concern among investors that details of transactions are being leaked.
 Mitchell led the company’s defense against a hostile $66 billion takeover bid by BHP Billiton Ltd.
 Canada, Mozambique Rio has written down by more than half the valuation of its $38 billion takeover of Canadian aluminum producer Alcan Inc, a deal that was announced in 2007, before Mitchell became head of M&A.
 AT&T is laying the groundwork for a potential takeover this year even after it was compelled to make a public announcement on Jan.
 Billionaire investor Carl Icahn, who is Forest’s second-largest shareholder, had said that the maker of treatments for Alzheimer's disease and blood pressure made a good takeover candidate for a larger pharmaceutical company.
 A takeover of Juniper was discussed by Nokia’s board earlier this year, Manager Magazin said.
 Too generous dividends would risk leaving Nokia with insufficient funds for investments and takeovers as it builds a future without the mobile-phone business that made it famous.
 Yesterday, Macquarie Capital Markets analyst Michael Siperco wrote that Detour’s chance of getting a takeover bid could rise as the gold producer continues to ramp up its Detour Lake mine into 2015.
 UrtheCast has surged 39 percent since completing a reverse takeover of Longford Energy Inc.
 Peter Puccetti, founder of investment fund Goodwood Inc, helped orchestrate UrtheCast’s reverse takeover of Longford.
 His main strategies rebounded last year with prescient bets on companies in takeovers, a strategy known as merger-arbitrage, where he got his start as a trader, and by investing in stocks that surged as global central bank policies propped up markets.
 and JPMorgan Chase & Co’s takeover of Bear Stearns Cos.
 With the takeover of Scania, Volkswagen expects to eventually save 850 million euros at its trucks unit, up from an earlier target of 200 million euros.
 Department of Justice last month boosted the stock and prompted takeover speculation.
 The 56 percent premium to ArthroCare’s 20-day stock price average of $4570 is the lowest for a medical-instrument takeover of more than $500 million since the ’90s, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Forest is an “excellent” takeover candidate for a larger pharmaceutical company and might get a “huge premium” thanks to its pipeline of drugs, Icahn said in August 2012.
 The “high leverage” is constraining ISS’s ability to increase profits just as takeovers’ contribution to growth stagnates, the rating company said in December.
 shareholder sued to block Comcast Corp’s proposed $452 billion takeover, saying the merger of the two biggest US.
 The latest results included a $79 million increase in depreciation and amortization costs related to the Sky Deutschland takeover.
 
 Europe’s largest low-cost carrier has done battle with competition authorities in Europe since it first bought Aer Lingus shares as part of a takeover bid in 2006.
 A T-Mobile takeover also would place additional strain on SoftBank’s credit rating.
 The Japanese company took out a 2 trillion-yen ($20 billion) loan to refinance debt from that takeover.
 Management Changes Today’s announcement marked the latest change at StreetEasy since the takeover.
 “They obviously had a major setback in October, but there have been buyback and takeover rumors” FDA Ruling Shares of the Cambridge, Massachusetts-based company gained 18 percent to $813 yesterday.
 23 and 24 after a report by the Daily Mail on takeover interest from bigger companies.
 Intensified Competition Hedging costs are elevated as the takeover may not materialize and competition around Ariad’s only drug intensifies, according to Lillian Seidman, an options strategist at Miller Tabak & Co.
 The New York-based investment bank also worked with Suntory Holdings Ltd, the closely held Japanese whiskey and beer maker, on its $16 billion takeover of Beam Inc.
 It’s only a matter of time before the paint segment follows” Charles Nicolas, a spokesman for Valspar, declined to comment on takeover speculation.
 Ackman pushed for General Growth to explore a takeover by Simon Property Group Inc, the largest US.
 A shift began in 2012 after money-losing multibillion-dollar takeovers, overbudget projects and relentlessly rising costs pushed the companies to focus on returns.
 extended their merger deadline by three months, adding to the tally of financial industry takeovers stalled by extra scrutiny from regulators.
 As part of the Community Reinvestment Act, the public is allowed to submit comments to the Fed about bank takeovers that are being reviewed.
 Digital Turnaround The Times is protected from unwanted takeover attempts because the company’s controlling owners, the Ochs-Sulzberger family, hold voting shares that give them a firm grip on board seats.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Saputo Inc, which won a three-way bidding battle for Australia’s oldest dairy producer, is seeking takeovers in the US, Brazil and New Zealand as it bets global demand for will continue to rise.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Canadian stocks rose an 11th day, extending the longest advance in almost two decades, as banks gained and energy stocks rallied amid a takeover.
 The KPN foundation spent much of last year fighting off the takeover attempt as competitors pushed bundled phone and Internet services to win customers.
 KPN is facing intensifying competition in the Netherlands, where cable operator Ziggo NV agreed last week to a full takeover bid by Liberty Global Plc.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- PSA Peugeot Citroen’s possible 3 billion-euro ($41 billion) stock sale is being challenged by a French shareholders’ group, which said the potential investors planning the move may be required to make a full takeover bid.
 Directors didn’t discuss any takeover offer at a meetingyesterday, the Madrid-based company said in a statement.
 stocks fell for the week as the Federal Reserve said it likely will continue reducing stimulus, overshadowing optimism about takeovers.
 The bank, which has room to absorb an extra $12 billion in risky assets through takeovers, may give up its search in about a year as investors start demanding reserves be paid out as dividends, according to Lasse Nyby, Spar Nord’s chief executive officer.
 became the second Chinese company in two weeks to see its shares surge in the days leading up to a takeover announcement, raising concern among investors that details of transactions are being leaked.
 Buffett, 83, has been using smaller deals to expand Berkshire, the firm he’s built over more than four decades through takeovers and investments in stocks such as Coca-Cola Co.
 technology companies, not including takeovers, involved cash from Google.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Uranium takeovers are on the verge of a comeback that would put companies from Denison Mines Corp.
 The rebound in uranium demand may fuel takeovers as buyers try to get ahead of rising prices, Bank of Nova Scotia said.
 The timeframe for cheap acquisitions may be running out” As the owner of undeveloped deposits and a processing mill in Canada’s uranium-rich Athabasca Basin, Denison is a prime takeover candidate, according to Dundee Securities Ltd.
 It’s a “prime takeover candidate” ‘Huge Package’ Rio Tinto Group may be particularly interested in Denison, which bought a 60 percent stake in the Waterbury Lake uranium project last year, David Sadowski, a Vancouver-based analyst at Raymond James, said in a phone interview.
 The purchase is the western extension of the Roughrider project that Rio Tinto gained from its takeover of Hathor Exploration Ltd.
 As demand rebounds, so should takeover activity, he said.
 jumped 14 percent after receiving an unsolicited, non-binding takeover offer from a public oil and gas company.
 Bank, which sells menswear, is itself resisting a $16 billion takeover bid by rival Men’s Wearhouse Inc.
 Airgas Lesson In 2010 and 2011, Airgas Inc, a chemical company, successfully fended off a takeover attempt from rival Air Products & Chemicals Inc, even after the bidding company placed three of its own nominees on the board.

 “If you look at Porsche, the brand developed extremely positively after the takeover,” he said.
 Canaccord expanded beyond Canada with its 2012 takeover of UK.
 Companies will also be required to inform the bourse when they’re in takeover talks.
 Vodafone has approached Grupo Corporativo ONO SA, Spain’s largest cable company, about a takeover, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Baby Formula Nestle should also consider adding to its infant nutrition offerings with a takeover of Mead Johnson, a $16 billion company, or the baby formula unit of Abbott Laboratories, said Pablo Zuanic, a New York-based analyst at Liberum.
 In early 2013, after Evercore circulated a list it received from Finra of persons who bought Titanium stock before the takeover, Hixon said he didn’t recognize any names on it.
 
 Verso asked to complete the takeover without having to execute a debt exchange offer first, NewPage Chairman Mark Angelson wrote in a Feb.
 In agreeing to the takeover, NewPage’s board gave “great weight” to the debt reduction that would result from the exchange offer, Angelson said in the letter, which was included by Verso in a filing today.
 As part of the takeover agreement, NewPage shareholders would receive a $250 million dividend funded with a $750 million term loan before the completion of the acquisition, according to a Jan.
 Sprint fell 73 percent to $788 at the close in New York, its biggest one-day slide since the SoftBank takeover last year.
 While declining to comment on potential takeovers, he said his firm plans to tap its “operational expertise” after making purchases.
 scrapped a proposed takeover in April.
 The Indian power producer and oil refiner said it has formed an independent committee to consider a takeover proposal by Essar Global Fund Ltd.
 “We don’t want to be the grown-ups at the party, but we wonder why Actavis would seek to complete such a large deal when near- and intermediate-term earnings are, in our view, already in a good position” Forest is an “excellent” takeover candidate for a larger pharmaceutical company and might get a “huge premium” thanks to its pipeline of drugs, Icahn said in August 2012.
 The budget pledges increased investments in the oil and mining industries and proposes to make it easier for Quebec companies to thwart hostile takeover bids as Premier Pauline Marois prepares for an election that may be held as early as April.
 The province will also offer tax breaks to protect head office jobs, while making it easier for companies to thwart hostile takeover bids.
 “My boyfriend is a surfer and he spends hours a day in the water” Sharing Dempski’s worries are the Fairfax city council, which passed the coastal testing resolution, and more than 127,000 signatories to an online petition calling for a United Nations’ takeover of part of the Fukushima cleanup.
 ArthroCare rose above the takeover price, indicating some investors may be speculating on a higher offer.
 The settlement made a takeover more plausible, Raj Denhoy, an analyst at Jefferies LLC, said at the time.
 After more than $10 billion of takeovers since 2010 which grew ABB sales by about a quarter, Spiesshofer is now casting a fresh eye over the company’s expanded operations and appointed manager Greg Scheu to head acquisition integration and North America in October.
 LightSquared and Falcone’s investment fund Harbinger Capital Partners LLC sued, claiming Ergen improperly bought the debt to assist L-Band’s takeover.
 That business is unlikely to be part of our long-term strategy” Mallinckrodt may attract takeover interest because of Ireland’s low tax rates.
 “The two that I’m kicking around obviously are fleet and rail,” Hudson said of potential takeover candidates.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Quebec will move to shield businesses from hostile takeovers and buy direct stakes in oil and mining projects to nurture homegrown companies, Finance Minister Nicolas Marceau said.
 dropped its plan for an unsolicited takeover of Quebec rival Rona Inc.
 “The presence of head offices in Quebec is both a major source of wealth and a strategic factor in economic-development decisions” The takeover recommendations are contained in a report prepared by a task force led by CGI Group Inc.
 The proposed changes would only apply to companies incorporated in the province, meaning Osisko would need to change its charter to benefit from the takeover protection.
 Rona Catalyst “Too many head offices remain vulnerable to takeover bids that are attractive in the short term to the shareholders but that would cause significant economic losses for Quebec,” the report found.
 The proposed takeover measures include barring companies that succeed in a hostile bid from selling more than 15 percent of a target’s assets for five years after a sale.
 Tax Breaks Any profits made by a hostile bidder from the resale of shares of a target company in the 24 months following a takeover offer would need to be returned to the corporation if the shares were bought 12 months before the bid was announced.
 “In the past, some hedge funds have shorted TUI while going TUI Travel long, a strategy that makes sense when you expect a takeover approach from TUI for the outstanding TUI Travel shares that would include a premium paid,” Rothenbacher said.
 stocks rose, after benchmark indexes ended a four-day rally yesterday, as better-than-forecast earnings and a $452 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 in 2010 considered making a takeover offer.
 Cable provider Grupo Corporativo ONO SA said this month it’s moving ahead with a plan to pursue an initial public offering even after Vodafone approached the Spanish company about a potential takeover.
 is wearing down traders who are passing on the chance to reap some of the biggest gains among pending takeovers.
 Bank’s share price and the takeover bid now represents the widest spread of any pending acquisition in North America larger than $500 million, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Bank rejected the proposal and strengthened its defenses against takeovers, Men’s Wearhouse went directly to shareholders Jan.
 No Match A takeover of Eddie Bauer “is very unlikely to match the accretion and synergies of the Men’s Wearhouse combination,” David Mann, a New Orleans-based analyst at Johnson Rice & Co, wrote in a Feb.
 needed to win Federal Trade Commission approval to proceed with its takeover of Medco Health Solutions Inc, which was announced in 2011.
 Bank directors last month for rejecting the bid and for toughening its anti-takeover defenses.
 The company was seen in 2012 as potentially a takeover target because of its cheap valuation and after 3M Co.
 Australia last year blocked Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s takeover of GrainCorp Ltd, eastern Australia’s largest grain handler after approving Saputo Inc’s purchase of the country’s oldest dairy processor.
 Amec hired Barclays Plc, Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi and Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc to underwrite debt for the takeover.
 The Vancouver-based gold producer won’t take up and pay for any Osisko shares tendered to its bid before a judgment on a lawsuit filed by Osisko to block the takeover, Goldcorp said in a statement.
 takeover rules.
 Renewed Bid? The arrival of new directors at David Jones probably increases the chance of a deal with Myer or a takeover by another suitor, said Simon Marais, managing director of Allan Gray Australia Pty.
 
 Ukraine Crisis Russia’s takeover of Crimea, home to its Black Sea Fleet, has sparked the worst crisis with the West since the Cold War as the European Union and the US.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- UBS AG hired bank takeover specialists Tannon Krumpelman and Doug Simons as Switzerland’s biggest lender rebuilds its financial-services practice to cope with a prolonged dealmaking slump in that industry.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Tobacco takeovers may be about to catch fire again after smoldering for six years.
 These companies are awash in cash and as they look at slower growth, they’re going to deploy that cash” Takeover Speculation Representatives for Winston-Salem, North Carolina-based Reynolds, Greensboro, North Carolina-based Lorillard, and London-based British American Tobacco, known as BAT, declined to comment on the companies’ takeover plans.
 Acquirers have paid a median of 133 times Ebitda for tobacco takeovers in the last decade, the data show.
 Menthol Concern Lorillard, which closed at $5348 a share, isn’t worth more than $62 a share in a takeover, especially given the regulatory concerns surrounding menthol cigarettes, according to Chris Growe, a St.
 At the same time, a takeover may be more appropriate after the FDA provides more clarity on its proposed rulemaking for menthol, which may happen later this year or in early 2015, he said.
 and Kuwait have backed the military takeover and pledged $15 billion in aid.
 investors not to endorse a takeover by Comcast Corp, signaling it’s not backing down in its pursuit of Time Warner Cable without a fight.
 Buying Subscribers Like Philadelphia-based Comcast, Charter pursued a takeover of the second-largest US.
 The hedge-fund firm said the poison pill, normally used as a takeover defense, is being employed to impede a proxy contest and maintain the status quo.
 “The terms of the poison pill demonstrate that the board has no genuine concern with a takeover attempt, but are instead intended to thwart Third Point, Sotheby’s largest shareholder, from effectively running a slate of director candidates,” according to the complaint.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- 








 It’s an uphill struggle for the hedge funds now” Porsche has faced a series of investigations and lawsuits since disclosing in October 2008 that it controlled 741 percent of Volkswagen AG, partly through options, and was seeking to acquire 75 percent as part of a takeover strategy.
 “There was never a guarantee that Porsche wouldn’t change its mind and decide the next day to do the takeover,” Wittig said.
 They also say Porsche’s head of investor relations, Frank Gaube, misled shareholders in phone calls when he denied the company sought a takeover.
 No Agreement Following the deal, Wyss told Credit Suisse, which also advised Swiss stock exchange-listed Synthes during the takeover, that he’d convert the proceeds into cash and securities, the Senate report said.
March 8 (Bloomberg) -- Tobacco takeovers may be about to catch fire again after smoldering for six years.
 These companies are awash in cash and as they look at slower growth, they’re going to deploy that cash” Takeover Speculation Representatives for Winston-Salem, North Carolina-based Reynolds, Greensboro, North Carolina-based Lorillard, and London-based British American Tobacco, known as BAT, declined to comment on the companies’ takeover plans.
 Acquirers have paid a median of 133 times Ebitda for tobacco takeovers in the last decade, the data show.
 Menthol Concern Lorillard, which closed at $5299 a share on March 7, isn’t worth more than $62 a share in a takeover, especially given the regulatory concerns surrounding menthol cigarettes, according to Chris Growe, a St.
 At the same time, a takeover may be more appropriate after the FDA provides more clarity on its proposed rulemaking for menthol, which may happen later this year or in early 2015, he said.
 While risk premiums were unwound last week when the immediate threat of Russian military action became less likely, markets are still respectful of the fact that the situation remains very unstable” Pro-Russian forces advanced in Ukraine’s Crimean peninsula, ignoring Western calls to halt a military takeover before the region’s separatist referendum.
 US Airways began angling for a takeover only weeks after the bigger airline sought court protection on Nov.
 Parker and Kirby also had a chance to watch the tie-ups of Delta and United, as well as Southwest Airlines Co’s 2011 takeover of AirTran Holdings Inc.
 Safeway’s 725 percent notes due in February 2031, whichare unusual in that they will remain outstanding after theplanned takeover, have lost 67 percent in the past month, themost among consumer staples companies.
 “There is still more downside risk” in the two categoriesof Safeway bonds that will remain outstanding after thetakeover, Dave Sekera, a bond strategist at Morningstar Inc,said in a telephone interview.
 Glencore acquired Xstrata in a $29 billion all-share takeover that closed in 2013.
 The Hang Seng China Enterprises Index is in a bear market, Brazil suffered its first credit-rating cut in a decade, and Russia is facing international sanctions for its Crimea takeover.
 The previous year, it engineered a takeover of General Motors’ auto finance unit, General Motors Acceptance Corp, for $74 billion.
 The British bank is open to takeover offers for Citizens as it prepares the division for an initial public offering this year, Bruce Van Saun, CEO of the Providence, Rhode Island-based subsidiary, said in an interview in January.
 Russia massed troops along the Ukraine border after annexing Crimea and rejected a United Nations resolution condemning that takeover.
 28 because of takeovers at several switching centers.
 With auto demand in the region recovering and Fiat armed with more resources thanks to the takeover of Chrysler, it may be now or never for the sporty brand.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Compuware Corp, a takeover target last year, held out for a better offer and never got one.
 Compuware reached an accord with Elliott this year that staved off a fight for control of the board, as Chief Executive Officer Bob Paul continues to try to show shareholders that he can increase returns without a takeover.
(Corrects spelling of company in final paragraph of story that ran on March 8) March 8 (Bloomberg) -- Vintage Capital Management LLC, the private equity firm waging a takeover fight for rent-to-own furniture chain Aaron’s Inc, said it would consider raising its $22 billion offer if the company engaged in talks.
 Aaron’s responded by saying it wasn’t in discussions with anyone about a takeover, though it would evaluate the unsolicited offer.
 Return Management Kahn is pushing for a takeover in part so he can bring back the company’s old management, including former Chief Operating Officer Kenneth Butler, who is one of the board nominees.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Hapag-Lloyd AG narrowed its full-year loss as the freight-shipping company cut costs and benefited from lower fuel prices before a planned takeover that will make it the world’s fourth-largest container carrier.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Now that Endocyte Inc’s experimental cancer treatment is proving successful, the company may command a takeover bid at one of the industry’s highest premiums on record.
 The results suggest the company’s treatment approach is effective and could spark a takeover by Merck & Co, which already has a partnership with Endocyte, said Royal Bank of Canada.
 That would be the second-highest takeover premium on record among similar US.
 Even though Endocyte has no marketed products yet, it may lure about $50 a share in a takeover, according to the average of four estimates from analysts and investors that range from about $35 to more than $65.
 Not Time It may be too soon for a takeover of Endocyte by either Merck or other drugmakers, said Tenthoff of Piper Jaffray.
 Merck, though, should consider having discussions about a possible takeover “sooner rather than later” because the price of a deal will probably increase as Endocyte gets more positive data on its drugs, said Hazlett of Roth Capital.
 He didn’t respond to an e-mailed list of questions following the company’s takeover by Mexico’s government.
 “Will this company continue to be a going concern under the government, or will they just liquidate all the assets to repay creditors?” Investor Protection Luis Maizel, who manages about $5 billion of fixed-income securities as president of San Diego-based LM Capital Group LLC, said the government takeover of Oceanografia may ultimately benefit asset managers investing in Mexico’s debt market.
 Kmart acquired Sears Roebuck in 2005 in a $123 billion takeover that Lampert said would create a company with the geographic reach and scale to compete with Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 His appointment was the culmination of an acrimonious takeover battle that claimed the jobs of two Hochtief chief executives and left ACS with about 56 percent of the German company.
 Full Takeover Hochtief declined to make a full takeover offer after being pressed to do so by independent directors on Leighton’s board, the Australian company said.
 The Justice Department and the Federal Communications Commission are also reviewing the takeover, which would combine the two largest US.
 The stock is at a record after WWE launched its own subscription streaming network and became the subject of takeover speculation.
 Stock Surge The stock has climbed 35 percent this month, in part because of takeover speculation, to close at $3094 last week.
 takeover target valued at more than $1 billion has seen more public bidding activity this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Deutsche Bank AG co-CEO Juergen Fitschen said in an interview last week with Die Zeit that a “rerun of the Cold War should be avoided at all costs” The bank has advised on a greater volume of takeovers involving Russian companies than any other foreign firm in the last two years, working on $74 billion in transactions, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 That’s 94 percent more than last week and 33 percent more than in late January, before takeover speculation began driving the stock higher.
 The shares climbed another 19 percent this year and reached a record $10751 on March 4, driven in part by takeover speculation that began in early February.
 Sneaky Value Grainger, an $18 billion hardware supplier, is a less obvious suitor, yet a takeover by the Lake Forest, Illinois-based company “could solve some fairly pressing issues” and would be “financially doable,” Lewis wrote.
 Earlier talks between Kerry and Lavrov failed to avert the Kremlin’s takeover of Crimea.
 shareholders are so convinced private-equity suitor Vintage Capital Management LLC will boost its takeover bid for the appliance-leasing company that they’re willing to risk $300 million.
 Even though Aaron’s board added a new hurdle to a hostile takeover last month, Vintage and activist hedge fund Starboard Value LP are each nominating a slate of directors.
 Financing Credit The campaign to be included as an adviser is typical of the competition among investment banks in high-stakes takeovers.
 In 2011, days after the $291 billion takeover of Medco Health Solutions Inc.
 Tiffany Fox, a spokeswoman for OpenTable, and Mithya Srinivasan, a spokeswoman for Pinterest, said the companies don’t comment on takeover speculation.
 In terms of number of bank takeovers, 2010 had the most since 1992 with 157 failures.
 Riverbed turned down a takeover offer from Elliott Management Corp.
 A takeover by either would be the industry’s biggest deal ever.
 Ventas, the biggest of the three REITs, may have more financial flexibility for a takeover than HCN, said Bahl & Gaynor Investment Counsel Inc.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Volkswagen AG’s planned $93 billion takeover of truckmaker Scania AB may help rival Volvo AB reach targets set by activist shareholder Cevian Capital AB.
 RBS, based in Edinburgh, has said it would be open to takeover offers for its US.
 M&T Bank Corp’s takeover of Hudson City Bancorp Inc, the biggest pending US.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- Canadian stocks were little changed as precious metal producers slipped after Crimea voted to leave Ukraine for Russia and energy stocks rose amid takeovers in the industry.
 Allianz CEO Michael Diekmann said in an interview in October that tougher financial regulation will create takeover opportunities for Europe’s biggest insurer.
 The latest turn in the takeover battle leaves open the question of who will end up owning France’s second-largest phone company.
 Store Renovation The company wants to expand its own retail network by about 50 locations, excluding takeovers, it said, and investment will mainly focus on that expansion and on store renovation.
 He left after Glencore International Plc completed its $29 billion all-share takeover of the company last year.
 Reid also left Xstrata after the takeover, which saw Glencore chief Ivan Glasenberg became CEO of the combined entity.
 AT&T, responding to speculation about a possible takeover bid, told UK.
 takeover rules.
 Stockland “cannot extract any synergies, either through cost reduction or restructuring Australand’s debt, without launching a full takeover for the group, which could be quite expensive” Stockland’s stake in the Australian developer is just below the 20 percent threshold that would trigger a takeover bid under Australian regulations.
 “CapitaLand feels there are better opportunities in China to deploy these funds” Dexus Property Group, Australia’s biggest listed office landlord, and partner Canada Pension Plan Investment Board won a takeover battle for an office fund managed by Commonwealth Bank of Australia when GPT said in January it wouldn’t raise its offer.
 The deal is the latest in a string of takeovers by Co-Chief Executive Officers Bill McDermott and Jim Hagemann Snabe over the past four years in an attempt to vault SAP into the expanding market for cloud-computing tools delivered to customers online.
 Since 2010, SAP has spent more than $12 billion on takeovers in California’s Silicon Valley and elsewhere.
 The co-CEOs’ first big Valley deal came in 2010 with the $58 billion takeover of Bay Area database maker Sybase Inc.
 Petronas acquired control of the project through its C$52 billion ($47 billion) takeover of Canada’s Progress Energy in 2012, making it the second-biggest shareholder in British Columbia’s Montney shale-gas area.
 While the company isn’t actively pursuing acquisitions, it hasn’t lost interest in potential takeovers.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Xstrata Plc, the world’s largest metals trader, increased its forecast for 2014 pretax profit from its trading arm by $700 million on expected gains from the takeovers of Xstrata Plc and Viterra Inc.
 Glencore became the fourth-largest mining company in May through a $29 billion takeover of Xstrata, adding coal, nickel, zinc and copper production to its trading empire.
 upgraded the oil and gas explorer and said it was a likely takeover target.
 Vedanta has lost 60 percent of its value since he led an $87 billion takeover of oil company Cairn India Ltd, until then an industry unknown to the copper and zinc producer.
 Severn Trent rejected a takeover offer in June, saying it was too low.
 Comcast is seeking regulatory approval for the $45 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable, giving it control of 30 percent of the pay-TV market.
 Utilities that meet Buffett’s takeover criteria include Wisconsin Energy Corp, a $98 billion company with a return on equity of 14 percent in 2013, and Alliant Energy Corp, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Not Done Brian Manthey, a spokesman for Wisconsin Energy, and Scott Reigstad, a spokesman for Alliant, said the companies don’t comment on takeover speculation.
 The writedowns are a legacy of his predecessor, Alessandro Profumo, who spent about $60 billion on European takeovers from 2005 to 2008.
 Glasenberg, Glencore’s largest shareholder with an 83 percent stake, completed the $29 billion takeover of Xstrata in May to add coal, copper, zinc and nickel mines to his trading empire.
 The holding company looked at more than 24 potential takeover targets last year, though terms didn’t warrant any agreement, and Porsche “is not willing to pay any price” when investing, Chief Executive Officer Martin Winterkorn said today at a press conference near headquarters in Stuttgart, Germany.
 Porsche SE’s only directly held asset is 507 percent of the common stock in Wolfsburg, Germany-based Volkswagen following the 2012 sale of the Porsche AG sports-car and sport-utility vehicle brand to VW that settled a takeover dispute.
 to as much as 74 percent and signaled it may consider a full takeover.
 The London-based bank, forced to seek a bailout in 2008 after its takeover of HBOS Plc, is nearing an end to selling non-essential mainland European assets.
March 9 (Bloomberg) -- Russian President Vladimir Putin is showing no signs of heeding Western calls to ease the standoff in Crimea, where pro-Kremlin forces stepped up their takeover of the Ukrainian region preparing for a separatist referendum.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cheung Kong Infrastructure Holdings Ltd, the second-largest holder in takeover target Envestra Ltd, signaled its opposition to APA Group’s bid for the rest of the Australian gas distributor, putting the deal in doubt.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Xstrata Plc billionaire Chief Executive Officer Ivan Glasenberg reaped a $182 million dividend for last year after steering the commodity trader and metals producer through a 15-month takeover of Xstrata Plc.
 and European Union responded to Russia’s takeover of Crimea by imposing sanctions on officials close to President Vladimir Putin.
 Aside from Amundi, the bank doesn’t plan any takeovers, with the possible exception of private banking, he said.
March 8 (Bloomberg) -- Russell Investments, the indexing and fund-management unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, is drawing takeover interest from suitors including Blackstone Group LP and Bain Capital LLC as Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 “The talks so far give reason for optimism” A pact with Austria would let America Movil take a friendlier takeover approach compared with last year, when it dropped a bid for shares of Dutch carrier Royal KPN NV after opposition from executives.
 The terms of a takeover offer to minority shareholders, required under Austrian law in case of a pact between syndicates, are still being discussed, he said.
 “There is some talk about a possible takeover” of Shuaa, he said.
 Shuaa is a possible takeover target because its shares have been “hit hard” since 2008, Joice Mathew, head of research at United Securities in Muscat, said in an e-mail.
 The company will notify thegovernment when exports are planned so that the government willbe able to act as it may then be appropriate” Russian President Vladimir Putin’s takeover of Crimea hasset off the worst confrontation in two decades with the WestEuropean Union leaders are gathering today in Brussels to try toformulate a unified position on punishing Russia amid concernsthat trade curbs would do self-inflicted damage to Europe’seconomy.
 Senate, Newark is struggling with a leadership transition that’s left New Jersey’s biggest city on the brink of a state takeover.
March 8 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc increased its takeover offer to investors of Grupo Corporativo Ono SA before the Spanish cable company announces plans for a share sale next week, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 Chinese Regulator Glencore is selling the Las Bambas mine as part of an agreement to win Chinese regulatory authorization for its $29 billion takeover of Xstrata Plc last year.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Alsea SAB will push back a planned stock offering to help fund its purchase of the Vips restaurant chain after the Mexican government placed conditions on the takeover, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Vodafone Group Plc retreated 36 percent after people familiar with the matter said the mobile-phone operator has increased its takeover bid for Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 Osisko rejected the bid as too low and got additional time to consider its options after filing suit to stop the takeover.
 Marcus, 48, had been CEO for less than two months before agreeing to Comcast’s $45 billion takeover offer in February.
 America Movil has reduced its holding from about 30 percent after it dropped a 72 billion-euro ($99 billion) takeover attempt for KPN last year following opposition from the company’s management.
 At the time, the takeover drew complaints from shareholders that Chief Executive Officer Mickey Drexler didn’t get a fair price for the company.
 “We have a bit of a tailwind from the semiconductor market” The $15 billion deal, Atlas Copco’s biggest since the takeover of Rental Service Corp.
 Five takeovers of wine or spirits companies announced in the past five years valued the targets at a median of 15 times Ebitda, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Glasenberg, the company’s largest shareholder, completed the $29 billion takeover of Xstrata Plc in May last year to add coal, copper, zinc and nickel mines to Glencore’s trading empire.
 The world’s biggest exporter of power-station coal wrote down the value of assets acquired in the Xstrata takeover by $77 billion in August to reflect “the broader negative mining-industry environment” It reported a full-year net loss of $74 billion on the writedowns.
 In exchange, Vancouver-based Goldcorp agreed not to take up and pay for shares tendered in the takeover bid before April 15 unless Osisko announces a transaction with another party.
 He oversaw TMX during a takeover battle between London Stock Exchange Group Plc and a consortium of Canadian financial institutions.
 The company had to face angry shareholders and a lawsuit by an ex-soldier claiming 30 percent of its main asset, as well as being a possible takeover target last year.
 Investors have speculated about who might replace Buffett at the top of the firm that he and Vice Chairman Charles Munger, 90, built into a business valued at more than $280 billion through takeovers and stock picks.
 ‘All Stars’ Buffett relies on the CEOs of Berkshire’s more than 80 operating units to handle day-to-day decisions, leaving him time to pursue takeovers and invest in stocks and bonds.
 Sprint is spending about $7 billion this year on network construction, refitting its former Nextel network and incorporating the added airwaves acquired with the takeover of Clearwire Corp.
 If Comcast’s stock price and value of the takeover offer continue to deteriorate, Liberty could now have “more wildcard liquidity” for a counterbid, Harrigan wrote.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Bourbon SA, the French shipowner that received a takeover bid this month, formed a committee to examine the offer that valued the shipowner at $25 billion.
 A deal would mark the first takeover of a Japanese commercial bank by a foreign lender.
 to consider a takeover and offered to buy the company with an investor group for about $46 billion.
March 3 (Bloomberg) -- Slowing growth at Anheuser-Busch InBev NV and a dearth of big takeover targets may finally drive the world’s biggest brewer to swallow its $79 billion rival, SABMiller Plc.
 in May 2010, has a history of turning small takeovers into big-name brands such as MAC and Bobbi Brown beauty products.
 blocked its takeover by Dallas-based AT&T, the nation’s No.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- ALL-America Latina Logistica SA’s controlling shareholders are advancing in talks to support a $3 billion takeover offer by Brazilian ethanol maker Cosan SA Industria & Comercio, said two people involved in the process.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Conditions are ripe for more hostile takeovers in mining as buyers capitalize on share prices that plunged last year, while targets hold out for more amid a glimmer of recovery.
 Dana Grosser, a spokeswoman for Oaks, Pennsylvania-based SEI Investments, and Michael Amenta of Norwalk, Connecticut-based FactSet, said the companies don’t comment on takeover speculation, when asked whether they’re interested in buying Envestnet.
 analyst Masataka Kunito said $5 billion is “excessive” Absent a takeover, J.
 Payments by cable companies to carry local broadcasts have made the business more lucrative, providing a new source of revenue on top of ad sales, and LIN was considered an attractive takeover candidate, Sweeney said.
 Babcock and Avincis had said in November they were in joint-venture talks, and the takeover plan came about after the private-equity owners indicated they’d prefer to exit, he said.
 For Apollo, the move would mean doubling down on the industry after its takeover of Chuck E.
 Class B shares have approval rights over decisions such as anti-takeover measures, M&A and annual budgets, according to the filing.
 Qatar backed the Brotherhood, and the Qatari television channel Al Jazeera regularly airs programs critical of the army takeover and the Gulf countries that support it.
 10, as concern eases over the potential impact of a takeover of T-Mobile on the Japanese company’s debt.
 and Facebook Inc’s $19 billion takeover of mobile messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 This year’s deals have been motivated by “expansion of market presence and consolidation,” rather than many of 2013’s biggest takeovers, which were “clean-up trades,” Carr said.
 takeover bids worth more than $10 billion since January 2013 were initiated by firms founded and controlled by one of the 200 wealthiest men in the world, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Comcast shares have risen 35 percent since the takeover bid was made public in November.
March 7 (Bloomberg) -- The takeover battle for Vivendi SA’s SFR unit, the biggest contested bid in Europe since Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc captured ABN Amro Holding NV in 2007, is a boon to loan bankers starved of deals for the past six years.
 Seventy percent of executives expect takeover deals to increase this year according to a Feb.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Two takeovers in two days are putting a spotlight on Southern California’s role as a hotbed for technology startups.
 Premier Foods’ net debt peaked at about 18 billion pounds in 2008 following a series of highly-leveraged acquisitions, that culminated in the 123 billion-pound takeover of RHM Plc in 2007.
 “As far as the loyal elite is concerned, sanctions have always led to a consolidation of forces to counter pressure from outside,” said Sechin, who spearheaded Rosneft’s takeover of Yukos Oil Co.
 After takeover talks with firms including Stifel Financial Corp.
 through a reverse takeover in a deal valuing Mega at NZ$210 million ($179 million), the companies said March 24.
 Judges in Stuttgart dismissed a lawsuit seeking 14 billion euros over the German carmaker’s aborted takeover of Volkswagen AG.
 Tensions over Russia’s takeover of Ukraine’s Crimea region has sparked questions about that supply connection.
 for the third time in 11 days, offering $149 billion to trump an agreed takeover by France’s Imerys SA.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Alberta is pressing the Canadian government to allow input and give clarity on rules banning foreign takeovers in the oil sands by state-owned companies, more than a year after the restrictions were announced.
 “We, as the owner of the resource, want to have significant input into how those parameters are structured,” Alberta International and Intergovernmental Relations Minister Cal Dallas said in an interview in Ottawa, referring to the takeover rules.
 “We continue to seek clarity” Prime Minister Stephen Harper said in December 2012 that state-owned enterprises would be banned from buying majority stakes in the oil sands outside of “exceptional circumstances” Approval of the $151 billion takeover by China’s Cnooc Ltd.
 Net Benefit Canada’s Industry Ministry automatically reviews foreign takeovers of companies with at least C$354 million in assets to determine if the transaction of “net benefit” to the country.
 After his stint at Treasury, Winograd returned to Bendix, where he was treasurer during the company’s attempted takeover of Martin Marietta Corp.
 The 23 funds had sought 14 billion euros from Porsche’s aborted takeover of Volkswagen AG in 2008.
 M&T’s stock has trailed peers as the bank waits for regulators to approve its takeover of Paramus, New Jersey-based Hudson City, the industry’s biggest and longest pending merger.
 Five proposed, pending and completed takeovers of wine or spirits companies announced in the past five years valued the targets at a median of 15 times earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, according to Bloomberg data.
 Roger Entner, an analyst at Recon Analytics LLC, said Virtuix Omni may be a takeover target for potential acquirers including Sony Corp.
 “Right now, there’s more money chasing good opportunities since the last time we had a bubble” Virtuix Omni has booked 3,000 orders, yet so far hasn’t received any takeover approaches, Goetgeluk said.
 “This is the beginning of the next generation of computers” Interest Climbing Paul Travers, CEO of Rochester, New York-based Vuzix, which makes virtual-reality glasses for defense, enterprise and consumer applications, said he has received takeover approaches.
 “Being bought by a company which the games developers don’t trust might hurt them” Blippar has turned down investments from Silicon Valley venture capital firms and rebuffed takeover approaches, Mitra said.
 Worldwide, the firms have announced $1407 billion of takeovers this year, up from $101 billion in the same period a year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Moran was a partner at Skadden, where she spent 30 years advising on takeovers, private equity and restructuring across the US, Australia, Canada, Europe and Japan markets, the firm said.
 Buffett has said the company hasn’t paid a dividend because he’s been able to generate better returns for investors by pursuing takeovers, buying securities and investing in subsidiaries like MidAmerican Energy and the Burlington Northern Santa Fe railroad.
 The executive also said he will consider takeovers to build a bigger network through which to sell its products after the IPO, though he has yet to identify a target.
 Assets under management increased 24 percent to 2629 billion pounds after the takeover of Cazenove Capital, completed in July, boosted its private-banking operations.
March 6 (Bloomberg) --- Zimbabwe Alloys Chrome Ltd, a ferrochrome producer declared insolvent last July, is evaluating three takeover bids, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 “The announcement of a rights issue suggests that a takeover is unlikely for Dah Sing,” Jim Antos, an analyst at Mizuho Securities Asia, wrote in an e-mail.
 “We are concerned that Zell is joining the Related/Corvex hostile takeover effort so he may influence these lease negotiations to the benefit of his company and the detriment of SIR shareholders, including CWH,” CommonWealth President Adam Portnoy said in the statement, referring to the companies’ ticker symbols.
 He joined the Charlotte, North Carolina-based firm with the 2009 takeover of Merrill Lynch & Co.
 Like AmCham, the Association of European Business has warned its members about the risks of even minor legal infringements by foreign employees -- particularly since Russia’s takeover of Crimea, home to its Black Sea Fleet, evolved into the biggest confrontation between Russia and the West since the Cold War.
 “What Soros is after is to say, ‘Look, if the market is not going to give us a comparable value to where the peers are trading, maybe a company should come out there and do that’’ via a takeover, Dingmann said in a phone interview.
 After removing most of the geological risks tied to its real estate, Penn Virginia is now in “full manufacturing mode” and that could help it lure takeover interest from a larger oil company, such as EOG or ConocoPhillips, said Kim Pacanovsky of Imperial Capital.
 Tiffany’s heritage, history and profitability may also make the company a potential takeover target, according to Allegra Perry, an analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald Europe.
 Revenue has increased 16 percent since 2009, the year before IMS’s takeover.
 Comcast Chief Executive Officer Brian Roberts said last month that he was prepared to divest subscribers as part of the takeover to keep the merged company’s customers below 30 percent of the total US.
 Last week, Charter urged Time Warner Cable investors not to endorse Comcast’s takeover, signaling it’s not backing down in its pursuit of Time Warner Cable.
Vodafone Group Plc (VOD) and Grupo Corporativo Ono SA’s owners are moving closer to a takeover agreement after the Spanish cable company delayed plans for an initial public offering, according to people familiar with the matter.
 The takeover will give Etisalat control of the biggest wireless carrier in Morocco, adding to its African operations that include Egypt and Nigeria.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- Bourbon SA jumped the most in 15 years in Paris trading after receiving a takeover bid that valued the shipowner at 18 billion euros ($25 billion).
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- A takeover of Safeway Inc.
 While the multiple is low compared to takeovers such as Kroger’s purchase of Harris Teeter Supermarkets Inc.
 Even after takeover speculation helped boost the stock 19 percent this year through yesterday, the company has the lowest Ebitda multiple among its peers, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
March 3 (Bloomberg) -- Dexus Property Group and partner Canada Pension Plan Investment Board are set to complete their takeover of the property fund managed by Commonwealth Bank of Australia, together gaining ownership of A$32 billion ($29 billion) of office buildings managed by the trust.
 The groups now control more than 21 billion shares in Commonwealth Property Office Fund, above the 901 percent threshold needed to trigger a mandatory takeover, Sydney-based Dexus said in a regulatory filing.
 Dexus will manage assets worth A$94 billion on completing the takeover, according to an e-mailed statement from the company.
 Dexus, Australia’s biggest listed office landlord, won the takeover battle for the office fund when rival GPT Group said it wouldn’t raise its offer.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- Japanese companies are poised to renew a push for overseas takeovers this year, driven by low borrowing costs and the strongest balance sheets in more than a decade.
 Quebec Finance Minister Nicolas Marceau last month proposed changes to the province’s Business Corporations Act to protect Quebec-based companies against hostile takeover bids.
 The company will transfer all M&A bankers from its Singapore brokerage arm to the local commercial banking subsidiary in May, allowing the latter to begin advising clients on takeovers, Kazunobu Takahara, a Tokyo-based spokesman at Mitsubishi UFJ’s lending unit, said in an interview on March 5.
 The transfer underscores Mitsubishi UFJ’s determination to capitalize on its ability to provide financing for takeovers to boost earnings amid waning profitability at its domestic lending operations.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Montreal said it still considers its $12 billion takeover of F&C Asset Management Plc “attractive” even after the UK.
 investment fund, for 708 million pounds in the second second-largest takeover in the bank’s 196-year history.
 Facebook’s takeover of WhatsApp, the biggest Internet acquisition in more than a decade, followed Japanese online retailer Rakuten Inc’s $900 million purchase of the Viber Internet messaging and calling service.
 Olam declined to comment, saying it can only speak through board-approved announcements because of the takeover offer.
 Value Rebound Before the takeover offer was announced, Olam’s shares traded at 12 times projected 12-month profits, near the benchmark measure’s 13.
 before takeover announcements this month.
 Olam is the subject of a takeover offer by a unit of Temasek Holdings Pte for S$223 cash per share, a 12 percent premium to its last close.
 In an e-mail to Bloomberg News, Block, the founder of Muddy Waters LLC, declined to comment on the takeover announcement or his position in Olam.
 During that stretch, Olam’s Singapore-traded equities have climbed on 18 of 26 days before being halted earlier today before news of the takeover offer was disclosed.
 The deal follows its 105 billion-euro takeover of Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year, with integration due to start next month.
 That leaves Wind, which operates under the Infostrada brand, as a possible takeover target.
 to almost double its stock estimate is also turning the drugstore chain into a takeover candidate.
 More Savings Rite Aid’s improving financial situation may make a takeover of the company more attractive to its larger rivals because they would be more likely to get cost-saving and revenue benefits from a deal, said Ross Muken, a New York-based analyst at International Strategy & Investment Group LLC.
 said a takeover of Rite Aid may be unlikely because its assets are in lower-quality geographical areas that don’t fit with Walgreen’s strategy of building flagship stores in prime locations.
 “If he can show that he’s stabilized the business, then that that would open the door for” BlackBerry to become a takeover target again, Todd said.
 It’s an interesting parallel with life, and it’s an interesting parallel with work for sure” Hong Kong Raised in Hong Kong after his family fled the Communist takeover of mainland China, he left the former British colony in his last year of high school to come to the US and enroll at Northfield Mount Hermon, a boarding school in Massachusetts.
March 9 (Bloomberg) -- Pro-Russian forces advanced in Ukraine’s Crimean peninsula, ignoring Western calls to abandon a military takeover before the region’s separatist referendum.
 Meanwhile, the Qatar-based television channel Al Jazeera television is still regularly airing programs critical of the army takeover and the Gulf countries that supported it.
 The deal may spur more takeovers as rivals try to match Vodafone’s size, said Robin Bienenstock of Sanford C.
 “If Vodafone becomes a takeover target, we will listen to the stories of whoever has a different view” IPO ‘Music’ To win Ono, Colao had to convince the company’s private-equity investors that he could offer them a better deal than the IPO, without overpaying.
 ‘Spending Power’ Colao is making purchases while he has the benefit of the $130 billion sale of Vodafone’s stake in Verizon Wireless, much of which was returned to shareholders, and the potential of a takeover by AT&T to keep investors satisfied, Bienenstock said.
 If Yeung was a money launderer, why would he make such a high profile takeover, his lawyers asked.
 after a 1999 takeover went awry, ultimately fixing the company and selling it to ABB Ltd.
 Scania this week said the offer is too low, while VW called it “highly attractive” and vowed to pursue its takeover.
 “The decline in Scania’s credit default swaps reflects the market view that Volkswagen will most likely succeed in the takeover,” Mads Rosendal, a credit analyst at Danske Bank A/S, said by phone.
 Olam declined to comment, saying it can only speak through board-approved announcements because of the takeover offer.
 Value Rebound Before the takeover offer was announced, Olam’s shares traded at 12 times projected 12-month profits, near the benchmark measure’s 13.
 before takeover announcements this month.
 Raleigh, North Carolina-based Salix may seek a takeover because it could sell the drug with its own remedies, Ladenburg Thalmann & Co.
 Furiex’s premature ejaculation drug, Priligy, also could draw takeover interest from companies with erectile dysfunction medicines, said Redmond Asset Management LLC, which estimated a buyer could offer about $15 billion, more than a 50 percent premium.
 Europe’s largest low-cost carrier has battled with antitrust authorities in Europe since it first bought Aer Lingus shares as part of a takeover bid in 2006.
 (SDL) in 2011 before Hanlong made takeover bids for thecompanies.
 Liu had led the$12 billion takeover bid for Australian iron ore minerSundance, which collapsed last year after his reported detentionby police in China.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo Corporativo Ono SA shareholders have approved plans for an initial public offering today even as talks about a takeover of the Spanish cable company by Vodafone Group Plc continue, according to people familiar with the matter.
 During that stretch, Olam’s Singapore-traded equities have climbed on 18 of 26 days before being halted earlier today before news of the takeover offer was disclosed.
 takeover of insurance regulation.
 Today’s letter extends his attack to the board of directors of the company, which adopted a shareholder-rights plan, known as poison pill, to protect itself from hostile takeovers after Loeb started his campaign last year.
 shareholders seeking more money in a proposed $17 billion takeover by the medical-device maker.
 ArthroCare rose above the takeover price, indicating some investors might be speculating on a higher offer.
 is successful in its $987 billion takeover of London-based AstraZeneca Plc, there is one big potential loser: the US.
 takeover after a January proposal was spurned.
 companies to look overseas for takeover targets.
 Going Global Even before the Lafarge-Holcim transaction, France was by far Europe’s most active country for takeovers this year with more than $60 billion in deals, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The discussions were first reported yesterday by London’s Sunday Times, whose unnamed bank and industry sources said New York-based Pfizer made a tentative approach about a takeover valuing AstraZeneca at more than 60 billion pounds ($101 billion).
 After a failed takeover of Dutch phone operator Royal KPN NV last year, the company entered an agreement last week to share control of Telekom Austria AG with the European nation’s government, triggering a bid of as much as 142 billion euros ($196 billion) to buy out minority shareholders.
 Another tiny firm set up by Robey and Warshaw, formerly of Morgan Stanley and UBS AG, worked with Vodafone Group Plc’s board on the company’s $10 billion takeover of Spanish cable company Grupo Corporativo Ono SA, announced last month.
 on its $452 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Founded by UBS bankers Aryeh Bourkoff and Ehren Stenzler, it’s been a regular adviser to Liberty Global Plc, the cable conglomerate controlled by billionaire John Malone, working on Liberty’s $16 billion takeover of Virgin Media Inc.
 He opposes the cable company’s proposed takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Relative Valuation The Asian Internet measure had gained as much as 14 percent this year on speculation growing demand for social networking, e-commerce and online games would boost earnings and fuel takeovers in the industry.
 Symrise AG lost 22 percent as it revealed plans for a capital increase after announcing a proposed takeover of Diana Group.
 “Changing CEO after 15 months and review of operating, investment and portfolio management plans raises questions on a possible takeover,” Peter Hutton, a London-based analyst at RBC, said in a note yesterday.
 reached a friendly takeover deal.
 Those takeovers, and plans to introduce 100 new or revamped cars through next year, are part of a strategy to overtake Toyota Motor Corp.
 completed the takeover of Nokia Oyj’s phone business, ending a seven-month wait to renew its assault on the mobile market and leaving the Finnish company seeking growth in wireless networks.
 Leading a successful acquisition of Newmont, in what would be the biggest gold takeover, would set up Barrick to do further deals, including ones involving other commodities.
 in 2006 for about $102 billion including net debt, a record for a gold takeover.
 The takeover closed January 2013.
 Going Global Even before the Lafarge-Holcim deal, France was by far Europe’s most-active country for takeovers this year with more than $60 billion in deals, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 in a takeover that may drop the Botox maker to junk status.
 For much of the rest the corporate world looking to fund takeovers, though, it’s about as attractive as it’s ever been to borrow.
 on its $288 billion takeover by a group including Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 Danny Zappin, a former CEO of Maker Studios, and three co-founders unsuccessfully sought in court to block what they said was an April 15 vote on the Disney takeover, saying the notice to shareholders was misleading.
 BlackRock, which added passive investments such as exchange-traded funds with its takeover of Barclays Global Investors in 2009, manages mutual funds, institutional strategies and alternative products such as hedge funds.
 The railroad has boosted those outlays as it distributed more than $12 billion to its Omaha, Nebraska-based parent since the 2010 takeover.
 Technology companies have led gains in Asian shares during the past 12 months on speculation growing demand for social networking, e-commerce and online games will boost earnings and fuel takeovers in the industry.
 The division, which sells Fortimel supplements to treat malnutrition, was acquired as part of a takeover of Royal Numico NV that also gave Danone brands including Nutricia and Cow & Gate.
 Barrick was to offer Newmont shareholders a takeover premium of 13 percent, the people said.
 “It exposes it to different markets and dynamics, away from regulation and increased competition in Mexico” The accord gives Slim, 74, a victory to celebrate after he failed to persuade Dutch phone company Royal KPN NV to accept a takeover offer of as much as $97 billion last year.
 Pershing Square amassed 97 percent of Allergan after reaching an agreement with Valeant to jointly pursue a hostile takeover of the company, the filing showed.
 Pared Offerings WH Group planned to use proceeds from the offering to repay debt used to finance the Smithfield takeover, the prospectus shows.
 and Coca-Cola Co, Teradata could command about a 30 percent premium in a takeover, Summit Research Partners LLC said.
 Big Target Suitors may prefer to wait and see how new technology like Hadoop is received by customers before contemplating a takeover of Teradata, said Wittine of Longbow.
 A customer base that includes DirecTV and Berkshire Hathaway Inc’s railroad Burlington Northern Santa Fe could help Teradata command about $60 to $65 a share in a takeover, he said.
 stocks rose for a sixth day, the longest streak since September, amid a rally in drugmakers after more than $70 billion in global takeover offers.
 Shire earlier rose as much as 62 percent after Reuters reported that Allergan was preparing a takeover offer for the UK.
 (K), the maker of breakfastcereals, Pop Tarts and other packaged food, rose the most inalmost five years in New York after options trading signaledpossible takeover activity.
 “This is absolutely the kind of options action that couldsignal takeover activity,” said Christopher Rich, head optionsstrategist at JonesTrading Institutional Services LLC inChicago.
 While it remains the subject of takeoverspeculation, no transaction was announced.
 -- announced $174 billion of takeovers globally, the data show.
 After the first two months of 2013 were marked by takeovers of Dell Inc.
 remains interested in a takeover of Vodafone, people familiar with the matter have said, and Sprint Corp, the US.
 Speaking at a National Assembly committee hearing today, Montebourg said the French government prefers alliances to takeovers.
 The French government in 2005 passed an anti-takeover decree driven by speculation that PepsiCo.
 The European Union’s General Court backed EU regulators in preventing ABN Amro from making large takeovers, saying the bank’s priority should be to repay aid it received from the government ahead of any acquisitions.
 “Even if they were allowed to do larger takeovers it would probably not be a very smart thing to do when you’re in a trajectory toward a share sale” Belgium’s Fortis The Netherlands bought Fortis’s Dutch banking and insurance units, including parts of the former ABN Amro Holding NV, in 2008 for about 168 billion euros ($23 billion), after the Belgian firm collapsed.
 EU regulators approved recapitalizations of as much as 545 billion euros after ABN Amro agreed to a ban on large takeovers.
 EU Threshold ABN Amro’s takeover ban hampers its ability to enhance efficiency after the nationalization left it with “dispersed assets which were subscale” outside the Netherlands, the bank’s lawyer told a court hearing in Luxembourg last year.
 Endurance said its return on equity and earnings per share would gain in 2015 under a takeover through more than $100 million in annual “synergies,” including cost cuts, underwriting improvements and better chances for capital management.
 He said he plans to buy $25 million of Endurance shares in connection with a takeover.
 While the industry is in a period of rapid change and consolidation, “It does seem like you’re going to need scale and global reach” Repeated speculation about a takeover has buoyed shares of Meda in recent years.
 approached Meda about a takeover, two people with knowledge of the matter said at the time.
 It was introduced at a time when corporate raiders amassed shares in secret, then sprung takeover offers and pressured individual shareholders to quickly sell control of a company.
 After completing the takeover of Beechcraft on March 14, the Providence, Rhode Island-based company “identified redundancies” in the units that have been combined to form Textron Aviation, Jim Walters, senior vice president for human resources and communications, told Textron workers in a letter.
 The value of takeovers involving companies in the region since the beginning of the year stands at $301 billion, up 20 percent from a year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 In 2005, it passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 The largest successful takeover of a French business by a US.
 GE and Alstom have already held talks with French government officials about the proposed takeover to preemptively address potential political concerns, one of the people familiar with the situation said.
 that have largely shunned this month’s takeover frenzy lost a combined $41 billion for their shareholders through yesterday, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 has attempted to negotiate a takeover of Meda AB, while CRT Capital’s Chiang said Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd.
 Up until now, much of the industry’s takeover activity was led by specialty pharmaceutical companies, Chiang of CRT Capital said.
 While generic drugmaker Mylan has takeover ambitions, it’s struggling to get a deal done.
 in August ended a bid to buy Bank Danamon for $65 billion in what would have been Southeast Asia’s largest bank takeover, after failing to win regulatory approval for a majority stake.
 Still, the government has mechanisms by which it could try to prevent a takeover.
 “This would be the largest takeover of a British firm.
 government ministers April 29 to discuss a potential takeover, according to a person familiar with the meetings.
 “AstraZeneca is a jewel in the crown in the pharmaceutical sector and a foreign takeover is really concerning,” a member of the Business Committee and opposition Labour lawmaker, said in an interview.
 In 2005, it passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 Canada’s sixth-largest lender by assets will probably expand by building from within, rather than through takeovers, he said.
 Price Premium Previ, which rejected a Cosan offer to buy a stake in ALL in 2012, is part of the group that approved the 696 billion-real ($31 billion) takeover offer valuing ALL’s shares at 10184 reais each.
 Rolls has made purchases to strengthen its industrial engines business, and the company considered a takeover of Finnish marine-engine maker Waertsilae Oyj earlier this year before talks ended.
 About $141 billion of corporate takeovers in the pharmaceutical industry were announced or proposed in the 12 months through today, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Allergan, Valeant Allergan Inc, the maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment, is also being targeted for a takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 PZU, which in 2012 announced plans to spend as much as 7 billion zloty on foreign acquisitions, earlier considered takeovers of state-owned insurers in former Yugoslav republics, including Croatia, Serbia and Montenegro.
 “Today’s takeover is part of our expansion strategy and should help us solidify our leading position in the region,” PZU CEO Andrzej Klesyk said at a news conference in Warsaw, adding the purchase won’t affect 2013 dividend.
 Its investment bank ranked 32nd last year for announced takeovers involving a US.
 Technology companies led gains in Asian shares during the past 12 months on speculation growing demand for social networking, e-commerce and online games will boost earnings and fuel takeovers in the industry.
 A takeover would add brands including Meadow Fresh yogurt, Olive Grove margarine and Wonder White bread to Wilmar and First Pacific’s Chinese and Southeast Asian consumer divisions.
 Sugar Deal A deal would be Wilmar’s biggest takeover since its A$154 billion purchase of CSR Ltd’s Australian sugar business in 2010, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 dollar terms, it would be the third-biggest food takeover in the Asia-Pacific region over the past five years, the data show.
 Goodman Fielder should engage with the takeover suitors, said Paul Skamvougeras, deputy head of equities at Perpetual.
 company may make a takeover offer.
 Repeated speculation about a takeover has buoyed shares of Solna, Sweden-based Meda in recent years.
 approached Meda about a takeover, two people with knowledge of the matter said at the time.
 Atlas Copco this year completed the $15 billion takeover of Edwards Group, broadening its client base into vacuum pumps for semiconductor production.
 Allergan today adopted a one-year shareholder rights plan to help thwart a hostile takeover.
 About $141 billion of corporate takeovers in the pharmaceutical industry were announced or proposed in the 12 months through yesterday, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Munich-based Siemens is considering “a partial takeover” of its French rival that “offers great opportunities and potential for Germany and France from an industrial-policy standpoint,” Stefan Rouenhoff, a spokesman for the German Economy Ministry, said in Berlin today.
 The Chinesemapping company accepted Alibaba Group Holding Ltd’s takeoveroffer that values it at $15 billion.
 “What are you going to expand into?’,” said McLeod, who’ll be assessing takeover targets in a new role at the Perth-based company.
 With as much as A$5 billion ($46 billion) of cash and debt that can be used for takeovers according to Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit, Wesfarmers should invest surplus funds rather than return them to shareholders, said McLeod.
 He didn’t say whether it was best spent on existing operations or takeovers.
 “They’ll be out there looking for new opportunities” From July, McLeod will become Wesfarmers’ Group Commercial Director, with wide-ranging responsibilities including internal projects as well as assessing overseas and domestic takeover targets.
 -- and now Mallinckrodt -- are broadening their suites of drugs through takeovers that immediately boost earnings with the help of lower corporate tax rates in countries such as Ireland.
 Even Mallinckrodt, whose shares fell 25 percent yesterday, may seek more takeovers after it integrates Questcor, Argent said.
 “You’re becoming a significantly larger company and growing your earnings number at a significantly higher rate from these deals” Without accounting for potential synergies, the Questcor takeover will boost Mallinckrodt’s earnings per share by about 70 percent, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The company last month completed a takeover of Cadence Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 When asked on a conference call with analysts yesterday whether it’s planning any more transactions, Mallinckrodt executives said they wouldn’t rule out licensing deals, company takeovers or asset purchases.
 A representative for Mallinckrodt declined to comment on any future takeover plans.
 Mallinckrodt will probably hold off on takeovers until it has integrated Questcor, though it may eventually seek more deals to help achieve its goal of becoming more diversified, said Harrison of Argent Capital.
 “We’ll leave the building only if the Kiev government that came to power after an armed and illicit takeover will leave the building,” Pushilin, whose group has seized buildings in the eastern city of Donetsk, said by phone today.
 in the biggest takeover of a Hong Kong lender since 2001 to gain a foothold in the expanding Chinese financial hub.
 It’s the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since DBS Group Holdings Ltd, OCBC’s largest competitor in Singapore, offered $53 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 It’s still unclear how much Wing Hang will help OCBC tap into the offshore renminbi market” Wing Hang Bank’s investors will be entitled to a dividend of as much as 46 Hong Kong cents per share if the takeover is approved by stockholders, according to today’s statement.
 Before taking into account any external funding, the takeover will lower OCBC’s common equity Tier 1 capital adequacy ratio to 11 percent from 145 percent, the lender said.
 and Evercore Partners Inc, the New York-based takeover advisers, reported profits that missed analysts’ estimates as transactions weren’t finished in time to yield fees.
 economic growth are giving business leaders more confidence to make big takeovers, Altman said.
 Since failing to get a hold of Actavis last year, Valeant has expanded in skin treatments, eye care and medical devices with the takeovers of Obagi Medical Products Inc, Bausch & Lomb Holdings Inc.
 17 that the PIC’s opposition to its takeover was for nationalist reasons.
 “Some financial ratios and other numbers suggest current market price offers limited upside in terms of possible takeover premium,” Jernej Kozlevcar, who helps manage 530 million euros at Triglav Asset Management Co.
 Possible buyers may be “telecommunication companies, which have targeted the region and have made some takeovers already in the past,” he said.
 Nor was the provincial government, which announced in February a proposal to protect Quebec companies from hostile takeovers, a factor in the deal, he said.
 Health-care deals are driving takeovers to their fastest start to the year since 2007, with industry players including Novartis AG, Pfizer Inc, and Mylan Inc.
 AutoNavi shareholders still need to vote on the takeover.
 and 1988 takeover of Kraft Inc, milestones in transforming the tobacco company into a consumer products conglomerate, has died.
 The discussions were first reported April 20 by London’s Sunday Times, which said New York-based Pfizer made a tentative approach about a takeover valuing AstraZeneca at more than 60 billion pounds ($101 billion).
 would mark the biggest takeover in Canadian history.
 “It demonstrates that there’s a real appetite for companies to do transformational transactions and I’m hopeful that this will be the beginning of a resurgence in M&A” Valeant Chief Executive Officer Mike Pearson has been shifting his emphasis from generic drugs and expanding in opthalmology, dermatology and dentistry, most recently with its $87 billion takeover of Bausch & Lomb last year.
 The event was moved to Belgium after Russia’s takeover of Crimea last month prompted G-7 leaders to cancel a meeting initially planned in Sochi.
 to drop its 664 trillion rupiah ($58 billion) takeover of PT Bank Danamon Indonesia, as it sought reciprocity from Singapore for expansion by Indonesian banks including Jakarta-based Mandiri.
 this week proposed the biggest such deal yet, a $987 billion takeover of AstraZeneca Plc that would move the largest US.
 The Liberal website also promises support for small- and medium-sized businesses and the province’s forestry sector, and says a Liberal government would protect company head offices in Montreal by allowing a provincial fund to buy as much as 10 percent of companies facing hostile takeover bids.
 “The full takeover of Localch has long been an issue for us,” Swisscom spokesman Carsten Roetz said by phone today.
 The firm has advised on corporate finance deals such as Aer Lingus Group Plc’s initial public offering in 2006 and the 2009 takeover of Eircom Group by Singapore Technologies Telemedia Pte.
April 23 (Bloomberg) -- Australand Property Group rejected a takeover offer by its biggest shareholder Stockland after the bid valued the Australian property trust 2 percent lower than its market capitalization.
 Dexus Property Group, Australia’s biggest listed office landlord, and partner Canada Pension Plan Investment Board won a takeover battle for an office fund managed by Commonwealth Bank of Australia when GPT said in January it wouldn’t raise its offer.
 Australand shares already reflect a “significant takeover premium” and if investor price expectations were too high, Stockland would sell its stake, the firm said in a separate statement today.
 16, has been shifting spending to its Coles supermarket chain it bought in 2007 in Australia’s largest corporate takeover.
 McLeod will be assessing takeover targets in a new role from June.
 Wesfarmers has as much as A$5 billion of cash and debt that can be used for takeovers, according to Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit.
 “Putin trusts him more than anyone else” Starting in 2004, when Putin named him Rosneft’s chairman, Sechin orchestrated the takeover of the main assets of Yukos, the country’s biggest oil producer at the time, according to Khodorkovsky and former Yukos managers Bruce Misamore and Alexander Temerko.
 Having become Rosneft’s CEO in May 2012, Sechin last year steered the company’s $55 billion takeover of TNK-BP, a joint venture between BP and a group of Russian billionaires.
 proposed buying it in what would be the industry’s biggest-ever takeover.
 slid 86 percent to 53 pence after saying takeover talks with companies potentially interested in the rutile producer had come to an end.
 Only time will tell whether it’s a good deal” Southeast Asia’s second-largest lender offered HK$384 billion ($5 billion) yesterday for Wing Hang, the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank in 13 years.
 Bid Valuations Wing Hang Bank’s investors will be entitled to a dividend of as much as 46 Hong Kong cents per share if the takeover is approved by stockholders, according to yesterday’s statement.
 Before taking into account any external funding, the takeover will lower OCBC’s common equity Tier 1 capital adequacy ratio to 11 percent from 145 percent, the lender said.
 The takeover would be the largest of a Hong Kong bank since DBS Group Holdings Ltd, OCBC’s largest competitor in Singapore, offered $53 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 Buffett has said the arrangement, in which he provided financing while allowing partners to run the business, could be a model for future takeovers.
 Sales climbed 57 percent to 14 billion euros, boosted by the takeover of light-source maker Cymer Inc.
 Through acquisitions -- including the $985 billion takeover of Cole Real Estate Investments Inc.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Sotheby’s is misusing an anti-takeover defense to hinder Third Point LLC’s proxy fight to add directors to the auction house’s board, a lawyer for the $145 billion hedge fund run by Dan Loeb argued.
 Delaware Chancery Court Judge Donald Parsons’s ruling on whether such anti-takeover measures can be extended to proxy fights by shareholder activists will have wide impact given Delaware’s status as the corporate home to more than half the publicly traded companies in the US.
 Seize Control Sotheby’s officials defended the poison pill in the past, saying it was “designed to limit the ability of any person or group to seize control of the company without appropriately compensating all Sotheby’s shareholders” The company’s decision to set up an anti-takeover defense wasn’t designed to weaken shareholders’ rights to elect directors in a proxy fight, William Savitt, one of Sotheby’s lawyers, told Parsons today.
 Such defenses are designed to make takeovers prohibitively expensive.
 Other Delaware judges have found the 10 percent trigger on the takeover measure to be “garden variety” and not unduly restrictive, the lawyer said.
 ‘Personal Animus’ Sotheby’s directors’ move to create the anti-takeover defense was “driven by personal animus” against shareholder activists like Loeb who “challenge management,” the fund’s lawyer added.
 At issue is Comcast’s plan as part of the takeover to divest 3 million subscribers, which Charter is eager to acquire, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Charter urged Time Warner Cable investors to vote down a takeover by Comcast last month.
 In Georgia, we have some concerns that he’d try to create a land bridge in Ukraine” Rogers said lawmakers on his panel are reviewing Defense Department and CIA reports issued before the Crimea takeover -- “one of them got it completely wrong; one at least laid out the scenario” -- to find out what was missed.
 tightened takeover rules following Kraft Foods Inc’s hostile bid for candy maker Cadbury Plc, the country has created incentives for drugmakers to increase research and capital investments.
 takeover, the nation would become the domicile of the world’s biggest pharmaceutical company and receive a $100 billion boost to its economy, Pfizer Chief Executive Officer Ian Read said on a conference call with reporters yesterday.
 In 2005, it passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 In the UK, mergers and acquisitions are largely dictated by rules implemented by the Takeover Panel in 2011 after unidentified bidders complicated Kraft’s takeover of Cadbury a year earlier.
 Enterprise Act, ministers can only block a takeover on public-interest grounds if it affects national security, media plurality or the stability of the UK.
 While Pfizer Inc’s 588 billion-pound ($989 billion) takeover offer for AstraZeneca Plc shows big deals are “back on the table,” Sanofi’s pipeline of experimental drugs means the Paris-based drugmaker is in “pretty good shape,” Viehbacher said on a call with reporters today.
 is preparing a takeover offer to fight off an unsolicited bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 said Newmont ended discussions about a takeover, which would have combined the world’s two largest gold producers.
 David Jones, whose board has recommended a A$215 billion takeover offer from South African retailer Woolworths Holdings Ltd.
 Blackstone has been the most active alternative-asset manager so far this year, committing or deploying $74 billion of equity to transactions, including about $2 billion to the takeover of industrial-products maker Gates Global Inc.
 He left when Glencore International Plc completed a $29 billion all-share takeover of the company last year.
 The purchase would give Tamedia the localch site, which provides phone number information and is at the “heart of the planned takeover,” according to the company’s April 17 statement.
 Late yesterday, Bill Ackman and Valeant Pharmaceuticals revealed their plan to go after Allergan in an unsolicited cash-and-stock takeover offer for the maker of Botox for even more billions.
 The state’s vocal and visible participation in the sale marks the first time it has intervened in the affairs of a private company not in need of a rescue or the subject of a hostile takeover.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA must give up some wireless frequencies in Germany should it gain approval for its planned takeover of Dutch carrier Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit, according to the Federal Network Agency.
 Since spending $71 billion on Massey Energy in the industry’s most-expensive takeover just as steelmaking coal prices peaked in 2011, Alpha has failed to turn a profit as Chinese demand slowed and Australian rivals boosted supply.
 The acquisition valued Massey at 252 times its Ebitda, more than any coal takeover of at least $1 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 consumers restraining discretionary spending since it was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout put together by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital at the peak of the last takeover boom in 2008.
 Kellogg, which makes Rice Krispies, Pop Tarts and other packaged foods, saw a surge in options trading earlier this month, raising speculation that the company could become a takeover target.
 Siemens is considering both takeovers and partnerships, according to Peter Weckesser, head of the company’s value services unit.
 Telfer said March 25 that he didn’t expect anyone to top his company’s hostile bid for Osisko as rival producers remain deal-shy following writedowns on past takeovers.
 The provincial government, which announced in February a proposal to protect Quebec companies from hostile takeovers, also wasn’t a factor in the deal, the fund said.
 “The involvement of the Caisse allows Osisko to preserve its future and gives it substantial means to resist other takeover offers that would deprive Quebec of an important head office,” Quebec Finance Minister Nicolas Marceau said yesterday at a press conference in Montreal amid the provincial election campaign.
 RBS has said it would be open to takeover offers for its US.
 Head Offices The Liberal website promises support for small- and medium-sized businesses and the province’s forestry sector, and says a Liberal government would protect company head offices in Montreal by allowing a provincial fund to buy as much as 10 percent of companies facing hostile takeover bids.
 drugmaker may be a takeover target.
 identified annual savings of $1 billion as part of a proposed merger in which Barrick was to offer Newmont shareholders a takeover premium of 13 percent, two people with knowledge of the matter said April 19.
 Standstill Agreement Speaking after the company’s annual meeting in London, the CEO said July’s expiration of a standstill agreement barring BAT from increasing its stake in Reynolds without the approval of Reynolds’s board “doesn’t change anything” “You would always go to the board, we’d never go to Reynolds with a hostile takeover,” the CEO said.
 in less than two months without raising many eyebrows at the Botox-maker he’s now targeting in a hostile takeover bid.
 Making the takeover bid with Ackman’s 10 percent stake gives Valeant “a running start on the vote, and a bit of a block position,” Ubben said.
 Allergan confirmed in a separate statement today that it received an unsoliticed takeover proposal from Valeant.
 Sprint Chief Financial Officer Joe Euteneuer and Treasurer Greg Block met with six banks to ensure the lenders would be ready with financing structures when Sprint decides to pursue a takeover, said three of the people, asking not to named because the discussions are private.
 Barnes & Noble also said in February it isn’t considering a $22-a-share takeover proposal New York-based G Asset Management LLC made to the company that month.
 Bid Dropped America Movil SAB, which withdrew a takeover bid for KPN last year after disagreeing on the price and corporate governance, in the past few months has decreased its stake in the Dutch company to 248 percent on April 16, from 298 percent at the time the Mexican company announced its intention for the offer.
 Family Dollar has been buoyed by takeover speculation since Peltz made an unsolicited bid in 2011 in an attempt to attract other suitors.
 Dollar General, one of Family Dollar’s closest rivals, has itself been a takeover target.
 Under Chief Executive Officer Louis Vachon, the Montreal-based bank has increased its wealth-management business through takeovers, bolstered energy investment banking in Western Canada and won more mandates in corporate lending while leading its rivals in per-share profit growth.
 Announced oil-and-gas takeovers involving Canadian companies amounted to $158 billion this year, almost triple the amount from a year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Germany’s second biggest bank may become a potential takeover target in the next two to three years, Deutsche Bank said in a note.
 The fund wants the company to refocus on that core and improve return on invested capital, after a series of acquisitions in recent years, including the $125 billion takeover of Safety-Kleen Inc, which expanded into parts cleaning and oil re-refining.
 It was Glasenberg who led Glencore’s 2013 takeover of Xstrata Plc, the biggest in mining.
 in 2006, also the largest gold takeover.
 There was also the C$71 billion ($65 billion) takeover of copper miner Equinox Minerals Ltd.
 The sale completed the final condition by Chinese regulators for Glencore’s $29 billion takeover of Xstrata Plc.
 “Expectations tend to rise that Orix would buy back its shares unless they deploy their capital otherwise, so they will likely continue with mergers and acquisitions” Among Orix’s biggest takeovers was the purchase of the Robeco Groep NV asset-management unit from Rabobank Groep last year for about $26 billion.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Investors considering takeover offers for Empresas La Polar SA have told the Chilean department-store operator it must finish a debt restructuring before talks can take place, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Chilean regulators would block a takeover by local department stores because of competition concerns, he said.
 Pfizer, which paid $64 billion to buy Wyeth in 2009 in the biggest pharmaceutical takeover, is considering its AstraZeneca bid options after the UK.
 A deal to sell a controlling stake in its credit card operations to Itau Unibanco Holding SA fell apart when the Brazilian bank decided to focus on a takeover of Chile’s Corpbanca SA.
 That pipeline, which could get a boost from results to be reported at the American Society of Clinical Oncology meeting in May, was cited by Pfizer Chief Executive Officer Ian Read as key to his company’s $987 billion takeover bid.
 Put simply, the Fed model shows that takeovers are attractive as long as corporate earnings yields are higher than bond yields.
 While takeover interest is always a boon for the target companies, investors also appear to approve of the risks that acquiring companies are taking.
 With his $457 billion bid for Allergan Inc, Valeant Chief Executive Officer Mike Pearson is pulling the credit rating of Canada’s most indebted junk bond issuer closer to investment grade while attempting the biggest takeover in the country’s history.
 sanctions were imposed in the wake of the Crimean takeover.
April 9 (Bloomberg) -- Could Warren Buffett use his elephant gun to bag a tiger named Tony? Kellogg Co, the more than century-old maker of breakfast cereal and Pop Tarts, surged the most since 2009 last week amid speculation it might become the industry’s next takeover target.
 More than 25,000 bullish options contracts for the maker of Special K cereal changed hands that day, 45 times the four-week average, as investors speculated it could be the subject of takeover activity.
 While it may make more sense for Nestle to buy General Mills because of the companies’ cereals joint venture, a takeover of Kellogg instead can’t be ruled out, Yarbrough said.
 And there’s a precedent for big food company takeovers in Heinz.
 The discussions were first reported yesterday by London’s Sunday Times, whose unnamed bank and industry sources said New York-based Pfizer made a tentative approach about a takeover valuing AstraZeneca at more than 60 billion pounds ($101 billion).
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- For WellCare Health Plans Inc, Medicare and Medicaid are the ticket to a takeover.
 The $28 billion company has also been without a permanent chief executive officer since November, making it more vulnerable to a takeover, said Stifel Financial Corp, which estimated the provider could get as much as a 34 percent premium in a sale.
 “With WellCare, you can get both Medicare and Medicaid” Carter estimated that WellCare could get at least $80 a share in a takeover, a 26 percent premium from yesterday’s close.
 locks in the year’s second-biggest loan for its takeover of chipmaker LSI Corp.
 Leveraged loans are booming as the value of takeovers in the US.
 The takeover was the largest of a hospital company since 2006, when HCA Holdings Inc.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- BG Group Plc rose to the highest in more than three months in London after analysts said the UK’s third-largest gas company could become a takeover target after the chief executive officer’s surprise resignation.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- The largest proposed acquisition in drug-industry history may spark further deals as AstraZeneca Plc tries to sort out alternatives to Pfizer Inc’s unsolicited 588-billion-pound ($987 billion) takeover approach.
 takeover law, New York-based Pfizer has a month to decide whether to bid for AstraZeneca or to pull out.
 Pfizer is considering its options, said Andrew Widger, a spokesman for the company, when asked if Pfizer would consider going directly to AstraZeneca shareholders with a hostile takeover offer.
 And Time Warner Cable Inc, the target of its $45 billion takeover bid, reduced customer losses to the fewest in four years.
 Asked if Etihad might lift its holding in Aer Lingus, Ryanair CEO Michael O’Leary said the Gulf carrier had “bought a lot of rubbish, and increasing their stake in Aer Lingus is consistent with that” Ryanair is seeking a full takeover of the smaller Irish airline, saying it will collapse without a change of direction.
 It bought Dutch bank Rabobank Groep’s Robeco Groep NV asset-management unit for 19 billion euros ($26 billion) last year, its largest takeover.
 The deal, larger than KKR’s 1989 takeover of RJR Nabisco Inc, the biggest at the time, left Energy Future struggling to cut debt when the financial crisis, coupled with booming shale gas production, sent natural gas prices down starting in 2008.
April 18 (Bloomberg) -- FPT Corp, Vietnam’s largest publicly traded telecommunications and software company, aims to complete two takeovers this year as it seeks to boost international sales, Chairman Truong Gia Binh said.
 in the biggest takeover of a Hong Kong lender since 2001.
 While the $18 billion company is often pegged as a takeover target for soft drink makers as a way to reboot their slowing growth, it’s too early to determine whether this new product will be successful enough to draw an offer from Coca-Cola, Sanford C.
 last month, has been speculated as a takeover candidate for at least three years, in part because of its rapid growth from selling K-cup single-serve coffee pods and machines.
 It took three years for the world’s largest beverage company to turn its stake in Honest Tea into a takeover in March 2011, data complied by Bloomberg show.
 Coke Potential For Keurig, the bullish bets now are mostly because of its partnership with Coca-Cola, rather than expectations of a takeover, according to Sachin Shah, a special-situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried.
 “If they can afford such expensive takeovers with WhatsApp and Oculus, then they’re doing well,” Galliker said in an April 17 interview.
 Growing Share Independent investment banks like Moelis, with a focus on takeover advice and few other business lines, offer a way to profit from a pickup in dealmaking, said Kenneth Leon, an analyst who covers the financial industry for S&P Capital IQ.
 Earnings Risk Still, the independent banks lack sources of revenue that can offset a decline in takeover activity, according to Erik Gordon at the University of Michigan.
 of South Africa is using a $2 billion takeover of Australia’s David Jones Ltd.
 The purchase is Australia’s largest retail takeover since 2007, when Wesfarmers Ltd.
 Montebourg first dismissed the story, saying Alstom had been the subject of takeover rumors for years.
 placed the lender on its sanctions list because of Russia’s takeover of Crimea.
 A second round of $20 billion came in January 2009 after Merrill’s losses in its final quarter as an independent firm surpassed $15 billion, raising doubts about Bank of America’s stability if the takeover proceeded.
 Barrick was to offer Newmont shareholders a takeover premium of 13 percent, the people said.
April 3 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Lufthansa AG said curbs on airline mergers are limiting its ability to target emerging markets and channeling takeover activity into service operations where investment rules are less stringent.
 Lufthansa has found a partial outlet for its takeover ambitions in service businesses such as food and engineering, where the company is one of the industry’s biggest players after many other carriers outsourced non-flying activities.
 “It’s not a good start to the chairmanship” Swan Song Barrick and Newmont identified annual savings of $1 billion in their talks this month about an all-stock transaction, in which Barrick would offer Newmont shareholders a takeover premium of 13 percent, two people with knowledge of the matter said April 19.
 It bought Dutch bank Rabobank Groep’s Robeco Groep NV asset-management unit for 19 billion euros ($26 billion) last year, its largest takeover.
 KKR’s $313 billion takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1989, by far the largest buyout of its era, barely escaped bankruptcy in 1990 and dealt KKR a loss of about $816 million on its $36 billion equity investment, according to a confidential KKR marketing document obtained by Bloomberg News.
 German-born Reitzle brings strategic merger experience following a successful $14 billion takeover as CEO of Linde AG.
 Playing Peacemaker At Continental, Reitzle helped calm tempers and smooth the relationship with competitor Schaeffler AG when that company attempted a hostile takeover in 2008, according to a person familiar with him who asked not to be named.
 “It means we’re not going to see a takeover imminently,” Chen said.
 to discuss a possible takeover.
 Hochtief declined to make a full takeover offer after being pressed to do so by independent directors on Leighton’s board, the Australian company said last month.
 has imposed financial sanctions on Russian officials, including billionaires close to Putin, following the country’s takeover of Crimea last month.
 At the same time, smaller rivals are scooping up assets and building their presence as drug takeovers surged to a five-year high, led by Actavis Plc’s $21 billion bid for Forest Laboratories Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “We’d argue that Bristol-Myers would make much better sense to deploy $100 billion” Overseas Cash Pfizer also could look at Shire, a long-speculated takeover candidate that has tax advantages because it’s based in Ireland, Shah of Albert Fried said.
 News of the discussions between Pfizer and AstraZeneca come as corporate takeovers in the pharmaceutical industry rose to more than $91 billion in the 12 months ended April 1, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Dublin-based Shire has VP20621, acquired in its $42 billion takeover of ViroPharma Inc.
 drugmaker proposed buying AstraZeneca Plc for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion) in what would rank as the industry’s biggest-ever takeover, surpassing Pfizer’s $64 billion purchase of Wyeth in 2009.
 takeover rules.
 The average premium for pharmaceutical takeovers of at least $1 billion was 30 percent over the past five years, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “When it comes to individual company takeovers, there are rules and procedures that are well established.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Cosan SA has an uphill climb to win regulatory approval of its $3 billion takeover of Brazilian train operator ALL America Latina Logistica SA.
 Biggest Premium The takeover proposal by Cosan unit Rumo values ALL shares at 10184 reais, 22 percent above the closing price on April 17.
 The rail operator has climbed 18 percent in the two months since the takeover bid was announced while Cosan shares are up 5 percent.
 “That’s an extremely attractive platform to someone who wants to become significantly larger and immediately obtain global scale in generics” Bigger Deals After Pfizer Inc’s $987 billion bid for AstraZeneca Plc and Valeant’s about $50 billion proposal for Allergan this month, bigger deals such as a takeover of Mylan are becoming more conceivable, Heupel of Thrivent said.
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- Orix Corp, Japan’s most acquisitive financial firm, plans to spend 150 billion yen ($15 billion) on takeovers around the world in the next 12 months, President Makoto Inoue said.
 The Japanese company completed its largest takeover last year, when it bought Rabobank Groep’s Robeco Groep NV asset-management unit for 19 billion euros ($26 billion).
 In 2005, it passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 In 2005, it passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 “In Asia there’s going to be incredible growth, and food security is going to become increasingly important” That may turn Australia’s biggest beef producer, Australian Agricultural, into a takeover target, Pathak said.
 Australia in November rejected a planned $2 billion takeover of GrainCorp Ltd, the country’s biggest crop handler, by Archer-Daniels-Midland Co.
 In 2003, Ressler and his partners started investing a private-equity fund -- their first of what would become five buyout vehicles -- as a way to supplement their earnings from credit with takeovers that appeared attractive.
 With the cement takeovers, buyers may “see a recovery and want to get ahead of it,” Jack Kasprzak, analyst at BB&T Corp, said in a phone interview from Richmond.
 assets that will be divested from the merger, said Osburn, who also sees Vulcan as a potential takeover target as the industry consolidates.
 A “three-way alliance may be on the agenda at some point” after Hapag-Lloyd’s planned takeover of the container-shipping operations of Valparaiso, Chile-based Cia.
 to create the world’s largest drugmaker fell apart in 2000 in a takeover battle won by Pfizer Inc.
 Warner-Lambert was purchased by Pfizer in a hostile takeover that left American Home with a breakup fee of $18 billion.
 Platinum Equity LLC, a Beverly Hills, California-based buyout firm raised a $262 million payment-in-kind bond to pay itself a dividend a week after closing on its takeover of a rental unit from Volvo AB in February.
 It’s not easy for investors to have conviction on this” Tech Reversal Technology companies had led gains in Asian equities during the past 12 months amid speculation that growing demand for social networking, e-commerce and online games would boost earnings and fuel takeovers in the industry.
 In Russia, the car market was on the decline even before the country’s takeover of Crimea and massing of troops on Ukraine’s borders led to the biggest crisis between Russia and NATO countries since the end of the Cold War.
 Liberty offered to buy Barnes & Noble in 2011 for about $1 billion, spurring speculation that a takeover battle would emerge.
 16, has been shifting spending to its Coles supermarket chain it bought in 2007 in Australia’s largest corporate takeover.
 McLeod will be assessing takeover targets in a new role from June.
 Wesfarmers has as much as A$5 billion of cash and debt that can be used for takeovers, according to Bank of America’s Merrill Lynch unit.
 scrapped a proposed takeover of the company citing regulatory uncertainty.
 Shale Boom The buyout, larger even than KKR’s 1989 takeover of RJR Nabisco Inc, left Energy Future struggling to reduce debt when the financial crisis, coupled with booming shale production, sent gas prices down starting in 2008.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Remy Cointreau SA surged in early Paris trading on speculation about a possible takeover.
 The arrangement could help Philadelphia-based Comcast appease critics of the $45 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable by reducing the combined company’s market share to less than 30 percent.
 Lawmakers and antitrust authorities shouldn’t be fooled either” Vocal Critic Time Warner Cable also noted the benefits of today’s deal for the larger takeover process.
 It also potentially assuages a vocal critic of the Time Warner Cable takeover: Charter itself.
 slowed subscriber losses at its TV business last quarter, making Comcast Corp’s proposed $45 billion takeover look like a smarter bet.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- The value of takeovers announced in 2014 hit the $1 trillion mark yesterday, reaching that level at the fastest pace in seven years.
 Those companies could pressure rivals to strike their own takeovers or risk missing out as the industry recalibrates, said Mark Lubkeman, a senior partner at the Boston Consulting Group.
 Pfizer’s proposal to acquire AstraZeneca for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion), which was rejected yesterday by the British drugmaker, would rank as the industry’s biggest-ever takeover.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Kellogg Co, the maker of breakfast cereals, Pop Tarts and other packaged food, rose the most in almost five years in New York after options trading signaled possible takeover activity.
 “This is absolutely the kind of options action that could signal takeover activity,” said Christopher Rich, head options strategist at JonesTrading Institutional Services LLC in Chicago.
 While it remains the subject of takeover speculation, no transaction was announced.
 In 2005, it passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 is preparing a takeover offer for the maker of artificial hips and knees.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Bourbon SA Chairman Jacques de Chateauvieux said his proposed takeover offer that gets under way today valuing the French shipowner at 18 billion euros ($25 billion) will prove key to forging future partnerships in Asia.
 “With the new structure, the Repsol Group reinforces the management of its business unit so that, following the financial compensation agreement with Argentina, the company has the optimum structure to generate new growth opportunities -- organic” or through takeovers, Repsol said in an e-mailed statement.
 AT&T Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson called the Time Warner Cable takeover an “industry-redefining deal” Big cable became an even more troubling threat in the first quarter as market share gains shifted away from the phone companies.
 in 2007 in Australia’s biggest takeover, and is now worth more than Tesco Plc.
 of the lease of an undeveloped coal deposit called MDL-162 in January was the company’s first acquisition since completing the Coles takeover.
 lawmakers today over his takeover bid for AstraZeneca Plc.
 “But he seemed to me to be a Brit who’d spent too much time in America” Labour leader Ed Miliband, who has opposed the takeover, told Sky News television there are “too many unanswered questions” about the deal.
 Soriot warned that the disruption caused by a takeover could delay drugs getting to market.
 company’s takeover plans.
 Immelt has responded to French concerns that the offer from GE represents a takeover, pledging that the Alstom brand “lives on” and characterizing the deal as an alliance.
 Oil Search Ltd, Papua New Guinea’s largest oil producer, extended gains for a second day to touch a record amid speculation it’s a potential takeover target.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- Club Mediterranee SA, the French operator of holiday resorts, rose to the highest in more than five years after funds associated with Italy’s Andrea Bonomi said they may make a takeover bid rivaling a pending offer.
 “Mediaset is ready to support its Spanish unit regarding DTS but no decisions have been taken since we haven’t yet received any official notifications from Telefonica or Prisa” about the takeover offer, Chief Financial Officer Marco Giordani said on a conference.
 to Facebook Inc, takeover targets just got cheaper.
 The slide has made frequently mentioned takeover possibilities such as restaurant review site Yelp Inc.
 Private companies also may become takeover targets, as the down market makes the prospect of an initial public offering less attractive, said Rice of Needham.
May 3 (Bloomberg) -- Dan Loeb’s Third Point LLC lost its bid to delay Sotheby’s annual meeting so a judge could scrutinize the effect of an anti-takeover defense on the fund’s effort to win seats on the auction house’s board.
 The ruling is a setback for Loeb’s claims that Sotheby’s directors created the poison pill in a novel effort to hamper the activist investor’s proxy fight for three board seats rather than to prevent a takeover.
 joined 3G Capital last year in a $233 billion takeover of ketchup maker HJ Heinz Co, said he’d welcome more deals with the buyout firm.
 Berkshire doesn’t pay a dividend, leaving the billionaire and his deputies to look for capital-spending opportunities and takeovers.
 Energy Deals Berkshire Hathaway Energy, led by Greg Abel, will have more opportunities to pursue takeovers, Buffett said.
 climbed 28 percent to $8264 after a Financial Times report that the company is preparing a takeover offer for Smith & Nephew Plc.
 The seller of orthopedic devices has retained investment bankers and is working on putting together financing for a takeover offer, the newspaper reported, citing people familiar with the matter.
 That would make it the industry’s most expensive takeover on record, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 At that price, an acquirer would be paying a record takeover multiple, according to data compiled by Bloomberg on aerospace and defense deals larger than $1 billion.
 Still, the “heavy lifting” to integrate Goodrich after completing the takeover two years ago is mostly done, so it’s positioned to consider another large aerospace deal, Reiner of Oppenheimer said.
 Once the potential of its fields are proven, the company may make an attractive takeover target for other energy companies, said one of the people, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The Huiyuan deal, which was blocked by Chinese regulators over concerns about competition, would have been the largest foreign takeover of a Chinese company at the time.
 reached a friendly takeover deal.
 agreed April 16 to a C$37 billion takeover by Canadian competitors Yamana Gold Inc.
 The Solna, Sweden-based company last week rejected a second takeover attempt by Mylan Inc.
 rejected Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s unsolicited takeover proposal, saying the offer “substantially undervalues” the maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment.
 Allergan was said to prepare a takeover offer of Shire Plc according to a April 28 report by Reuters.
 over the latter’s takeover bid, City AM.
 Montebourg last week signed into effect a decree giving the government the power to block some foreign takeovers, including deals in the energy industry.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- WestSide Corp, the target of a A$178 million ($166 million) takeover bid from China’s Landbridge Group Co, said it’s in talks with companies that may lead to a higher offer for the coal-seam gas explorer.
 economic sanctions over his country’s takeover of Crimea from Ukraine.
 The takeover was the second-largest in the bank’s 196-year history, trailing only the C$41 billion acquisition of Marshall & Ilsley Corp.
 American Realty, led by Chief Executive Officer Nicholas Schorsch, has amassed single-tenant buildings leased to businesses such as drugstores and fast-food restaurants through acquisitions, including the $985 billion takeover of Cole Real Estate Investments Inc.
 “If anything, we would accelerate those products” Pfizer’s proposed takeover is facing skepticism from UK.
 Crude, gasoline and diesel have probably peaked for a long time” Ukraine’s east is slipping out of the government’s grasp as separatists expand their takeovers of official buildings and the US.
 Orix plans to spend 150 billion yen on takeovers around the world in the next year, Inoue said in an interview on April 8.
 Immelt responded to French concerns that the offer from Fairfield, Connecticut-based GE represents a takeover, pledging that the Alstom brand “lives on” and characterizing the deal as an alliance.
 Even beyond taxes, New York-based Pfizer’s proposed takeover has prompted objections from US.
 The proposed takeover is facing skepticism from UK.
 A takeover could distract London-based AstraZeneca from advancing its pipeline of experimental drugs, and even more so were Pfizer to make a hostile bid, Soriot said.
 “Any merger of this magnitude is disruptive and that’s why we would want to discuss strategy, the operating model and how we would go about merging these companies, if we ever get to this” Pfizer would try to protect AstraZeneca’s most valuable products in a takeover and wouldn’t jeopardize the pipeline, Read said to the Science and Technology committee today.
 takeover rules bars it from making a bid for six months.
 “Since the takeover, however, Santander’s lending in minority neighborhoods has declined precipitously while its lending in predominantly white neighborhoods has grown substantially,” the city said in the complaint.
 company’s offer for AstraZeneca, amid growing public and political concern that a takeover would mean job losses and cuts to research.
 Business Secretary Vince Cable said Pfizer Inc’s bid for AstraZeneca Plc raised questions of “overriding national interest,” as the opposition Labour Party stepped up its rejection of the proposed takeover.
 Cable later told reporters that reviewing rules on intervening in takeovers on public interest grounds was an option that the government was looking at.
 “He has become a cheerleader for Pfizer’s takeover when instead he should be championing AstraZeneca’s long-term plan,” Miliband said.
 The prime minister responded that day by describing these as “robust assurances,” and saying that “any merger is a decision for both companies” Miliband, in contrast, told the BBC that Pfizer’s promises were “pretty weak” Cable said that “obviously there is a lot of small print to study the question about how these obligations are binding” ‘Substantive Assessment’ Miliband wrote a letter to Cameron yesterday to set out his concerns, saying a more thorough review is needed to determine if the takeover is in Britain’s economic interest.
 “We need a more substantive assessment of whether this takeover is in the national economic interest before the UK.
 Future takeovers should face “a stronger public interest test,” he said.
 We engaged early with both companies precisely to avoid previous governments’ failures in these types of situation” ‘Not Enough’ The debate, a year before the general election, has echoes of a previous pre-poll takeover battle.
 In January 2010, the then-Conservative opposition used Kraft Foods Group Inc’s takeover of candy maker Cadbury Plc to portray a Labour government that was out of touch with the British people.
 bank takeover announced this year.
 That takeover is still pending after more than 18 months of scrutiny by regulators of controls at Buffalo, New York-based M&T.
 InterContinental Hotels Group Plc rallied 34 percent after a report that it rejected a takeover bid from the US.
 The offer is subject to Baosteel and Aurizon gaining acceptance of 50 percent of shareholders and approval from Australia’s foreign takeovers regulator.
 Tyson’s $62 billion bid, which trumped Pilgrim’s, already represents one of the richest valuations for a major takeover in the food industry, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 High Margins A takeover of Hillshire would give Tyson or Pilgrim’s high-margin consumer goods that would help them diversify from the cyclical, lower-margin business of selling commodities, according to Ken Shea, an analyst for Bloomberg Industries in Skillman, New Jersey.
 The potential tax implications of a takeover “largely dissipate” after June, he wrote.
 Meanwhile, Hillshire offered 17 times Ebitda for Pinnacle, which would have been the most expensive food takeover larger than $5 billion since the financial crisis, the data show.
 (HRL) too, though the chili maker doesn’t have the financial wherewithal for a takeover that large, he said.
 Since then, the shares have slipped 10 percent as it tries to convince Allergan, the maker of Botox wrinkle injections, to accept its takeover bid.
 “The clock is running on these guys,” she said, because August will mark one year since Valeant closed on its $87 billion takeover of eye-care company Bausch & Lomb Holdings Inc.
 producer issued $500 million of higher-ranking notes this week to extinguish debt with “near-term maturities” The sale matches its biggest since 2011, when Alpha Natural bought Massey Energy in the industry’s most-expensive takeover just as steelmaking coal prices peaked.
 expect short-term weakness in the baht, the coup may provide certainty in a market that has endured 12 military takeovers since 1932, Mark Williams, chief Asia economist at Capital Economics in London, said by phone.
 ‘Economic Standstill’ While yesterday’s military takeover “probably helped prevent further bloodshed and full-blown political confrontation, the problem is that the uncertainty that follows may lead to an economic standstill,” said Kelvin Tay, chief investment officer of South Asia Pacific at UBS Wealth Management, which oversees $2 trillion.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- South Africa’s benchmark stocks index rose above 50,000 for the first time, led by SABMiller Plc, the world’s second-biggest brewer, and Business Connexion Group, a computer-services company targeted for a takeover.
 Prime Minister David Cameron’s government signaled it won’t stand in the way of Pfizer Inc’s takeover bid for AstraZeneca Plc, rebuffing cross-party calls to intervene to safeguard jobs and the country’s science base.
 government regards the potential takeover bid as a matter for the respective boards and shareholders of the two companies,” the prime minister’s office said in an e-mailed statement.
 Business Secretary Vince Cable, a member of Cameron’s Liberal Democratic junior coalition partner, told the BBC the letter from Pfizer was “encouraging, positive” Critics of Pfizer’s bid for AstraZeneca cite Kraft Foods Inc’s takeover of Britain’s Cadbury Plc in 2010.
 After the takeover was completed, Kraft announced it had decided to close the plant by 2011.
 A panel of lawmakers said Kraft damaged its reputation with its handling of the takeover.
 “After the way in which Labour mishandled Kraft’s takeover of Cadbury, we’re very much aware of it” Pfizer’s takeover bid has become a political football as the parties highlight their differences less than a month before local elections and elections to the European Parliament.
 company’s bid for Britain’s AstraZeneca Plc raised questions of “overriding national interest,” as the opposition Labour Party stepped up its opposition to the proposed takeover.
 The deal was structured as a takeover of American Wind Capital Co, while including no debt, liabilities or employees, which will be transfered to a separate company, Annapolis, Maryland-based HASI said in a statement today.
 “Earnings growth expectations are lofty and may not be realistic given increasing competition in the industry” Technology companies have led gains in Asian shares during the past 12 months on speculation growing demand for social networking, e-commerce and online games will boost earnings and drive takeovers in the industry.
 scrapped its takeover of the company.
 Louisiana-Pacific called off its C$951 million takeover of the Vancouver-based company after regulators said further asset sales were necessary.
 “Most 90-year-old men are gone soon enough” Berkshire has fended off questions for years about who might replace Buffett at the top of the $300 billion company he built through takeovers and stock picks.
 Buffett relies on the CEOs of Berkshire’s dozens of operating businesses to handle day-to-day decisions, leaving him time to pursue takeovers and invest in stocks and bonds.
 Read faced members of Parliament who are concerned Pfizer will cut jobs and close facilities, which has been its pattern in previous takeovers.
 Read, answering questions from the committee, wouldn’t be drawn into laying out Pfizer’s end game for the takeover.
 The suit claims Porsche manipulated Volkswagen AG shares in 2008 as part of a takeover bid and seeks about 213 million euros ($292 million).
 The takeover is expected to boost Atos’s earnings per share as early as the first year, and by more than 10 percent within two years of integration.
 ‘Quite Resilient’ Thailand’s benchmark SET Index of stocks rose 03 percent to 1,39273 at the close in Bangkok today, gaining for the first time since the military takeover.
 About Bouygues The failed bid has turned Bouygues Telecom, France’s third-largest mobile-phone company, into a takeover target itself, with Iliad open to discussing a purchase of the business, people familiar with the matter said in March.
 Montebourg this week signed a decree giving the government the power to block foreign takeovers in what it considers strategic industries, as politicians debate over General Electric Co’s $17 billion bid for Alstom SA’s energy units and a competing Siemens AG offer.
 To finance the Scania takeover, VW plans to sell new preferred shares to raise 2 billion euros, issue hybrid capital worth as much as 3 billion euros and spend 2 billion euros from reserves.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc rejected Pfizer Inc’s sweetened takeover proposal, saying the 626 billion-pound ($1056 billion) offer fails to appreciate the value of the promising medicines under development by the UK’s second-biggest drugmaker.
 takeover rules.
 Kmart merged with Sears Roebuck in 2005 in a $123 billion takeover -- a deal that Lampert said would create a company with enough scale to compete with Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 AstraZeneca rejected Pfizer’s sweetened 694 billion-pound ($117 billion) takeover offer, saying the bid fails to reflect the value of the pipeline of experimental medicines.
 A demerger of Telco, set up in 2007 as Telecom Italia sought to fend off a takeover bid by AT&T Inc.
 takeover regulations.
 Shares of Vodafone, which has a market value of $102 billion, fell 15 percent on May 1 after the initial report about a possible AT&T bid for DirecTV as investors bet such a deal would lower the chances of a takeover.
 First Quantum, which acquired 80 percent of Cobre Panama with its $47 billion hostile takeover of Inmet Mining Corp.
 Inmet said before last year’s takeover that the Korean companies would fund $14 billion of the $62 billion cost of the project at the time.
 Thailand’s baht rose to within 02 percent of its level prior to the May 22 coup on optimism a military takeover will bring stability after six months of political unrest.
 The currency gained as much as 04 percent to 3246 per dollar yesterday, after trading at 3240 immediately prior to the army takeover.
 AstraZeneca Plc rejected Pfizer’s sweetened takeover proposal, saying the 631 billion-pound ($1065 billion) offer fails to appreciate the value of the promising medicines under development by the UK’s second-biggest drugmaker.
 Several hundred people gathered at an intersection in downtown Bangkok yesterday evening to protest the military takeover.
 Breedens Investments Pte, a unit of the city state’s investment firm, and its related parties own or control 80 percent of Singapore-based Olam, they said in a statement May 23 after a takeover offer closed.
 The takeover by Breedens is likely to see Olam management focus on longer-term projects, in line with the investment span of a sovereign wealth fund, and as it benefits from greater market confidence being under the Temasek brand and oversight, Attavar said.
 Damien Conover, a Chicago-based analyst at Morningstar, estimates AstraZeneca’s ADRs should be valued at $56 apiece in the absence of a takeover.
 takeover rules, Pfizer has until May 26 to make an offer.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co’s $17 billion bid for Alstom SA’s energy business is in jeopardy after France gave itself the power to block foreign takeovers in industries it deems strategic.
 The takeover will strengthen Atos’s business in areas such as super-computing -- techniques used to analyze large amounts of data with complex mathematic algorithms -- and cybersecurity.
 Earnings Boost The takeover is expected to lift Atos’s earnings per share as early as the first year, and by more than 10 percent within 24 months of integration.
 Investors buying now “stand to gain if the government decides to privatize MAS” or if there is a takeover from other parties, he said.
 Less than halfway through the year, 2014 has been the biggest period of drug-industry dealmaking in at least 12 years, with $212 billion of corporate takeovers announced or proposed, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The PIC has used its shareholding to prevent foreign takeovers of South African companies including pharmaceuticals maker Adcock Ingram Holdings Ltd.
 “I make it a point not to comment on the stock price” Record High The stock closed at a record high of $3139 on March 20, as investors cheered the subscription streaming network and the company drew takeover speculation.
 Liu Han had led the $12 billion takeover bid for Australian iron ore miner Sundance, which collapsed last year after his reported detention.
 spurred takeover speculation among other metal producers.
 “With the impending public takeover offer from America Movil, this feels largely academic for the shares today” Telekom Austria’s stock rose 29 percent this year before today as a pact between its two main owners, the Austrian government and America Movil, triggered a mandatory offer to minority shareholders.
 The company today reported a 90 percent jump in first-quarter revenue for its wealth-management unit, boosted by its takeover of Cazenove Capital Holdings Ltd, which was completed in July.
 on its $274 billion takeover last year by a group that included billionaire investor Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 We are divorcing before getting married” Levy said the deal fell apart because it felt more like a takeover by Omnicom than what was billed as a merger of equals.
 investor TIG Advisors LLC urged shareholders to join it in opposing a $14 billion takeover by Signet Jewelers Ltd, arguing that the $21-a-share price is “grossly unfair” TIG, which owns about 95 percent of Zale shares, plans to vote against the transaction at a special meeting of shareholders on May 29, according to a statement today.
 takeover rules, Pfizer had until 5 pm.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Hapag-Lloyd AG, Germany’s biggest container line, said its first-quarter loss widened as the takeover of Chilean rival Cia.
 prior to the $38 billion takeover by Rio in 2007, was promoted to head of the unit in 2009.
 to testify on the proposed takeover of AstraZeneca Plc, as London Mayor Boris Johnson added his voice to those urging caution on the deal.
 takeover law prohibits the US.
 takeover rules for now, so the deal is at a stalemate, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 After that date, Pfizer will be blocked from another takeover push for six months, though it can approach the UK.
 takeover rules is that final means final” Joan Campion, a spokeswoman for Pfizer, said in an e-mailed statement yesterday that the fate of the deal is now in the hands of AstraZeneca’s shareholders.
May 19 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc rejected another takeover offer from Pfizer Inc.
 takeover law.
 lawmakers, who have expressed concern a takeover will gut AstraZeneca’s research operations in the UK.
 In a postmortem of the failed takeover talks between Pfizer Inc.
 takeover law prohibits Pfizer from making a new, unsolicited offer for the next six months, the deal could be revived in three months if AstraZeneca invites talks.
 company pushed for a joint statement saying the drugmakers were in takeover talks.
 Soriot suggested the takeover could harm patients because the distraction would delay development of life-saving cancer drugs.
 The next day’s headlines screamed that Pfizer’s takeover would cost lives, and Read had to assure lawmakers that the company wouldn’t jeopardize getting medicine to patients.
 As it turned to evening in the UK, though, Pfizer tried but was unable to immediately contact officials on the takeover panel, as required, to get the offer published, according to a person familiar with the company’s effort.
 takeover rules bar the company from increasing the bid’s amount under most circumstances once it declares a final offer.
 Still, the takeover panel made Pfizer put out another statement late on May 19, clarifying that under some conditions, the company could still make a deal, said that person.
 Banking Fees The failed takeover attempt, which would have been the biggest in UK.
 Increased generation boosted savings promised customers from the takeover of Progress Energy in 2012, Good said.
 The deal followed a 105 billion-euro takeover of Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year.
 lawmakers this week amid political tension over public-interest issues related to the takeover.
 “There are various ways that they could be made more solid and that’s exactly the kind of thing we’re discussing with Pfizer” Labour Criticism Cable’s examination of how Pfizer’s proposed takeover could be blocked on public-interest grounds includes the possibility of referring the case to the European Commission or proposing a change to the Enterprise Act that would widen the public-interest test for takeovers, a person familiar with discussions in government said on May 9.
 The opposition Labour Party, which has criticized the government’s approach to the takeover and accused ministers of being “cheerleaders” for Pfizer, yesterday called for a “stronger public-interest test” to be applied to the deal.
 “It allows them to participate in a very strong combined company with great cash flows and a great portfolio, and it allows a very efficient allocation of capital” “Improving the efficiency of the organization” and the ability to “liberate the balance sheet and tax of the combined companies” are the key reasons for the takeover, Read said.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- A DirecTV investor sued to block AT&T Inc’s $48 billion takeover of the largest US.
 In 2012, the company also fended off a takeover bid from private-equity firm Oaktree Capital Management LP.
 venture from buying Russian-made rocket engines for the Air Force, saying the purchases don’t violate sanctions imposed after Russia’s takeover of Crimea.
 InterContinental Hotels Group Plc added 34 percent after a report that it rejected a takeover bid.
 His main strategies rebounded last year with prescient bets on companies in takeovers, and by investing in stocks that surged as global central bank policies propped up markets.
 The value of announced takeovers in 2014 hit $1 trillion April 28, reaching that level at the fastest pace in seven years after more than $300 billion in deals were announced last month.
 Loeb on April 29 asked a Delaware judge to delay the annual meeting so that a court can hear a full review of Sotheby’s anti-takeover measures.
 BicBanco’s $300 million of notes due 2020 soared to a four-year high of 11135 cents on the dollar last week as investors wagered the bank will win an investment grade after its takeover by China Construction Bank Corp, the Asian nation’s second-biggest lender by stock-market value.
 is weighing a takeover bid against the odds of winning regulatory approval.
 to provide advice on repaying debt if the takeover collapses.
 Greenhill is a New York-based takeover adviser founded by Robert F.
 Glencore, already among the world’s biggest crude oil traders, last month expanded its interests in oil production with the $135 billion takeover bid for Caracal Energy Inc, gaining assets in Chad.
 takeover rules.
 That’s bad news for Vodafone shareholders who were banking on a takeover bid from the US.
 takeover rules bars it from making a bid for six months.
 than expanding overseas” Other Suitors? A takeover of Vodafone would’ve been an easy way out for the company’s shareholders, who are coming down from a more than $80 billion cash-and-stock payday after the carrier sold its 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless to its US.
 Vodafone has used the funds from its Verizon sale to buy fixed assets of its own, agreeing to pay about $10 billion for Spain’s Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March, following a takeover of Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year.
 Prosecutors said the couple used an array of accounts in the names of businesses to hide their money and employed “e-mails, telephone calls and in-person meetings to instruct Swiss bankers and asset managers to make investments and transfer funds from their undeclared accounts at UBS” Business Purpose At trial, Hough’s lawyers argued that the accounts served the business purpose of helping protect the assets of their nonprofit foundation from people attempting a hostile takeover.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Pepco Holdings Inc, an electricity and natural gas provider in the mid-Atlantic region, was sued by a shareholder who claims the company is undervalued in a proposed $68 billion takeover by Exelon Corp.
 Pfizer is putting together a sweetened offer before it considers whether to make a hostile takeover attempt by bringing its proposal directly to AstraZeneca’s shareholders, the people said.
 Chief Financial Officer Miguel Martinez said this month that the $37 billion company is looking for takeover targets that offer a “growth platform” and are based in more stable countries after its biggest purchase so far, a more than $15 billion deal for YPF SA, ended with a government seizure.
 (OAS) would be takeover options, said Gibson Scott, director of energy research at ITG.
 Chief Executive Officer Chris Finlayson’s unexpected resignation in April prompted speculation the $73 billion company could become a takeover target.
 says its proposed takeover of Alstom SA’s energy business can work, walk around Belfort, a city in eastern France that’s home to factories owned by both companies.
 and JPMorgan Chase & Co’s takeover of Bear Stearns Cos.
 soared 18 percent to A$480 after rejecting a takeover offer from KKR & Co.
May 3 (Bloomberg) -- In January 2010, four months before then Prime Minister Gordon Brown’s election defeat, Kraft Foods Group Inc’s takeover of candy maker Cadbury Plc was used by the Conservative opposition to portray a government that was out of touch with the British people.
 “After the way in which Labour mishandled Kraft’s takeover of Cadbury, we’re very much aware of it” Electoral Pressure The AstraZeneca takeover bid is all the more sensitive to Cameron less than three weeks before his party contests local and European elections at which securing jobs will play a role.
 Kraft’s Chief Executive Officer Irene Rosenfeld said in September 2009, at the beginning of the unsolicited takeover, that she believed the Keynsham plant could be kept open, only to announce seven days after her company’s offer was made unconditional, that it would close.
 The UK’s takeover panel reprimanded the company for misstating its plans.
 Office of Fair Trading that the takeover could lead to higher prices in the UK.
 rejected the drugmaker’s unsolicited takeover offer.
 Blackstone has been selling assets from its 2007 takeover of Equity Office Properties Trust as real estate in prime US.
 takeover rules, Pfizer had until 5 pm.
 economic sanctions over his country’s takeover of Crimea from Ukraine.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Louisiana-Pacific Corp’s announced C$951 million ($879 million) takeover of Ainsworth Lumber Co, a producer of a plywood substitute, was blocked by Canadian and US.
 terminated its C$951 million ($873 million) takeover of Ainsworth Lumber Co, a Canadian producer of a plywood substitute, after regulators said further asset sales were necessary.
 Treasury should command a takeover price of more than A$5 a share, Pengana estimates, compared with A$494 yesterday.
 The winemaker should fetch at least A$5 a share in a takeover, based on the value of its unsold inventory -- A$12 billion in December -- and its earnings prospects, said Mark Christensen, an investment analyst at Pengana in Sydney.
 “We’re focused on closing the current financial year in the strongest possible fashion,” Roger Sharp, a Melbourne-based spokesman for Treasury, said in an e-mailed response to questions about the takeover interest.
 All the same, Treasury’s Penfolds label alone is probably worth at least A$3 billion in a takeover, David Errington, an analyst at Bank of America Corp, wrote in a Feb.
 “My guess is that this is an opening offer from KKR and the TWE board would be amenable to a takeover at the right price,” he wrote.
 Announced corporate buying -- a combination of new cash takeovers and new stock buybacks -- rose to a five-month high of $805 billion in April, according to data from TrimTabs Investment Research Inc.
 Kakao shareholders will hold more than two-thirds of the combined company after a reverse takeover that values Kakao at 31 trillion won ($3 billion), based on the terms of a Daum regulatory filing yesterday.
 for as much as $19 billion and Rakuten Inc’s $900 million takeover of Viber earlier this year.
 lawmakers next week amid political tension overpublic-interest issues related to the takeover.
 “Itallows them to participate in a very strong combined companywith great cash flows and a great portfolio, and it allows avery efficient allocation of capital” “Improving the efficiency of the organization” and theability to “liberate the balance sheet and tax of the combinedcompanies” are the key reasons for the takeover, Read said“We liked where their science is being done, which is in theUK.
 Between Comcast Corp’s takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 “They went from playing a game of checkers to four-dimensional chess” Comcast announced its takeover of Time Warner Cable in February for about $68 billion, which includes net debt.
 Deal Timeframe Bob Toevs, a spokesman for Dish, said yesterday the company doesn’t comment on takeover speculation.
 The European logistics business was acquired in 2008 as part of the 126 billion-euro ($175 billion) takeover of cigarette maker Altadis SA.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- AT&T Inc’s takeover of DirecTV would bring a quarter of the pay-television households in the US.
 “We haven’t made any decisions yet” Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel ordered the Air Force to review its reliance on the rocket engine after tensions over Russia’s takeover of Ukraine’s Crimea region prompted questions from lawmakers about that long-time supply connection.
 House of Commons Business Committee about Pfizer’s proposed takeover of AstraZeneca.
 Etisalat agreed in November to acquire Vivendi’s 53 percent stake in Maroc Telecom in the Middle East’s largest takeover of a phone carrier.
 Berkshire, led by billionaire Warren Buffett, provided financing last year for the $233 billion takeover while Jorge Paulo Lemann’s 3G has been running operations.
 He also declined to comment on whether Shire had been approached by Allergan Inc, after Reuters reported that the Botox maker was preparing a takeover offer to fight off a bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 InterContinental Hotels Group Plc jumped 34 percent after a report that the world’s largest provider of hotel accommodation rejected a takeover offer from an unidentified US.
 Sky News reported on May 24 that the company’s board recently dismissed a takeover bid from a US.
 Pfizer yesterday abandoned its takeover plan, saying the 694 billion-pound bid rejected by its London-based competitor represented full value.
 takeover rules, Pfizer had until 5 pm.
 He added that Siemens has invested too much in acquisitions in health-care diagnostics, which include the 2007 takeover of Dade Behring Holdings Inc.
 drug company will be blocked from making another takeover push for six months if AstraZeneca doesn’t reopen talks over Pfizer’s final offer of 694 billion pounds.
 accepted a A$14 billion ($13 billion) takeover offer from Wilmar International Ltd.
 Previous Approach Wilmar had previously approached the baker and discussed a takeover after buying a 10 percent stake in February 2012.
 That compares with a median multiple of 99 times Ebitda in 40 baking and dairy takeovers globally over the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Comcast’s takeover of Time Warner Cable hasn’t been approved yet.
 In March, AT&T’s Stephenson called the Time Warner Cable takeover an “industry-redefining deal” A deal with DirecTV shows that AT&T has turned its attention back to the US.
 market since the Time Warner Cable takeover was announced.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc, the target of Pfizer’s Inc’s takeover bid of more than $100 billion, forecast long-term sales growth as the company seeks to convince investors that it can succeed as a standalone drugmaker.
 AstraZeneca last week rejected a takeover bid by Pfizer of 626 billion pounds ($106 billion) in a mix of cash and stock that valued the company at about 50 pounds a share.
 “But I can tell you none of the products is more than 10 percent of the pipeline” Lawmakers from across Britain’s political parties have raised questions about implications of Pfizer’s potential takeover of AstraZeneca on jobs and pharmaceutical investments.
 Voting Block Joe and James Shoen sold their share to Mark after both were sued by opposing family members over the takeover of the company, according to a 2011 Nevada supreme court opinion.
 The takeover offer won approval from the Chinese trade ministry last month and Spain’s stock market regulator authorized it yesterday.
 The Burlington Northern Santa Fe railroad, which was Buffett’s biggest takeover, contributed $724 million to quarterly earnings, down from $798 million a year earlier, as winter weather and rising cargo shipments disrupted operations.
 Moody’s estimated the debt level at 97 times Ebitda, not including those factors, after the private-equity firm’s takeover of the New York-based provider of technology services to the hotel industry.
 Moody’s said in an April 29 report that the takeover would leave the Minneapolis-based company with nine times debt-to-Ebitda “including management’s estimate for acquisition-related cost synergies” Mayura Hooper, a spokeswoman for Deutsche Bank, and Joan Miller, a spokeswoman for Summit, declined to comment.
 Earnings from Canada’s second-largest lender by assets were helped by a 25 percent increase in wealth management, and higher trading revenue and fees for advising on takeovers from its capital-markets unit.
 The proposed takeover is subject to Hillshire terminating a $52 billion agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, owner of the Birds Eye frozen foods brand.
 The takeover would add to Tyson’s earnings per share in the first full year after the deal’s completion, according to the company.
 Merger Wave Comcast’s $45 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable, announced in February, and AT&T’s May 18 deal to buy DirecTV for $485 billion are part of a wave of merger activity in the telecommunications industry.
 She vowed not to get distracted by a possible takeover.
 A possible takeover by Pfizer Inc.
 Advanced Project London-based AstraZeneca has spent the last month resisting Pfizer’s 69 billion-pound ($116 billion) takeover offer.
 Forest is itself in the midst of a takeover by US.
 Canadian companies were involved in 408 completed takeovers valued at $415 billion in the quarter, down from 526 deals valued at $604 billion a year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 presented its case against a proposed takeover.
 Australand will provide Stockland access to due diligence materials, the Sydney-based property company said in a regulatory filing today, after receiving a sweetened takeover bid from Australia’s biggest diversified real estate trust this week.
 The shares climbed to a three-month high on April 29 amid speculation that it could become a takeover target, following Chief Executive Officer Chris Finlayson’s surprise resignation.
 Air Force because they may violate sanctions imposed after the takeover of Crimea.
 Office of Fair Trading that the takeover could lead to higher blended whisky prices in the UK.
 raised their takeover offer for Goodman Fielder Ltd.
 Previous Approach Wilmar had previously approached the baker and discussed a takeover after buying a 10 percent stake in February 2012.
 That compares with a median multiple of 99 times Ebitda in 40 baking and dairy takeovers globally over the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 State Intervention France last week passed legislation extending the government’s ability to block foreign takeovers into the fields of energy, transport and health care.
 in March, has been speculated as a takeover candidate for at least three years, in part because of its rapid growth.
 company’s offer of about $106 billion for London-based AstraZeneca, the biggest takeover bid in UK.
 The hearings in London provide a first opportunity for lawmakers to question the pharmaceutical executives amid growing public and political concern that a takeover would mean job losses and cuts to research.
 “The entire political class and media will be spending a couple of hours listening to Pfizer’s business and intellectual case” for the takeover, said Richard Berry, managing director of Democratic Audit, a charity that has studied the work of parliamentary committees.
 “There are various ways that they could be made more solid and that’s exactly the kind of thing we’re discussing with Pfizer” The most hostile questioning may come from members of the opposition Labour Party, whose leader Ed Miliband has accused Prime Minister David Cameron of being a cheerleader for the takeover.
 “Pfizer does have a record of launching takeovers for other pharmaceutical companies and then seeing a reduction in investment in research and development” Executive Roll-call Tomorrow’s session will begin at 9:30 am.
 Their testimony is scheduled to end at 11:15 am, when Soriot, flanked by Mene Pangalos, AstraZeneca’s executive vice president, and Ian Brimicombe, vice president in charge of corporate finance, will make the case against the takeover.
 In the videos at the weekend, Read sought to shift the emphasis away from tax and onto the business case for the takeover, which AstraZeneca’s board has rejected.
 Cable has been examining how Pfizer’s proposed takeover could be blocked on public-interest grounds, including the possibility of referring the case to the European Commission or proposing a change to the Enterprise Act that would widen the public-interest test for takeovers, a person familiar with discussions in government said on May 9.
 “I will do whatever is right for Britain, I will always stand up for British jobs, British interests, British science, British R&D,” Cameron said when asked on BBC TV yesterday about toughening up the law on takeovers.
 The acquisition of Hillshire, potentially the meatpacker’s largest takeover since 2009, would boost JBS’s debt levels to the highest in four years.
 Berkshire joined Jorge Paulo Lemann’s 3G Capital in a $233 billion takeover of HJ Heinz Co.
 government ministers April 29 to discuss a potential takeover, according to a person familiar with the meetings.
 “The takeovers have always happened as the opportunities came” JBS, which supplies more than 10 percent of the world’s beef after takeovers including Smithfield Foods Inc.
 Chief Financial Officer John Stephens said the National Football League’s recent commentary on negotiations with DirecTV for NFL Sunday Ticket rights is “very encouraging” Those talks are key now that AT&T’s $485 billion takeover of DirecTV hinges on the satellite-TV company securing a renewal of the sports rights.
 The team was debt-free before the US-based Glazer family bought it in 2005 in a leveraged takeover.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- InterContinental Hotels Group Plc climbed to a record in London trading after Sky News reported that the company spurned a takeover bid that valued it at about 6 billion pounds ($101 billion).
 Other potential takeover targets include Accor SA, NH Hoteles SA and Rezidor Hotel Group AB, the firm said.
 France last week passed legislation extending the government’s ability to block foreign takeovers into the fields of energy, transport and health care.
 mobile company Verizon Wireless last year, a deal that has turned Vodafone itself into a takeover target.
 satellite TV provider DirecTV for $485 billion is the latest sign that AT&T may set aside a long-held ambition for a big takeover in Europe.
 for brokering deals including Russian billionaire Roman Abramovich’s takeover of Chelsea, Lucas didn’t get attention.
 Kakao shareholders will hold more than two thirds of the combined company after a reverse takeover that values Kakao at 31 trillion won ($3 billion), based on the terms of a Daum regulatory filing.
 for as much as $19 billion and Rakuten Inc’s $900 million takeover of Viber earlier this year.
 The Toronto-based bank may not sell to a competing lender such as Royal Bank of Canada and other firms would be reluctant to hold a minority stake in CI which has a so-called poison pill in place to prevent a full takeover.
 CI’s then Chief Executive Officer Bill Holland established an anti-takeover defense after Scotiabank bought the shares from Sun Life Financial Inc.
 He said at the time he wanted to ensure the bank didn’t turn its holding into a majority stake through a creeping takeover.
 takeover rules, Pfizer had until 5 pm.
 Office of Fair Trading that the takeover could lead to higher prices in the UK.
 lawmakers to justify his proposed takeover of AstraZeneca Plc, one question will underpin the debate: whether the more than $100 billion offer is really about drugs, or about taxes.
 Money-management firms have been weighing in since AstraZeneca spurned New York-based Pfizer’s 69 billion-pound ($116 billion) takeover proposal on May 19.
 takeover rules.
 The largest of those deals was the takeover of Master Blenders by JAB last year.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Smith & Nephew Plc, long speculated to be a takeover candidate, has finally been put in play thanks to a merger between two of its competitors.
 After Stryker’s potential plans were reported by the Financial Times yesterday, the company had to decide whether to make a bid in the next 28 days or wait six months because of the rules governing takeovers in the UK.
 “Zimmer pulled the trigger on one of the two likely takeover candidates, and that somewhat forces Stryker’s hand,” Mark Landy, an analyst at Summer Street Research in Boston, said in a phone interview.
 “It’s either, ‘Yes, we’re initiating a takeover process,’ or, ‘No, we’re not interested’” Six Months The UK.
 While Smith & Nephew has been considered a takeover candidate by analysts and investors for years, prior to the Zimmer-Biomet announcement a deal was seen as unlikely because of antitrust hurdles, said Lisa Bedell Clive, a London-based analyst at Sanford C.
 He said a bidding war is possible, though, which could drive the takeover price even higher.
 surged above a spurned A$305 billion ($29 billion) takeover bid from KKR & Co.
 Food, drink and agricultural businesses in Australia have attracted $26 billion in takeover bids over the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Treasury’s Penfolds label alone is probably worth at least A$3 billion in a takeover and its US.
 in May 2011 before the brewer’s own A$105 billion takeover by SABMiller Plc later that year.
 ‘Takeover Battle’ “The last thing they want to do is get squeezed if it goes to a takeover battle,” he said.
 “We’d like to know how much these takeovers will add to profits,” said Ryoji Yoshizawa, a Tokyo-based director of financial institution ratings at Standard & Poor’s.
 this week proposed the biggest such deal yet, a $987 billion takeover of AstraZeneca Plc that would move the largest US.
 takeover of AstraZeneca Plc to rape by the US.
 I think the storm is really a very defensive one by people who don’t like the takeover but don’t think they can stop it and therefore they’d rather turn the heat on something else” “The prime minister thinks that analogy is quite wrong,” Cameron’s spokesman Jean-Christophe Gray told reporters in London.
 Standard & Poor’s Ratings Services responded to the takeover speculation by placing Lorillard and Reynolds on a negative credit watch.
 France last week bolstered its ability to block foreign takeovers, adding risk to GE’s pursuit of Alstom as Immelt works to return the company to its industrial roots and de-emphasize financial services.
 French Economy and Industry Minister Arnaud Montebourg signed a decree May 14 giving the government the power to block some foreign takeovers, including deals in the energy industry.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- Adcock Ingram Holdings Ltd, South Africa’s largest supplier of hospital products, posted a first-half loss as it wrote off expenses related to a failed takeover attempt by CFR Pharmaceuticals SA and margins remained under pressure.
 is also in the midst of a debate of the role governments should play in preventing takeovers by foreign companies as Pfizer Inc.
 Lower Fees Fees for underwriting equities and bonds, as well as advising on takeovers, shrank 23 percent in the Asia-Pacific region from the beginning of 2011 through the end of 2013, according to New York-based research firm Freeman & Co.
 Abdel-Fattah al-Seesi, the Egyptian army chief who led the takeover, said in an interview with Sky News Arabia broadcast today that Turkey had initiated the dispute, and that Egypt rejects interference in its internal affairs.
 Dexia’s final stumble in 2011 led to a takeover of its Belgian unit by the Belgian government.
 JPMorgan withheld information about 1 billion euros ($14 billion) in financing the New York-based bank arranged for Monte Paschi’s takeover of Antonveneta in 2008, the prosecutors have said in court filings.
 Takeover Limits Montebourg signed a decree this month giving authorities the power to block some foreign takeovers, including in the energy industry.
 address, through a takeover of AstraZeneca, its board may face a similar choice about how to deal with the excise tax on unvested equity.
 The team was debt-free before the Glazers bought it in a leveraged takeover.
 Buffett told shareholders this month that his company is looking for a large takeover with 3G Capital, the buyout firm he teamed up with last year for the acquisition of ketchup maker HJ.
 They are all valued at more than $20 billion before debt and a takeover premium.
 to Alstom SA’s energy operations, as France’s industry minister praised the German company hours after extending the state’s influence over foreign takeovers.
 The minister’s decree allows the state to block foreign takeovers in areas such as energy, equipment, plants and transportation that are critical for national security and health, ramping up pressure on GE.
 Companies have scaled back spending on new operations and takeovers to improve balance sheets and cut costs after a decade-long commodity price boom ended with key products falling into bear markets.
 Severstal bought the Dearborn, Michigan plant in 2004 as part of its $2855 million takeover of Rouge Industries Inc.
 Read said it would “enable us to be competitive” Testifying separately later for AstraZeneca, CEO Pascal Soriot argued it was “a little bit more complicated than putting two pieces of paper together” While neither committee has any formal influence over a possible takeover, both show how much Pfizer is operating in an atmosphere of anxiety about its offer of more than $100 billion, which AstraZeneca has rebuffed.
 ‘Lose Momentum’ Soriot replied that mergers cause anxiety, with scientists “not sure if their job will exist tomorrow” In such a situation, he said, “you can quickly lose momentum” Jim Dowd, a lawmaker from the opposition Labour Party, which has opposed the takeover, again raised Pfizer’s record in Sweden, where it closed a research center after a takeover.
 Soriot declined to say whether the government should intervene to block the takeover.
 said it doesn’t plan to make a takeover offer for orthopedics company Smith & Nephew Plc, denying a report in the Financial Times that sent Smith & Nephew shares soaring.
 Investors have long speculated that Smith & Nephew would attract a takeover bid, though antitrust issues were seen as an obstacle.
 “It means we’re not going to see a takeover imminently,” Chen said.
 stocks retreated, following a weekly gain for the FTSE 100 Index, as AstraZeneca Plc slumped the most since August 2002 after rejecting a new takeover bid from Pfizer Inc.
 There is rarely a fourth attempt to dance in a takeover bid so based on the developments over the weekend, the probability for a deal is now very low” Average asking prices for homes across England and Wales rose 36 percent in May from the prior month, reaching a record of 272,003 pounds, according to a report from property website operator Rightmove Plc.
 Templeton Emerging Markets Group and Capital Economics said the takeover may bring more stability after a six-month political stalemate that weighed on the economy.
 And Buffett himself hunts elephants trading far above 12 times book, as the takeovers of HJ.
 In March, AT&T CEO Randall Stephenson called the Time Warner Cable takeover an “industry-redefining deal” The question with all of these potential tie-ups is whether regulators will allow them.
 Comcast’s takeover of Time Warner Cable hasn’t been approved yet.
 Kmart merged with Sears Roebuck in 2005 in a $123 billion takeover -- a deal that Lampert said would create a company with enough scale to compete with Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 “There’s just a growing desire to gain exposure to Argentina” Argentina gave the so-called Bonar bonds due 2024 to Spanish oil company Repsol in compensation for the takeover of 51 percent of YPF SA two years ago, in addition to bonds maturing in 2015, 2017 and 2033 for a total face value of $532 billion.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc got a boost from a long-time shareholder and one of its biggest institutional stockholders after other investors criticized the drugmaker for spurning Pfizer Inc’s 69-billion-pound ($117 billion) takeover offer.
 Lost Bid The settlement comes after Loeb’s Third Point on May 3 lost its bid to delay the meeting so a judge could scrutinize the effect of an anti-takeover defense on the fund company’s effort to win board seats.
 “That indicates they were worried about losing a proxy contest” Poison Pill The ruling was a setback for Loeb’s claims that Sotheby’s directors created the poison pill in a novel effort to hamper the activist investor’s fight for three board seats rather than to prevent a takeover.
 “This would be the largest takeover of a British firm.
 takeover rules.
 government ministers April 29 to discuss a potential takeover, according to a person familiar with the meetings.
 House of Commons Business Committee about Pfizer’s proposed takeover of AstraZeneca.
 Fees from arranging stock sales and advising on takeovers climbed 67 percent to C$428 million.
 would need to sell its wrinkle treatment Dysport to make room for Allergan Inc’s flagship product Botox if it succeeds in a takeover of the Irvine, California-based company.
 reached a friendly takeover deal.
 For Chevron, the world’s third-largest energy company by market value, production in the era after its 2001 takeover of Texaco Inc.
 The shares rallied 22 percent yesterday after Pilgrim’s Pride Corp, the chicken processor majority-owned by JBS SA, announced a more than $6 billion takeover bid for Hillshire, including net debt.
 That suggests to me the market is saying this company is now in play” Higher Valuation The Pilgrim’s takeover bid values Hillshire at about 13 times its earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization in the last 12 months, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The value of takeovers announced in 2014 hit $1 trillion this week, reaching that level at the fastest pace in seven years after more than $300 billion in deals were announced in April.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- MTN Group Ltd, the South African telecommunications company that’s assembled an emerging-markets mobile empire through acquisitions, is on the hunt for more takeovers.
 Politicians, concerned that local owners’ stakes are diluted or stock-market listings shifted abroad, have more recently sought to block health-care and retail takeovers in the country.
 The PIC earlier this year torpedoed an attempted takeover of drugmaker Adcock Ingram Holdings Ltd.
 Cash Pile To avoid such hurdles for any future deals, MTN could use one of its subsidiaries for a merger or takeover -- a structure that would avoid a dilution in South African owners’ stakes, said Kate Turner-Smith, an analyst at BPI Capital Africa in Cape Town.
 We remain the same company under the same name, different owner -- that’s all” Space Communication, also known as Spacecom, said in December it hired an investment bank to examine options after receiving expressions of interest in a takeover.
 Temasek held 246 percent of Olam through its unit Breedens and Aranda Investment Pte when it made the takeover bid, it said on March 14.
 AstraZeneca has rejected Pfizer’s offer, setting the stage for a hostile takeover battle.
 opposition Labour Party’s business spokesman, Chuka Umunna, took sides in the battle for AstraZeneca Plc, saying the company’s board was right to reject Pfizer Inc’s increased takeover offer.
 In a sign of how a possible future Labour government led by Ed Miliband would be more willing to intervene in takeovers, Umunna characterized Pfizer as principally interested in “financial engineering” and cutting its tax bill, and said this was a reason to block a takeover.
 “Pfizer has said today that it will not seek to launch a hostile bid and must not renege on this promise” Until May 16, Labour restricted itself to calling for an examination of whether a takeover would be in the public interest.
 in the meat industry, is resuming its takeover campaign less than a year after its last major deal.
 agreed to buy its outstanding shares as part of a takeover of Latin American drugstores.
 takeover rules, Pfizer had until 5 pm.
 In Germany, a successful acquisition of Fox’s stake in Sky Deutschland would force BSkyB to make a takeover offer for the remaining shares.
 Savings from the 224 billion-rand ($22 billion) takeover will be at least 14 billion rand a year by 2019, excluding interest and taxes, the Cape Town-based company said in a statement today.
 Sweden has little ability to stop a takeover.
 Stockland offered 1124 of its own shares for every Australand security, equivalent to A$435 a share, through an off-market takeover bid, it said in a regulatory filing.
 A successful takeover would give Stockland stronger industrial property and residential development portfolios, and boost annual earnings by 5 percent, it said.
 A successful takeover will likely boost the return on Stockland’s commercial portfolio “because the assets owned by Australand are higher yielding” Australand shares fell 07 percent to A$423 at the close of trading in Sydney.
 Canada’s largest engineering company has zeroed in on potential takeovers to boost its engineering and construction businesses, Card said in a phone interview yesterday after the accord with Warren Buffett’s company was announced.
 And it has its own exclusive pact with the NFL, the popular Sunday Ticket package, which is so important that AT&T has the right to walk away from the DirecTV takeover if the football relationship isn’t renewed.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Allergan Inc, the target of an unsolicited takeover bid by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, reported profit that beat analyst estimates as sales of its Botox treatment increased.
 Sales Target Ornskov declined to comment on whether Shire had been approached by Allergan Inc, after Reuters reported April 29 that Allergan was preparing a takeover offer to fight off an unsolicited bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 Pfizer, based in New York, has proposed a $106 billion takeover of AstraZeneca that has so far been rejected.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Repsol SA, the Spanish oil company looking to spend about $10 billion on takeovers, reported first-quarter profit that exceeded analyst estimates as production growth in Latin America offset declines in Libya.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc said an experimental cancer drug shrank tumors in half of patients in an early-stage study, a result that may help its case that Pfizer Inc’s takeover bid substantially undervalues the company.
 Nomura’s largest M&A assignment of the year suddenly became the biggest takeover canceled in Japan this decade when Yahoo Japan Corp.
 Japan’s biggest securities firm hasn’t held the top spot since 2011, missing out on the largest takeovers to banks including Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group Inc, Morgan Stanley and Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Now, Japanese clients seeking advice on takeovers abroad are either turning to commercial banks that can quickly provide finance for the largest transactions, or to global firms that have contacts with potential targets overseas.
 A total of 325 takeovers involving Japanese companies have been scrapped in the past 10 years, and the Yahoo Japan transaction was the biggest among those that had agreed to merge, the data show.
 1 adviser in Japan last year, worked with Suntory on its Beam takeover.
 To help ease regulatory approval for the $485 billion takeover, AT&T said it will divest its 8 percent stake in America Movil and have its two members on America Movil’s board step down immediately.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Sheikh Hamad bin Jassim bin Jabr Al Thani, who played a key role in Glencore International Plc’s takeover of Xstrata Plc, is returning to dealmaking a year after his ouster as prime minister and head of Qatar’s sovereign wealth fund.
 It also makes companies vulnerable to foreign takeovers, it said.
 Randall Stephenson, chief executive officer of AT&T since 2007, is embarking on the company’s largest takeover in eight years to bulk up after competitors Comcast Corp.
 In March, AT&T’s Stephenson called the Time Warner Cable takeover an “industry-redefining deal” One of the main questions about the potential deals is whether regulators will allow them.
 Comcast’s takeover of Time Warner Cable hasn’t been approved yet.
 These takeovers are expensive, and consumers end up footing the bill for merger mania” DirecTV will give AT&T a pay-TV business that’s expanding in Latin America.
 The takeover could hinge on those negotiations, according to a regulatory filing today.
 market since the Time Warner Cable takeover was announced.
 and negotiate a takeover as it prepares to offer fourth-generation wireless services.
 The value of takeovers announced in 2014 hit $1 trillion this week, reaching that level at the fastest pace in seven years after more than $300 billion in deals were announced in April.
 said May 15 that they raised their takeover offer for Sydney-based Goodman Fielder Ltd, the maker of Meadow Fresh yogurt, Olive Grove margarine and Wonder White bread.
 “It’s not a fragile takeover,” Aguer said.
 Its ranking among takeover advisers in the region climbed to fourth from eighth over the same period, the data show.
 Competition Appeal Tribunal in December overturned a June decision on the grounds that Eurotunnel’s takeover of the SNCF’s SeaFrance operation may have amounted to the purchase of three ships rather than a business, since the company had ceased operating.
 The acquisition, if realized, would be the largest takeover of an overseas firm by a Japanese life insurer, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 stocks ended little changed following last week’s drop as escalating violence in Iraq offset takeovers and growth in American industrial output.
 The Federal Reserve has delayed M&T Bank Corp’s takeover of Hudson City Bancorp Inc.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Agrokor dd, Croatia’s largest company, reached final agreement to buy a majority of Slovenian rival Mercator Poslovni Sistem, in a deal worth 13 billion euros ($18 billion), the largest takeover in the Balkans.
 Regional Consolidation Medja said Slovenia and the wider Balkans region would benefit from a consolidation of the retail industry, while Bratusek said she was given assurances that no job cuts would follow the takeover.
 “The board is unanimous in its decision that Protech voluntarily begin the business-rescue process” Protech’s board declined to recommend a $16 million takeover by Eqstra Holdings Ltd.
 Monsanto Co, the world’s largest seed company worth $64 billion, recently explored a takeover of $34 billion Swiss rival Syngenta AG in a transaction that would have allowed the US.
 Medtronic Inc, a Minneapolis-based medical-device maker, is the latest and largest company to say it will renounce its American address as part of its planned $429 billion takeover of Dublin-based Covidien Plc.
 “It’s a huge market and for the next 10 years or so, there are going to be very, very few competitors whereas in the consumer products, there are competitors all over the place” Redmond said his firm, which oversees about $235 million, sold its shares of Idenix after the takeover was announced.
 AbbVie may now consider a takeover of Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc, a $411 million company, to expand in that market, Redmond said.
 The takeover of Idenix “makes strategic sense,” Liang wrote.
 Electricity providers have attracted almost $50 billion in takeover offers this quarter, the most since the beginning of 2011, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Valued at $34 billion based on the price of TUI Travel shares that TUI AG doesn’t own, the transaction would be the biggest deal in the wider tourism services sector since the 2006 takeover of reservations specialist Sabre Holdings Corp.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- The Dutch government plans to create a law that will safeguard national security if a local telecommunications operator such as Royal KPN NV receives a takeover approach, Minister of Economic Affairs Henk Kamp told parliament.
 The plan is a response to parliamentary questions following last year’s failed 72 billion euro ($97 billion) takeover attempt of KPN by billionaire Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB.
 regulators let it restart trials of a top experimental drug for hepatitis C and analysts speculated the company may be a takeover target.
 The news on Achillion’s experimental drugs could make it a takeover target, said Brian Abrahams, an analyst with Wells Fargo.
 “We thought Williams had the wherewithal to deliver on 20 percent dividend growth and now, all of a sudden, the market is giving them credit for it” Because all Access Midstream revenue comes from fixed fees, about 80 percent of cash flow at Williams will be guaranteed after the takeover, Kirst said.
 EFG-Hermes advanced 01 percent to 1537 pounds at the close in Cairo and has more than doubled since the military’s takeover of power last July.
 was said to consider a takeover of the UK.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Allergan Inc, the drugmaker resisting a takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, won US.
 Allergan, based in Irvine, California, is resisting a $54 billion takeover offer by Valeant, which has twice raised its bid as it seeks to become one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers.
 This year’s boom in health-care takeovers is giving companies and their banks, lawyers, and public-relations firms plenty of real-life experience to draw upon.
 Shire, domiciled in Dublin for tax purposes and with management offices in Basingstoke, England, has rejected three takeover offers from AbbVie.
 takeover rules, deeming an offer final makes it nearly impossible for it to be further increased.
 That proposal would have created a pathway for the utility to takeover Energy Future’s profitable Oncor Electric Delivery Co.
 Shire is the subject of an unsolicited, 273 billion-pound ($464 billion) takeover proposal from AbbVie Inc.
 In a regulatory filing today laying out further details on the benefits of its $485 billion takeover of DirecTV, AT&T said that about 60 percent of its video subscriber revenue goes to paying for content for its U-verse TV service.
 that have experienced significant growth in recent years and been the subject of takeover speculation.
 Ornskov said he’s spent the last few weeks learning about the rules governing takeovers in the UK, and what he can and can’t do under the law.
 Prior to the takeover, Oceanografia had 69 ships that aided state-owned Petroleos Mexicanos in offshore oil production, including drilling rigs and tugboats, and employed more than 11,000 people.
 That’s about 19 percent of Woodside, whose attraction as a potential takeover target may be revived.
 “We’re certainly not thinking about setting the company up for a takeover,” he said.
 In 2001, the Australian government blocked Shell’s takeover bid for Woodside.
 TW Telecom, based in Littleton, Colorado, had already gained 19 percent this year through last week, including a 12 percent jump on June 13 after BrightWire reported that Level 3 had intensified takeover talks with TW Telecom.
 cable company, appease critics of its proposed takeover of No.
 “We’ll either drill it ourselves or we’ll be a prime takeover target for somebody,” Evans said in the interview.
 A few weeks ago, Morgan Stanley pitched its defense services to Allergan Inc, which was fighting a hostile takeover bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 He was also a key adviser on Comcast Corp’s $452 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc, which was announced in February.
 Drug Rejection Allergan, the drugmaker resisting a takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, slipped 27 percent to $16922.
 Still, the move comes just weeks after Deputy Prime Minister Igor Shuvalov urged Russian companies to delist from overseas bourses and trade in Moscow in an effort to safeguard them as international sanctions mount against the country after its takeover of Crimea.
 The plan allows investors to accumulate as much as 15 percent of common stock and has no impact on a takeover proposal that is acceptable to a majority of investors, American Apparel said.
 Investigators are examining whether Icahn shared information on the Clorox takeover attempt with Walters, and whether Walters subsequently shared this with Mickelson, according to AP.
 Shire, with a market value of 258 billion pounds ($439 billion), is a perennial subject of takeover speculation though this is the first time it has disclosed a formal offer.
 ‘Plugged In’ “You’re talking about someone who is very well plugged in, experienced in takeover scenarios,” Leuchten said in a telephone interview.
 senators are asking federal regulators to review the potential impact of a hostile takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 The letter cited “a growing trend in the pharmaceutical industry whereby companies make acquisitions, eliminate drug pipelines, slash R&D budgets, and arbitrage location headquarters in order to lower effective tax rates” In battling the takeover, Allergan has said Valeant’s offers undervalue the US.
 Trian, a firm run by billionaire Nelson Peltz, made a takeover offer for the retailer in 2011 in an attempt to attract other suitors.
 as it may receive takeover offers.
 The maker of Jimmy Dean sausages and Ball Park hot dogs authorized takeover talks with Tyson Foods Inc.
 For Santhera to boost sales, the drug developer could seek a takeover by a company that has access to a network of doctors who are specialized in orphan drugs, the analyst said, naming Actelion Ltd.
 The baht yesterday erased its losses since the military takeover.
 That multiple would result in a takeover price of about $27 a share for Columbus, Ohio-based Express, giving it an enterprise value of $22 billion including Sycamore’s stake.
 Tower on May 22 said it hired Greenhill & Co, under pressure from the state watchdog, to provide advice on repaying debt if the takeover collapses.
 Levine was reluctant to sell the company his father founded when another activist, billionaire Nelson Peltz’s Trian Fund Management LP, made a takeover offer in 2011.
 “This is now removed, at least for the foreseeable future” Liberum analyst Ben Bourne said that Rolls would have been able to renew a takeover bid for Helsinki-based Waertsilae post July, adding that the buyback represents a “massive vote of confidence in their cash flow,” especially coming so soon after the transaction with Daimler.
 after the directors rejected a $32 billion takeover offer.
 “We know and like him, but think that his recent track record of provocative remarks makes a deal that would involve raising billions of dollars unlikely” Still, Lululemon’s share decline has made the company an easier takeover target.
 Profitable Deal? Omar Saad, an analyst at International Strategy & Investment Group LLC, highlighted Lululemon as a potential takeover target for VF last month.
 A takeover at $50 a share could be accretive for the maker of Wrangler denim and Ella Moss dresses, he wrote.
 She said earlier this month that the company’s takeover prospects will increase if it continues to struggle this year.
 today began a tender offer to acquire the shares of Allergan Inc, the maker of Botox, the first move in its attempted hostile takeover of the drugmaker.
 Valeant’s $54 billion cash-and-stock bid partly depends on Irvine, California-based Allergan removing anti-takeover defenses triggered if any one entity gains 10 percent or more of the company’s stock.
 Medtronic said yesterday it plans to take a legal address in tax-friendly Ireland as part of a $429 billion takeover of Covidien Plc.
 We’ll use that to invest much more aggressively in the US” Under the terms of its agreement to buy Covidien, Medtronic has the right to cancel the takeover if Congress changes the tax laws in a way that results in the combined company being considered a US.
 Most of the 20 inversions carried out since 2004 have involved takeovers of companies abroad that were big enough to meet the 20 percent test.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc, the drugmaker that rejected a $117 billion takeover offer from Pfizer Inc, failed to win the backing of US.
 He also helped integrate acquisitions such as the $17 billion takeover of Imperial Chemical Industries, before supervising divestitures such as the sale of its US.
 Sadia Takeover The company’s $38 billion takeover of Sadia in 2009 led antitrust authorities to demand it cut assets.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA is negotiating with smaller German mobile providers including Freenet AG, Drillisch AG and Liberty Global Plc’s Unitymedia KabelBW as it seeks to win European Union approval for its takeover of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit, people familiar with the talks said.
 United Internet, which operates the wireless provider 1&1, is asking Telefonica Deutschland to promise sufficient availability of fast networks to its own customers after its takeover of E-Plus, one of the people said.
 The Brazilian company’s firing of JPMorgan follows at least a dozen bond sales that the bank helped manage for JBS since 2006 and a $63 billion takeover of Bertin SA in 2009 where it acted as one of JBS’s advisers.
 The acquisition of Hillshire, potentially JBS’s largest takeover since the acquisition of Bertin in 2009, would boost the company’s debt levels to at least the highest in four years.
 is nearing an agreement on a takeover price of almost $40 a share.
 T-Mobile closed yesterday at $3349, down 23 percent, after rising 65 percent in the prior 12 months on speculation of a takeover.
 That’s because the odds are “very low on getting approval” Regulators are likely to take issue with allowing a takeover of T-Mobile, the carrier that the Justice Department’s Bill Baer has said “spearheaded” increased competition in the industry, according to MoffettNathanson.
 It took about four months for the Committee on Foreign Investment in the US, or CFIUS, to approve WH Group Ltd’s purchase of Smithfield Foods, the biggest Chinese takeover of an American company.
 Dublin-based Shire has been speculated as a takeover candidate because of the $35 billion company’s Irish tax base and focus on fast-growing rare-disease treatments.
 Shire was still among European companies that event-driven traders said may receive takeover interest this year, according to a Bloomberg survey in January.
 At Lee’s estimated takeover valuation of about $45 a share, a deal for NPS would cost Shire almost $5 billion.
 “Given Family Dollar’s significant underperformance relative to its dollar store peers, its languishing stock price and the greater activist interest, the company is likely to have a tougher time defending itself today” Last month, as Icahn was quietly amassing his position, Family Dollar’s price-sales ratio dropped to 062, the lowest since 2010, as takeover speculation faded, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 A takeover would enable AbbVie to access Shire’s growing stable of treatments for rare diseases, and allow it to redomicile in a country with a lower tax rate.
 “We are excited about building it out because it is global and it fits with the customers we already have” OpenTable Shareholders The takeover price is 53 percent more than OpenTable’s average stock price in the prior 20 days.
 OpenTable also agreed not to solicit other takeover offers.
 ‘Difficult’ Market A majority of Parliament indicated they support the plans, Dijsselbloem said today, adding he would brief lawmakers again if ASR will play a part in the takeover of Reaal.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- The takeover battle for Hillshire Brands Co, the biggest maker of breakfast sausage and hotdogs in the US, came down to a game of chicken.
 Early Target Hillshire was a possible takeover target even while a part of the former Sara Lee Corp.
 said in a regulatory filing last week that it had commitments from banks including Barclays Plc, Royal Bank of Canada and Deutsche Bank AG to arrange a $12 billion junk-bond offering and another $7 billion in term loans to help fund its attempted takeover of Botox maker Allergan Inc.
 Banks also earn fees from private-equity firms for giving them advice on takeovers and taking companies they own public.
 College is poised for significant growth” The company was “not necessarily” considering the possibility of a takeover in deciding to separate the businesses, Huseby said.
 Three weeks earlier, Sheikh Hamad’s Al Mirqab Capital SPC vehicle made a takeover offer for Jersey-based Heritage Oil Plc.
 The takeover must clear a government antitrust review and DirecTV’s successful renewal of rights to the National Football League’s Sunday Ticket package, a $4 billion smorgasbord of American pigskin that is one of the satellite television operator’s most-important assets.
 Options Trading Implied volatility, the key measure of options prices, for both sank to the lowest on record after the takeover bid was announced in May.
 His perspective was shaped by Time’s 1990 fusion with Warner Communications, and the combined company’s takeover by America Online Inc.
 Britt and his successor as CEO, Rob Marcus, had fended off a rival takeover effort from Charter Communications Inc, backed by billionaire John Malone.
 The previous year, the company completed its largest acquisition since the 2009 spinoff: a $3 billion takeover of the Insight Communications Co.
 Relativity recently made takeover attempts for digital video network Maker Studios, since bought by Walt Disney Co, and had talks with Fullscreen Inc.
 Final talks on price and terms may lead to a deal within days that ranks as the biggest takeover of an overseas firm by a Japanese life insurer, Nikkei said in an English-language version of its article, without saying where it got the information.
 won’t increase a takeover bid for Aquila Resources Ltd.
 In a separate statement, HanKore said the deal is a reverse takeover.
 Before GE announced the Alstom deal, the government passed legislation extending its ability to block foreign takeovers in energy, transportation and health care.
 The Federal Reserve has delayed M&T Bank Corp’s takeover of Hudson City Bancorp Inc.
 takeover rules whether it will proceed with an offer by July 24, the Unterpremstaetten, Austria-based company said today.
 More than $10 billion of mergers and acquisitions in the semiconductor industry have been announced this year, led by Analog Devices Inc’s takeover of Hittite Microwave Corp.
 is closer to gaining a slice of a planned A$74 billion ($69 billion) iron ore project in Australia after knocking out a rival in a takeover battle.
 Baosteel turned up the pressure on Aquila last week by saying it wouldn’t raise its offer after Mineral Resources crashed the takeover by taking a 128 percent stake in Aquila.
 earlier this week revealed a $465 billion takeover bid for Shire in the first public acquisition approach for the specialty drugmaker after years of takeover speculation.
 Shire may warrant as much as $260 a share in a takeover, 36 percent higher than the US.
 “There’s certainly going to be a lot of people interested, so ultimately I would think that there’s a price that allows for a deal to get done” Shire is the latest takeover target in a record wave of health-care mergers this quarter.
 There have been about $230 billion of deals proposed or announced in the industry since the end of March, including Medtronic Inc’s purchase of Covidien Plc this month and Merck & Co’s takeover of Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 takeover rules, the company has until July 18 to make a firm offer or will go into a waiting period where it can’t do so for as long as six months.
 Valeant this month began a tender offer for Allergan shares, the first move in its attempted hostile takeover of the Botox-maker.
 corporate taxes earlier this year when AstraZeneca Plc rejected its takeover advances.
 Swisscom’s takeover of PubliGroupe and the partnership sought between Swisscom and Tamedia will be subject to approval by the Federal Competition Commission, Swisscom said in its statement.
 Monsanto announced a $10 billion stock buyback plan and an intention to repurchase $6 billion of shares on an accelerated basis after ending preliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that would have cut its tax bill.
 The drugmaker rallied 78 percent in the past three days amid speculation that it is a takeover target.
 The investment vehicle was set up in 2007 as Telecom Italia sought to fend off a takeover bid by AT&T Inc.
 Try Again? Shiseido Co, the Tokyo-based owner of BareMinerals and Nars, is a possible suitor for the Elizabeth Arden brand, while New York-based Coty Inc, the $65 billion company that attempted a takeover of Avon Products Inc.
 A&L Goodbody advised Medtronic on Irish takeover rules with a team that included partners Cian McCourt, Alan Casey and Mark Ward, corporate: Seamus O’Croinin, finance; and Peter Maher and Paul Fahy, tax.
 The takeover will boost earnings in the first full year, the exchange said.
 Pearson today outlined his four-step plan for the hostile takeover.
 On June 12, the hedge fund filed a lawsuit asking a Delaware Court to rule that such a meeting won’t trigger anti-takeover measures by Allergan.
 Ongoing clinical studies and initial sales of DermaPure over the next year or two could lead to Tissue Regenix becoming a takeover target, Martin Brunninger, an analyst at Jefferies International Ltd.
 Before settling on Covidien, Medtronic was also evaluating a takeover of London-based Smith & Nephew Plc, people familiar with the matter said earlier this month.
 Dissolving Telco, which was set up in 2007 as Telecom Italia sought to fend off a takeover bid by AT&T Inc.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Hillshire Brands Co, the target of a takeover offer from Tyson Foods Inc, may have to pay a $2613 million break fee if it agrees to the deal and then rejects it for a higher bid from elsewhere.
 “This work must take its course while starting delivery of development, maintenance and products to the Swedish market” The takeover is the result of a long-standing disagreement between Essen, Germany-based ThyssenKrupp and Sweden’s defense materials agency, FMV.
 Buffett bought General Re in 1998 for $177 billion in what was then his largest takeover.
 Icahn’s unsolicited takeover bid for the maker of cleaning products in 2011.
 Woolworths offered A$4 a share in a takeover announced that date.
 His Australian Retail Investments vehicle, which holds his 119 percent Country Road stake, has clashed with Woolworths since losing out to the South African company in a 1997 takeover battle for the chain.
 Moir, a former chief executive of Country Road, wants to take on fast-fashion retailers such as Inditex SA and Hennes & Mauritz AB through his takeover of David Jones, Australia’s largest department-store chain by market value.
 The move comes after Moody’s Investors Service, which already has a negative outlook on JBS’s Ba3 rating, warned the takeover would have negative implications following a $56 billion bid from Pilgrim’s last week.
 Men’s Wearhouse agreed in March to buy its smaller competitor for about $18 billion in cash after a five-month takeover battle.
 MGM emerged from bankruptcy in December 2010 and in July 2012 filed for a possible initial public offering after spurning a takeover bid from Lions Gate Entertainment Corp.
 Tyson said in a statement announcing its bid that the takeover would add to its earnings per share in the first full year after the deal’s completion.
 competitor seeks to prevent a hostile takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 “The fact that Allergan’s largest shareholder is agitating for a Valeant takeover strongly suggests it would not support a spoiling move by Allergan,” Clark said.
 rose to a record amid speculation of a takeover.
 Theflyonthewallcom reported “renewed takeover chatter” today on the company.
 Petroamerica expects production to rise to 20,000 barrels a day, from about 6,500 barrels now, as the takeover gives the company access to the southern Putumayo Basin in Colombia, Chief Executive Officer Nelson Navarrete said in an interview from his Bogota office today.
 While seeking more acquisitions to increase production, the company is also open to takeover offers from potential suitors, he said.
 rejected the drug maker’s second takeover bid.
 The agreement will be effective only if the European Commission clears the E-Plus takeover, with a decision expected next month, it said.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Concordia Healthcare Corp, the best-performing stock on the Toronto Stock Exchange this year, says it’s a takeover target for companies seeking lower taxes and has already turned down one offer.
 “Our structure, it’s as good as you’re going to get” for drug companies seeking a so-called tax inversion takeover.
 The New York-based company, now the object of a takeover bid by largest cable company Comcast, told the FCC the dispute shows the need to “stem the mounting harm” caused by fee disputes including “constant threats of blackouts” Many stations are adapting to technological changes.
 Winters based his allegations on media reports, which suggest Buffett is considering a buyout of Coca-Cola with private-equity firm 3G Capital, using their takeover of HJ.
 In a separate interview with Bloomberg News today, Winters said that a Coca-Cola buyout is “possible” even if the chance of a takeover is low.
 Another Fung family company has already bought about 77 percent of the Reef Casino Trust as part of a A$214 million takeover.
 After plunging to the bottom of Acadian’s list of 23 emerging equity markets in mid-March amid President Vladimir Putin’s takeover of Crimea, Russia is now the most attractive developing-nation for the Boston-based investment adviser.
 jumped to a record high on speculation the global oil and natural gas producer may be on the brink of a takeover.
 Anadarko climbed 42 percent to $10832 at the close in New York after Theflyonthewallcom reported “takeover chatter” today surrounding The Woodlands, Texas-based company.
 crashed a takeover by China’s Baosteel Group Corp.
 Mineral Resources, which today filed notice of its purchase of a 128 percent stake in takeover target Aquila Resources Ltd, said it wants to ensure the project in Western Australia goes into production as soon as possible.
 sued to block its takeover by AT&T.
 Dallas-based AT&T plans to finance the cash portion of the takeover through “opportunistic debt market transactions,” as well as asset sales, loans and existing holdings of cash, it said in a May 18 statement.
 Before GE announced the Alstom deal, France passed legislation extending the government’s ability to block foreign takeovers into the fields of energy, transport and health care.
June 6 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA is relying on a deal with three smaller rivals in Germany to win European Union antitrust approval for its takeover of E-Plus, after talks broke down over an accord with one of the country’s biggest virtual mobile operators, three people familiar with the matter said.
 The seed producer announced the stock buyback plan to boost investor returns after ending preliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that would have cut its tax bill.
 is considering raising its takeover bid for Shire Plc a fourth time after the European drugmaker rejected its latest offer for about $465 billion, said two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Bought by Imperial Tobacco in 2008 as part of its takeover of cigarette maker Altadis SA, Logista distributes goods from customers including tobacco producers and pharmaceutical companies.
 The maker of Gauloises cigarettes inherited a 596 percent stake in Logista at the time of the 126 billion-euro Altadis takeover and later bought the rest in a deal that valued the logistics company at 23 billion euros.
 Allergan is forcing a hostile takeover attempt by not engaging in talks, Valeant said today, responding to the latest rejection.
 The Irvine, California-based company today said it has rejected a $54 billion takeover bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, saying it was too low.
 In 2005, France passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 Montebourg, an admirer of Louis XIV’s dirigiste finance minister Jean-Baptiste Colbert, signed a decree in May giving authorities the power to block foreign takeovers in the energy industry, just weeks after GE made its binding offer to Alstom on April 30.
June 20 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG and its partners improved their offer for Alstom SA, valuing the French company’s energy assets at 146 billion euros ($199 billion) and raising the stakes in the takeover battle with General Electric Co.
 To fund them, buyers are using a little creative thinking and a lot of common stock to fuel the best quarter for global takeovers since 2007.
 For buyers with public listings, all-cash offers made up about one-third of the takeovers announced in the second quarter, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 European Shift European buyers have made the biggest shift away from cash, the data show, with all-cash purchases falling to just 28 percent of the $88 billion of takeovers announced by public companies during the quarter, compared with 68 percent from 2008 to 2013.
 is resisting a $542 billion takeover bid by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 The other is that the board used the old allegations as leverage to force Charney out and make American Apparel a more attractive takeover target.
 Dai-ichi’s takeover is the biggest foreign acquisition by a Japanese life insurer, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 takeover by a Japanese company in the past 12 months, the data showed.
 Monsanto announced a $10billion stock buyback plan and an intention to repurchase $6billion of shares on an accelerated basis after endingpreliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that wouldhave cut its tax bill.
 CIT has drawn takeover speculation, and Thain has said the logic of selling to a larger bank is “obvious” Thain bought 40,000 shares of CIT on May 15 at $4154, 48 cents above the stock’s 52-week low, boosting his total holdings to 443,000.
 Glencore’s financing replaces $173 billion of loans signed last June after its takeover of Xstrata Plc, the company said in today’s statement.
 In 2005, France passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 “There has to be a reckoning” The decision was one in a series reining in the conflicts of banks and investment firms in takeovers.
 With pressure mounting on the government to delay a decision on the proposed takeover of BSkyB, the UK’s biggest pay-television broadcaster, Prime Minister David Cameron announced July 6 there would be an inquiry into the hacking scandal, which he called “absolutely disgusting” Opposition leader Ed Miliband joined the clamor for Brooks to step down.
 This is not true” Valeant, which has offered $542 billion for Allergan, traded lower for a ninth straight day and is now worth less than when its takeover attempt began.
 Ackman’s Efforts Valeant, backed by Ackman, started a takeover bid on April 22, and has raised that offer twice, including their most recent offer of $72 a share in cash and 083 a share of Valeant stock.
 and said a $77 billion takeover bid from Tyson Foods Inc.
 While Shire said last week it has rejected three offers, including the latest, two people with knowledge of the matter said on June 20 that North Chicago, Illinois-based AbbVie, a company yet to define its corporate style after splitting from Abbott, is considering raising its takeover bid again.
 “This is not a tall order” It’s also a target at the center of the company’s defense against a takeover.
 The brewer is a possible takeover target, according to speculation cited by the Financial Times.
 slid 07 percent to $16309 after the Botox maker’s board unanimously rejected a takeover offer from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 While bears say the military takeover has failed to resolve conflicts that led to more than six months of political deadlock, Thai money managers are betting the junta will fast-track measures needed to bolster an economy that contracted by 06 percent in the first quarter.
 Sycamore, which has amassed a 99 percent stake in Express, said in a letter to the retailer’s board that it would like to perform due diligence to determine a takeover price.
 Less than two hours after Sycamore disclosed its letter, Express posted a response saying it was adopting an anti-takeover plan.
 A bridge loan can be taken out quickly by a loan, bond or equity issuance” Thai retailer CP All Pcl signed an 819 billion baht ($25 billion) facility in March to help repay a bridge loan for its acquisition of Siam Makro Pcl last year, the country’s biggest ever takeover.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Uncle Sam may not be a fan of cross-border takeovers that allow US.
 Medtronic Inc, a Minneapolis-based medical-device maker, is the latest and largest company to say it will renounce its American address as part of its planned $429 billion takeover of Dublin-based Covidien Plc.
 and Actavis Plc have taken advantage of lower tax bills to pursue additional takeovers.
 Exane BNP Paribas analyst Yohann Terry in a report this month identified 33 European companies including London-based medical-device maker Smith & Nephew Plc and Hikma Pharmaceuticals Plc as potential takeover targets for US.
 Hostile Takeovers Leitao also distanced himself from measures -- announced by the previous government in February -- aimed at protecting homegrown businesses from hostile takeovers.
 AstraZeneca shares rose as much as 14 percent to 4,34450 pence in London trading, the highest level since May 22, four days before Pfizer abandoned its takeover bid.
 A veterinarian by training, he said he preferred spending his days at scientific meetings rather than plotting takeover defense with investment bankers.
 are part of a group that offered a $23 billion loan, along with a rival restructuring plan, and NextEra’s takeover of Energy Future’s profitable unit, Oncor.
 The takeover plan puts a $175 billion value on the electricity company, lawyers said in court today.
 Without endorsing NextEra’s proposals, State Senator Troy Fraser said in an interview that most Texans would be “comfortable” with an Oncor takeover by NextEra because the company operates in the state and tends to hold assets rather than flip them.
 “We know and like him, but think that his recent track record of provocative remarks makes a deal that would involve raising billions of dollars unlikely” Still, Lululemon’s share decline has made the company an easier takeover target.
 Profitable Deal? Omar Saad, an analyst at International Strategy & Investment Group LLC, highlighted Lululemon as a potential takeover target for VF last month.
 A takeover at $50 a share could be accretive for the maker of Wrangler denim and Ella Moss dresses, he wrote.
 She said earlier this month that the company’s takeover prospects will increase if it continues to struggle this year.
 “Clearly there are options around that business” Imperial is planning to sell as much as 30 percent of its stake in Logista, a distributor of goods to gas stations and other outlets across Europe that it acquired as part of its 2008 takeover of Altadis SA.
 It’s not that Danaher doesn’t have resources for a takeover: Chief Financial Officer Daniel Comas suggested last month it may have as much as $12 billion for a deal.
 Almost a year later, it has yet to do a sizable deal and management has indicated that takeover capacity has increased to about $12 billion, according to Citigroup.
 While Danaher has made attempts at takeovers recently, it has yet to be successful.
 Chasing Targets Higher equity valuations have also made the pursuit of takeover targets pricier.
 There are possible takeover targets for Danaher.
 In 2005, France passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 Montebourg, an admirer of Louis XIV’s dirigiste finance minister Jean-Baptiste Colbert, signed a decree in May giving authorities the power to block foreign takeovers in the energy industry, just weeks after GE made its binding offer to Alstom on April 30.
 authorized takeover talks with Tyson Foods Inc.
 takeover.
 Pilgrim’s Pride said today it expects cost savings from the proposed takeover to exceed $300 million annually, and that the purchase would boost earnings per share immediately.
 Sara Lee In 2011, Batista said he had been in takeover talks with Sara Lee earlier that year.
 Hillshire’s bid for Pinnacle had disappointed some shareholders including activist investor and Hillshire holder Eminence Capital LLC, which opposed the takeover and supported the proposal from Pilgrim’s.
 jumped at least 40 percent during the busiest period of takeovers in seven years.
 on Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s $54 billion hostile takeover bid, as well as to medical-device maker Covidien Plc on its $46 billion acquisition by Medtronic Inc.
 as it faces a potential takeover.
 Hill, who joined Blackstone after engaging in some of the biggest takeover battles of the 1980s, owns 174 million shares of the alternative-asset manager, according to filings with the US.
 He became a “steely M&A gladiator who’d been in the thick of some of the most memorable hostile takeover battles of the 1980s, siding with Federated Department Stores in its defense against Robert Campeau and working with Ross Johnson, the CEO of RJR Nabisco, in the fight for control there,” according to “King of Capital: The Remarkable Rise, Fall and Rise Again of Steve Schwarzman and Blackstone” by Bloomberg News’s David Carey and John E.
 in 1983, American Stores’ $25 billion takeover of Lucky Stores in 1988, and Time Inc’s $14 billion merger with Warner Communications in 1989.
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- Pinnacle Foods Inc’s moment as a pricey takeover target is slipping away.
 Those plans were disrupted when Hillshire itself received takeover bids that may be too good to pass up, spurring bets that the Pinnacle purchase is dead.
 That would have made it the most expensive food takeover since the financial crisis, according to data compiled by Bloomberg based on transactions larger than $5 billion.
 Investigators are examining whether Icahn shared information on the Clorox takeover attempt with Walters, and whether Walters then shared it with Mickelson, the person said.
 Diana DeSocio, a spokeswoman for Baupost, declined to comment on the Idenix takeover.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- ArcelorMittal, the world’s largest steelmaker, welcomed the potential removal of a near 10-year block on overseas takeovers in China’s steel industry.
 Excluding acquisition costs, the takeover will immediately add to earnings, PPG said.
 Loss Widened Hapag-Lloyd’s first-quarter loss widened as the takeover of Chilean rival Cia.
 Behrendt, echoing recent comments that Hapag-Lloyd is open for further cooperations after completing the CSAV-takeover, said that “size matters” in container shipping.
 The medical-device maker is evaluating a takeover of London-based Smith & Nephew Plc that could see the US.
 Bought by Imperial Tobacco in 2008 as part of its takeover of cigarette maker Altadis SA, Logista distributes goods from customers including tobacco producers and pharmaceutical companies.
 Imperial, the maker of Gauloises cigarettes inherited a 596 percent stake in Logista at the time of the 126 billion-euro Altadis takeover and later bought the rest in a deal that valued the logistics company at 23 billion euros.
 (PFE)’s 694 billion pound ($117 billion) takeover bid last month.
 may make a higher takeover offer after the Dublin-based drugmaker rejected a bid of as much as 273 billion pounds ($465 billion).
 AbbVie is considering raising its takeover offer and presenting its case to Shire’s shareholders, the two people said.
 AbbVie said late yesterday that Shire’s board turned down three takeover proposals, the latest for an indicative price of 4626 pounds a share.
 to prepare for potential takeover offers.
 He doesn’t see Banco Espirito Santo becoming a takeover target.
 Rometty has boosted the company’s investment in cloud services to lure customers to its SoftLayer unit, which IBM acquired last year for $2 billion in its biggest takeover since 1995.
 Takeover Investigators are examining whether Icahn shared information on the Clorox takeover attempt with Walters, and whether Walters then shared it with Mickelson, the person said.
 IAG closed a deal to buy Deutsche Lufthansa AG’s UK-based BMI in 2012, securing scarce operating slots at BA’s London Heathrow base, and completed its takeover of Vueling last year.
 The first-day glitch came amid a push by Russia to get local companies to reduce their dependence on overseas exchanges as the country faces international sanctions over its takeover of Ukraine’s southern Crimea region.
 Utility stocks in the S&P 500 have climbed 15 percent since the beginning of the year as electricity providers have attracted almost $50 billion in takeover offers this quarter.
 may be the industry’s next target in a record run of takeovers.
 Any deal would follow about $190 billion of global drug and medical-products takeovers this quarter, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 A spokeswoman for Cipla declined to comment on any potential takeover.
 “They are entering new markets in the Middle East and Africa” Shares of Cipla had climbed 79 percent through yesterday since May 8, when India’s Mint newspaper reported that Petach Tikva, Israel-based Teva, the world’s largest generic drugmaker, is pursuing Cipla with a takeover offer of as much as $6 billion.
 That’s the highest profit multiple offered in any Australian retail takeover, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 It’s also more than twice the median profit multiple of 9 for those takeovers.
 More Cash For AT&T, the deal provides more cash as the phone company completes its $485 billion takeover of DirecTV, the largest satellite-TV company in the US.
 “They haven’t really made a big acquisition in the last few years and they need more fuel in the tank” The acquisition of Micros would be Oracle’s largest since the $57 billion takeover of Sun Microsystems Inc, announced in 2009, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Shining Light Omar Saad of International Strategy & Investment Group LLC highlighted Lululemon as a potential takeover target for VF last month.
 A takeover at $50 a share, a 29 percent premium to yesterday’s close, could be accretive for the maker of Wrangler denim and Ella Moss dresses, he wrote.
 may also be interested in adding Lululemon’s tank tops and yoga pants to its athletic lineup, according to Jennifer Black, chief executive officer at Lake Oswego, Oregon-based Jennifer Black & Associates LLC, who said the company’s takeover prospects will increase if it continues to struggle this year.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Henkel AG agreed to buy France’s Spotless Group SAS for 940 million euros ($13 billion) as the maker of Loctite glue and Persil detergent overcame concerns about overpriced deals to seal its second takeover in a week.
 The 940 million-euro takeover, which is all-cash and includes debt, represents 121 times earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization.
 In the original game, animal characters called Toons tried to prevent the takeover of their town by corporate robots called Cogs.
 In 2005, France passed an anti-takeover decree amid speculation PepsiCo Inc.
 Montebourg, an admirer of Louis XIV’s dirigiste finance minister Jean-Baptiste Colbert, signed a decree in May giving authorities the power to block foreign takeovers in the energy industry, just weeks after GE made its binding offer to Alstom on April 30.
 That could put it in a good position to purchase MillerCoors from its joint venture with SABMiller Plc if Anheuser-Busch InBev NV proceeds with a takeover bid for SABMiller, Holland at Societe Generale said.
 Express, based in Columbus, Ohio, responded by adopting an anti-takeover plan that hinders shareholders from acquiring 10 percent or more of the company without the board’s consent.
 AstraZeneca last month rejected a takeover offer valued at 55 pounds a share.
 is wooing OpenTable shareholders with tops any other large takeover of an Internet stock in North America since 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Along with OpenTable, Yelp was among companies that analysts last month told Bloomberg News were takeover possibilities after technology stocks slumped about 20 percent in two months earlier this year.
 An unexpected takeover offer drives the stock price up though, forcing short sellers to pay up to repurchase the shares they borrowed.
 The plan allows investors to accumulate as much as 15 percent of common stock and has no impact on a takeover proposal that is acceptable to a majority of investors, American Apparel said.
June 13 (Bloomberg) -- Allergan Inc’s biggest investor, an affiliate of Pershing Square Capital Management LLP, asked a court to rule that its call for a special shareholder meeting to remove most of the drugmaker’s board won’t trigger an anti-takeover defense.
 PS Fund sued Allergan yesterday in Delaware, asking a judge to rule that the move won’t trigger the company’s “poison pill” defense against takeovers.
 The plan allows shareholders to buy large amounts of stock at a discount if anyone obtains 10 percent of the company, making a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Shire Plc shareholders deserve a higher price than AbbVie Inc is offering given the company’s growth prospects, Shire’s chief executive officer said as he began making the case to investors for spurning the $465 billion takeover offer.
 The acquisition would be Oracle’s largest since the $57 billion takeover of Sun Microsystems Inc.
 “It’s rate base growth,” Wisconsin Energy Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Gale Klappa said today on a conference call when asked about the reason for the takeover.
 meat company, may have its credit rating cut by Standard & Poor’s because it will have to take on more debt to finance its proposed $77 billion takeover of Hillshire Brands Inc.
 In a sign animal spirits are returning, takeovers so far this year have totaled about $15 trillion, the most since 2007, led by Comcast Corp’s $68 billion acquisition of rival Time Warner Cable Inc.
 of Saskatchewan suspended a proposed takeover of Israel Chemicals opposed by Finance Minister Yair Lapid.
 And some investors may be betting that Molson Coors itself is a takeover target.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- AbbVie Inc, which was rejected on three different takeover offers for Shire Plc, may have to raise its bid to about 30 billion pounds ($51 billion) to persuade the drugmaker’s board to sell.
 Stronger Case The ruling could force a takeover bid to rise above 55 pounds a share, Barclays analyst Dani Saurymper said in a note to investors today.
 “I would imagine that if you have a premium company, you would expect -- without commenting on any expectation of price -- you would also expect a premium” A takeover would give AbbVie, which is dependent on the rheumatoid arthritis drug Humira for sales growth, access to Shire’s growing stable of treatments for rare diseases and may allow it to redomicile in a country with a lower tax rate than the US.
 is considering raising its takeover bid for Shire Plc a fourth time after the European drugmaker rejected its latest offer for about $465 billion, said two people with knowledge of the matter.
 A takeover would allow AbbVie access to Shire’s growing stable of treatments for rare diseases and may allow it to redomicile in a country with a much lower tax rate than the US.
 AbbVie’s bid is the first public admission of interest after years of takeover speculation on Shire.
 “It’s a board decision, of course, but I think the board is quite confident in the management” The drugmaker, with a market value of 128 billion Swiss francs ($143 billion), is a perennial subject of takeover speculation.
 considered making a takeover offer in 2010.
 as it may receive takeover offers.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- Hamilton Insurance Group Ltd, the reinsurer that counts Sanford “Sandy” Weill as its chairman, hired Bob Deutsch as chief strategy officer to lead an expansion that could include takeovers.
 Monsanto recently explored a takeover of Syngenta in a transaction that would have allowed the world’s largest seed company to move its tax location from the US.
 is undervalued by Merck & Co’s $39 billion takeover offer, a shareholder said in a lawsuit seeking to block the deal.
 Years before last week’s trades, transactions took place in Clorox contracts prior to takeover announcements by Carl Icahn that are now piquing the interest of federal regulators, a person familiar with the matter said.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- M&T Bank Corp, whose takeover of Hudson City Bancorp Inc.
 M&T’s money-laundering controls have stalled its takeover of Paramus, New Jersey-based Hudson City, the biggest pending US.
 The termination of the Pinnacle merger agreement allows Tyson to complete its $77 billion takeover of Hillshire.
 “The possibility they’re seeking a seat at the table or some bargaining leverage is just as plausible as a takeover offer” Aquila climbed 34 percent to close at A$361 in Sydney trading, the highest since May 2012.
 With Hillshire likely out of reach, the takeover options for JBS and its Pilgrim’s unit are limited, Jose Yordan, an analyst at Deutsche Bank, wrote in a report this week.
 Sanderson Farms’ focus on meat processing, a more commoditized business, means a takeover probably wouldn’t yield as many ways to boost revenue and cut costs for a buyer like Pilgrim’s, Feng said.
 ABN Amro, one of Europe’s biggest banks a decade ago, was broken up after a record 719 billion-euro takeover by Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc, Fortis and Banco Santander SA in 2007.
 McKenna, 43, will be based in New York and lead a new team focused on global events including corporate takeovers, divestitures, and management changes to generate returns, according to a memo dated June 9 provided by the company.
 agreed with Pershing Square Capital Management LP that a call for a special shareholder meeting to replace part of the drugmaker’s board won’t trigger a “poison pill” takeover defense.
 To call the meeting, Pershing Square, Valeant and other backers of a takeover need support from 25 percent of Allergan shareholders, Arfaei said.
 Allergan’s anti-takeover provision allows shareholders to buy large amounts of stock at a discount if anyone obtains 10 percent of the company, making a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive.
 Adding value to the current drug could open the company up to a takeover bid, said Joshua Schimmer, a Piper Jaffray & Co.
 sued to block its takeover by AT&T.
 He has remained at the top of Germany’s Commerzbank AG since 2008 even after an ill-fated takeover, a record loss and a writedown on Greek debt.
 He hung onto his post after leading a costly takeover of Dresdner Bank in August 2008 and surviving a record loss of 454 billion euros in 2009 and a 223 billion-euro writedown on Greek debt in 2011.
 The exchange said the takeover will boost earnings in the first full year.
 Health-care companies in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index jumped 08 percent to help lead the advance amid a takeover offer for Shire Plc.
 is considering raising its takeover bid for Shire Plc a fourth time after the European drugmaker rejected its latest offer for about $465 billion, said two people with knowledge of the matter.
 announced its largest stock buyback plan to boost investor returns after the seed company ended preliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that would have cut its tax bill.
 Mecom Group Plc jumped 33 percent after agreeing to a takeover offer from De Persgroep NV.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- Elizabeth Arden Inc, the perfume maker that has attracted takeover interest from rivals, fell in New York trading after saying it will eliminate some jobs and shut its Puerto Rico affiliate.
 completed its $67 billion takeover of Ralcorp Holdings Inc.
 We continue to believe that our balanced combination of a significant branded, large private brand, and important commercial food business positions us to win in the marketplace and deliver sustainable, profitable growth for our shareholders” Before the takeover of Ralcorp was announced on Nov.
 Almost $18 billion of takeovers of North American food companies were announced in May, including Hillshire Brands Co’s now-dead offer for Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Fusion-io has long been the subject of takeover speculation dating back to at least a Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Atticus Capital LLC, Deutsche Boerse’s biggest shareholder at the time of the ISE purchase, said the takeover would erode shareholder value, and some analysts said the exchange may have paid too much.
 approached in April with a A$305 billion ($29 billion) takeover bid, wrote off about 8 percent of its assets amid a business review.
 Removing the value of brands that Chief Executive Officer Michael Clarke has vowed to winnow will tighten the focus on Treasury’s earnings potential and inventory of cellared wine amid the takeover interest.
 The baht today erased its losses since the military takeover.
 Litt is pushing for the sale of Associated less than a year after he started a takeover attempt of BRE Properties Inc, a San Francisco-based apartment building landlord that was later sold to Essex Property Trust Inc.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Medtronic Inc, the largest maker of heart rhythm devices, is evaluating a takeover of London-based Smith & Nephew Plc that could see the US.
 takeover rules, AbbVie has until July 18 to make a firm offer or walk away.
 Tyson said today that the takeover would “marginally” add to its earnings per share in the first full year after the deal’s completion.
 (ABBV) is considering raising its takeover offer for drugmaker Shire Plc (SHP) a fourth time, and presenting its case to Shire’s shareholders after the company rejected a $465 billion bid recently, said two people with knowledge of the matter.
 “Monte Paschi has now a more solid balance sheet and can offer an interesting return, making it a possible takeover target” Chief Executive Officer Fabrizio Viola and Chairman Alessandro Profumo are seeking to revamp Monte Paschi after a decade of missteps brought Italy’s third-largest lender to its knees.
 Past speculation about a possible takeover by competitors such as BNP Paribas SA and Santander may come back given the renewed interest for peripheral countries and Italy’s improved economic outlook, according to Girola.
June 27 (Bloomberg) -- Liberty Global Plc, the European cable company controlled by billionaire John Malone, plans to name Baptiest Coopmans as head of Ziggo NV after its takeover of the Dutch cable operator for about $7 billion.
 Coopmans, 49, now head of Liberty’s Dutch operations, will become Ziggo’s chief executive officer when the offer is declared unconditional, a step in the takeover process, Liberty said today in a statement.
 The cable operator said it has filed takeover documents to Dutch and European regulators to gain approval.
 The takeover proposal came to light in a June 23 filing in US.
 Management Incentives Investors tend to favor accelerated vesting, a type of “golden parachute,” because it encourages executives to remain neutral and actively cooperate in a takeover, even if a deal means losing their jobs, said Erik Gordon, a professor at the Ross School of Business at the University of Michigan.
 “Essentially what you’re doing is incentivizing the CEO to get the best possible deal for the shareholders” Avon rejected a $10 billion takeover bid from Coty in April 2012, saying it undervalued the company.
 Even so, the Avon board’s support of incentives for management in the event of a takeover means the company is at least keeping a sale an option, said Gordon of the University of Michigan.
 “He has a track record” Family Dollar has been the subject of takeover speculation since another activist investor, Nelson Peltz, made an unsolicited bid in 2011 in an attempt to attract other suitors.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Volkswagen AG, Europe’s biggest carmaker, sold 2 billion euros ($27 billion) in preferred stock to fund the takeover of Swedish truckmaker Scania AB.
 Net Liquidity VW controlled 626 percent of Scania when it made the bid for a full takeover in February.
 NPS hasn’t been approached about a potential takeover, the company said today in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 Local Opinion Harper’s government has taken into account local public opinion in the past on major resource-related decisions, including his rejection of the takeover of Canada’s largest potash producer and more recently his move to slow investment by state-owned enterprises in the nation’s oil sands.
 “This work must take its course while starting delivery of development, maintenance and products to the Swedish market” The takeover is the result of a long-standing disagreement between Essen, Germany-based ThyssenKrupp and Sweden’s defense materials agency, FMV.
 The takeover is subject to regulatory approval from the Norwegian Competition Authority which is anticipated at the latest in the first quarter of 2015, according to the companies.
 companies switch their addresses to low-tax nations like Ireland, often through a takeover of a smaller company, reducing their tax bills while typically keeping their headquarters and listings in the US.
 By last year, a new group of companies, especially drugmakers, were using takeovers to adopt foreign addresses, with tax-friendly Ireland the new preferred corporate home.
 The $63-a-share takeover of Hillshire is anticipated to close by Sept.
 Higher Price Between April and May, DirecTV’s White persuaded Stephenson to raise the takeover price from the $85 a share in cash and stock originally offered on April 22, according to the filing.
 “The market is going wild” Too Rich While content providers such as Scripps and AMC have been considered takeover targets for years, they still haven’t been bought.
 Consolidation Wave Almost $200 billion of media acquisitions have been announced this year, including Comcast’s purchase of Time Warner Cable and AT&T Inc’s takeover of DirecTV, both valued at more than $65 billion including debt.
 Telefonica must sell as much as 30 percent of the merged carrier’s network capacity to one or several virtual operators before it can close the takeover, EU regulators said in a statement today.
 The EU decision caps almost a year of uncertainty for Telefonica’s 855 billion-euro ($117 billion) takeover of E-Plus.
 Wholesale Deals The acquisition is Telefonica’s biggest since its $31 billion takeover of O2 Plc in 2005.
 AB InBev faces slowing growth and a dearth of other big takeover targets, making a deal seem more probable.
 Some investors may be betting that Molson Coors itself is a takeover target, Swinburn suggested.
 surged after rejecting a takeover bid.
 The takeover is expected to be completed by year-end, subject to regulatory approvals.
 company’s revised takeover offer of 5320 pounds ($9107) a share subject to the satisfactory resolution of other terms of the bid.
 The bull market is also stoking competition from public companies, which are becoming dealmakers by financing takeovers with stock.
 The perennial takeover candidate still screens as such.
 Fox delivered its formal takeover proposal of $85 a share later in June.
 Salamone filed a suit July 10 challenging Gorman’s takeover bid, saying the controlling shareholder of Tejas’s parent is improperly seeking to amend Westech’s bylaws to allow shareholders to remove directors and executives.
 The takeover effort comes more than a month after Noble, based in Dover, Delaware, found Gorman failed to honor a voting-rights agreement by installing his slate of Westech directors and improperly removing an existing board member.
 Noble’s May 30 ruling didn’t resolve the question of who controls Westech and Tejas, and that led to Gorman’s takeover bid, Salamone said.
 In recent years Lufthansa has stressed that takeovers are no longer a strategic goal.
 A judge in Delaware responded to dissident lenders’ show of opposition by forcing talks on a rival deal, which includes an Oncor takeover that values the unit at more than $175 billion, offered by a group including Morgan Stanley and NextEra Energy Inc.
 Shire said its board would meet to discuss the takeover offer.
 Munich-based Siemens has been preparing a possible takeover for many months, the publication reported today.
 “A hostile takeover is not impossible given recent industrial acquisitions in the oil and gas space,” Anderson said.
 “There are a lot of deals being talked about” Margin Attraction Monolithic Power, which makes chips for cars and battery chargers, and Power Integrations, a maker of chips that help convert and regulate power in electronics, may lure takeover interest with their strong profitability and growth prospects, said Smigie of Raymond James.
 Target List Other takeover possibilities in the industry include Semtech Corp.
 Nomura’s Shah, who correctly predicted that Hittite was a takeover target for Analog Devices, also said M/A-Com, Semtech and Monolithic were among 15 acquisition candidates.
 The company said July 14 it’s willing to back AbbVie’s 314-billion pound ($537 billion) takeover offer and the two companies are in discussions to hammer out an agreement.
 takeover rules, AbbVie has until 5 pm.
 ZF Friedrichshafen AG is exploring a takeover proposal for TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 TRW Outlook ZF confirmed July 10 that it’s in talks with TRW about a possible offer, after a Bloomberg News report of the company’s takeover interest.
 Should the companies agree to a takeover, it would be the biggest deal in the industry since Continental AG bought VDO Automotive AG from Siemens AG in the midst of the financial crisis seven years ago, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 takeover rules don’t allow the company to claim backing from investors.
 Outotec said in a statement that it would evaluate any takeover proposal thoroughly.
 It has not been approached regarding any takeover or combination, it also said.
 The takeover would help the world’s top corn crusher diversify away from grain processing and gain a bigger foothold in overseas markets for food and beverages made with more natural raw materials.
 A takeover of a company such as CR.
 Plus, deal speculation has pushed Perrigo’s stock up 20 percent in the last 12 months, making a potential takeover more expensive.
 “Corio has been a perennial takeover target” Another investor is unlikely to bid for the company, JPMorgan wrote in a separate note.
 Fox would sell CNN to avoid a challenge from antitrust regulators if it can persuade Time Warner to accept a takeover offer, the people said.
 in a $515 billion takeover offer, is hearing from top shareholders pushing the company to come to the table and work out a deal.
 takeover rules don’t allow the company to claim backing from investors.
 Through the takeover, InBev acquires beer production in the city of Ceske Budejovice, known as Budweis in German, that is the source of the name claimed by both it and Budvar.
 Wing Hang will be delisted after OCBC raised its ownership to 9752 percent, the two lenders said in statements yesterday, the last day of the $5 billion takeover offer.
 Under German takeover rules, BSkyB must also make an offer for the remaining 43 percent.
 The sales will allow him to keep ownership in a growing pan-European pay-TV empire while raising additional funds for a takeover of New York-based entertainment company Time Warner Inc.
 The company failed to complete a takeover of Dutch phone company Royal KPN NV last year after its bid was deemed too low.
 plunged the most since December 2008 after saying Russian billionaire Mikhail Prokhorov’s investment company Onexim Group won’t extend a deadline to complete its reverse takeover of the Canadian miner.
 company said this month the takeover will result in the loss of 1,100 Finnish jobs, or 20 percent of its workforce there, putting some of Finland’s best-qualified people out of work.
 Tyson also announced the sale of shares and tangible equity units, each comprising a stock purchase contract and an amortizing note, to help fund the takeover.
 Tyson’s $63-a-share takeover of Hillshire is anticipated to close by Sept.
 The dissolution of the Pinnacle deal, announced June 30, was a condition of Tyson’s takeover.
 On June 16, Hillshire withdrew its support for the Pinnacle deal -- a merger agreed on before it became a target of competing takeover bids -- and said the Tyson proposal is a better deal for its shareholders.
 There is a frenzy with takeover rumors” While Wilson stepped down as non-executive chairman of the Lululemon board in December 2013 amid public relations controversies, his 28 percent stake remains the largest in the company.
 A takeover could be valued at $50 a share, according to a May estimate from Omar Saad of International Strategy & Investment Group LLC.
 The takeover is expected to close in the first quarter of 2015.
 Today’s deal is the largest takeover of a diversified chemicals company since Solvay SA bought Rhodia SA in 2011, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “This is about connecting people, or small companies, who have no access to the Internet through other technologies, because of where they are” Fiscal-year broadband and data revenue increased 10 percent to 279 million euros, including the takeover of Satelites Mexicanos SA last year.
 That compares with a median multiple of 101 times Ebitda in 39 baking and dairy takeovers globally over the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Wilmar had originally approached the baker and discussed a takeover after buying a 10 percent stake in February 2012.
 Even so, Sullivan doesn’t see the transaction as a deterrent to a future takeover of Whiting.
 will tighten rules governing foreign takeovers of British companies to ensure bidders are held to commitments such as maintaining jobs, Business Secretary Vince Cable said.
 New York-based Pfizer Inc’s offer for AstraZeneca Plc earlier this year raised new demands for Britain to tighten rules on foreign takeovers, with lawmakers questioning Pfizer’s assurances on retaining jobs and drug research in the UK.
 “In some ways that’s the pipeline activity starting to move after a period of low activity, and also a sign of the growing confidence of boardrooms” The second quarter of 2014 was the best period for takeovers since 2007, with companies agreeing to more than $900 billion of purchases.
 Some proposed an arrangement of their own that included a takeover of Oncor by NextEra Energy Inc.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, Southeast Asia’s second-largest lender, moved closer to a full takeover of Hong Kong’s Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 The bid is the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since DBS Group Holdings Ltd, OCBC’s biggest competitor in Singapore, offered $54 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 Murdoch, who is known for his tenacity in pursuing deals, would sell CNN to avoid a challenge from antitrust regulators if he can persuade New York-based Time Warner to accept a takeover offer, a person with knowledge of the situation said this week.
 While most of those borrowings would pay for the takeover, some would go to operations and to the wireless auction.
 It’s counting on payment received from Argentina in May for the nationalization of YPF SA in 2012 to help fund a takeover.
 Should the Fairfield, Connecticut-based company’s takeover offer be approved by regulatory authorities, it will increase its footprint in Siemens’s home region.
 CNBC reported earlier that Reynolds may announce a takeover of Lorillard within weeks.
 The team trades corporate and sovereign bonds, loans and credit-default swaps around events that may include corporate takeovers, divestitures and management changes.
 The growth potential from rolling out HBO, home to “Game of Thrones” and “True Detective,” to new audiences is one reason why New York-based Time Warner on July 8 rejected a $75 billion takeover offer from 21st Century Fox Inc, the people said.
 KPN, whose largest shareholder is billionaire Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB, will face an expanded challenger when John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc combines its UPC division with cable company Ziggo NV’s 27 million customers after a $7 billion takeover.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Centerbridge Partners LP is leading a lawsuit against CWCapital Asset Management LLC claiming that it is being cheated out of hundreds of millions of dollars in the takeover of New York’s Stuyvesant Town-Peter Cooper Village.
 The lenders alleged in today’s complaint that CWCapital’s takeover was “executed on the flawed premise that the amount owed on the senior loan was greater than the value of the property” CW represented that $44 billion was owed on the mortgage when the amount was really $345 billion, the lenders said.
 added 54 percent amid speculation that the maker of Kenworth and Peterbilt trucks may receive takeover interest from Volkswagen AG.
 Equities are also getting a lift from a boom in takeovers, with more than $1 trillion worth of deals announced this year, exceeding the total of 2013, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Newcrest Mining Ltd, Australia’s largest gold producer, flagged another writedown for its Lihir mine in Papua New Guinea, a legacy of a $9 billion takeover labeled one of the industry’s worst.
 The deal represents Whirlpool’s largest acquisition since completing a $26 billion takeover of former competitor Maytag in April 2006.
 shareholders to a A$215 billion ($2 billion) takeover.
 Woolworths last month offered Lew, the company’s largest investor, a record valuation for his stake in another Australian retailer, Country Road Ltd, as long as he didn’t block a takeover of David Jones.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- PanAust Ltd, an Australian copper miner that’s the target of a A$11 billion ($1 billion) takeover approach from a Chinese investment company, has held talks with large global producers over potential rival bids.
 OTP will consider further takeovers in Romania after completing the integration of the BCP’s unit as it seeks to increase its market share to about 5 percent from 21 percent, Diosi said.
 In response to Charney’s attempts to regain control, the board last week adopted a one-year takeover defense plan, a so-called poison pill, that would dilute the shares if Charney adds 1 percent more to his current stake in the company.
 In rejecting an $85-per-share takeover bid by Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 That’s about 153 times the company’s estimated 2014 Ebitda -- making it the most expensive takeover of a US.
 takeover rules, the two businesses have until the end of day on Aug.
 “He’s been in the market for an eternity and has turned E-Plus into a major player,” said Paschalis Choulidis, CEO of virtual operator Drillisch AG, a competitor which agreed last week to acquire 30 percent of Telefonica’s network capacity to help seal the takeover.
 was seeking to “starve” European banks to ease their takeover.
 He has until July 10 to decide on the $12 billion takeover of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany by Telefonica SA, and an approval is widely expected.
 Bouygues agreed last month to sell part of its stake in Alstom SA to the French government as part of General Electric Co’s $17 billion takeover of Alstom’s energy assets.
 Blackstone, under Chief Executive Officer Stephen Schwarzman, has been the most successful leveraged-buyout firm to expand beyond takeovers and into real estate, credit and hedge funds.
 AIA was hurt by the woes at its former parent, American International Group Inc, during the 2008 global financial crisis and a failed takeover by Prudential Plc in 2010.
 Taking the company private may allow insiders to find ways to unlock value” Focus Media Holding Ltd, a Hong Kong-based digital advertising company, withdrew its listing from the Nasdaq Stock Market in May 2013 after a $38 billion takeover led by Carlyle Group LP.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Aberdeen Asset Management Plc, the third-biggest shareholder in Wing Bank Bank Ltd, agreed to sell its shares in the lender to Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, moving the Singaporean buyer closer to a full takeover.
 The bid is the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since DBS Group Holdings Ltd, OCBC’s biggest competitor in Singapore, offered $54 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 Record corporate cash levels led to a boom in takeovers, with more than $1 trillion worth of deals announced this year, exceeding the total of 2013, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 soared after the company yesterday reported positive trial results for its breast cancer drug, positioning the company as a potential takeover target.
 private after shareholders accepted its $5 billion takeover offer.
 Hong Kong’s takeover rules required OCBC, Southeast Asia’s second-largest lender, to own at least 90 percent of Wing Hang’s shares before the target could be delisted.
 The takeover will be funded with equity and debt, Tsien said in a July 10 interview, without indicating the proportion of each as the bank wasn’t sure of the stake it would obtain.
 The Wing Hang bid is the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since DBS Group Holdings Ltd, OCBC’s biggest competitor in Singapore, offered $54 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- As Masayoshi Son pushes for a takeover of T-Mobile US Inc, the Japanese billionaire is asking banks to commit financing for a longer-than-usual amount of time, underscoring the intense regulatory review he faces.
 Sprint and T-Mobile plan to bid for that spectrum together through a joint venture that is independent of the takeover, the people said.
 A takeover of Nova would make OTE the top player, overtaking Forthnet.
 Since that takeover, the bonds secured by the ship have soared 35 percent to 115 cents on the dollar, almost seven times the average gain for Mexican corporate debt.
July 12 (Bloomberg) -- Crumbs Bake Shop Inc, the New York-based chain that went public three years ago at the peak of the cupcake craze, filed for bankruptcy after arranging a potential takeover with a venture including the maker of Dippin’ Dots ice cream.
 Cable billionaire John Malone’s company said it doesn’t plan to make a full takeover offer.
 Fiat SpA rose 14 percent to 771 euros after Germany’s Manager Magazin reported that discussions had taken place on a potential takeover of the Italian company by Volkswagen AG.
 A Volkswagen official said takeovers aren’t on the agenda at the moment.
 While waiting to close the Horizon deal, Roc said June 25 that it received a takeover approach, and then unveiled another bid on July 10.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Imperial Tobacco Group Plc Chief Executive Officer Alison Cooper took a surprise step into the future as a five-year-old e-cigarette brand was included in the $71 billion purchase of assets from Reynolds American Inc’s takeover of Lorillard Inc.
 While that’s created speculation that BAT could seek a full takeover, BAT’s returns are more attractive if it helps Reynolds purchase Lorillard instead, according to James Bushnell, a London-based analyst at Exane BNP Paribas.
 If Reynolds funds the Lorillard takeover with half debt and half equity, it may cost BAT about $6 billion to maintain its 42 percent stake, Bloomquist estimates.
 “We were approached by Salix for a prospective overall takeover, which we thought didn’t make much sense for us, because we see ourselves very much on the value-creation side,” Della Cha said.
 “We really didn’t get to the point of discussing any offer, because we ruled out the full takeover immediately” Instead, Cosmo executives met in Chicago with Salix representatives and proposed a so-called tax inversion, which was accepted, Della Cha said.
 Endurance was asking Aspen shareholders to approve a special meeting and increase the size of the company’s board to 19 from 12 to ease a takeover.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Greenlight Capital Inc, the hedge-fund firm run by David Einhorn, said it sees an opportunity to bet against Mallinckrodt Plc should its takeover of Questcor Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The deal, announced in April, illustrates how cheap financing is fueling a surge in takeovers even of troubled companies, the New York-based hedge-fund manager said today in a second-quarter letter to investors, a copy of which was obtained by Bloomberg News.
 and Martin Marietta Materials Inc, gained after becoming takeover targets or acquiring a rival.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Volkswagen AG said takeovers aren’t on the agenda at the moment after both Fiat SpA and its biggest investor denied a magazine report that Europe’s largest carmaker made an approach to buy all or part of the Italian competitor.
 VW Chairman Ferdinand Piech, a member of the family that controls the Wolfsburg, Germany-based carmaker, has held various talks with associates and members of the Agnelli family about a takeover of Fiat, the Hamburg-based magazine reported on its website.
 “If the merger fails, Roc may not be able to find other growth opportunities at a better price,” according to the company, which received a takeover bid last month from an unidentified suitor.
 Roc shareholders should have a chance to vote on the takeover offer, if it moves ahead, and the Horizon proposal, and decide on the best option, said Simon Mawhinney, a portfolio manager at Allan Gray in Sydney.
 After rejecting four previous offers from US-based AbbVie Inc, Shire agreed to back a 314 billion pound ($537 billion) takeover offer.
 takeover rules, the companies have a July 18 deadline to make the deal or ask for an extension.
 on its $16 billion takeover by Suntory Holdings Ltd, and worked with Altadis SA on its 126 billion euro acquisition by Imperial Tobacco Group Plc in 2008.
 “The news marks an unprecedented point in recent years at the airline, such that both the CEO and CFO would both decide to leave in very quick succession, despite both having been largely successful” Under Mueller’s leadership, Aer Lingus resisted a takeover bid from rival Ryanair Holdings Plc, Europe’s biggest discount carrier, expanded its trans-Atlantic routes and struggled to resolve pension disputes that have dogged the carrier.
 A few months before the takeover, she co-authored a paper that concluded that shale appears as “the solution to Argentina’s reserves decrease” “Argentina needs an energy secretary who is able to harmonize the provincial interests with those of YPF and private oil market players,” Mauricio Roitman, an analyst at energy consultant Montamat & Asociados, said in a telephone interview from Buenos Aires.
 The Rome-based company borrowed to lead a $60 billion takeover of Spain’s largest power generator, Endesa SA, in 2008.
 made a takeover offer.
 Chairman Masayoshi Son’s planned takeover offer.
 The sale will allow Fox to stretch its takeover bid for Time Warner.
 “It puts Wall Street to shame” In March, Lions Gate said it failed to properly disclose share transfers to a director that prevented activist investor Carl Icahn’s takeover attempt of the company in 2010.
 Banks and borrowers are benefiting as investors agree to set aside money to finance acquisitions, such as Carlyle Group LP’s takeover of Ortho-Clinical Diagnostics Inc, weeks before deals are closed.
 During the financial crisis, banks were stuck holding $200 billion of loans financing buyouts including KKR & Co’s takeover of First Data Corp.
 The infamous $457 million loan for the takeover of Ohio Mattress by investment firm Gibbons, Green, van Amerongen left First Boston in need of a capital injection from Credit Suisse.
 takeover panel deadline, are hammering out the details of an agreement, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Under British takeover rules, AbbVie, based in North Chicago, Illinois, needs to make a formal offer by 5 pm.
 said it has no intention of making a takeover offer for Bamburi Cement Ltd.
 “We have no intention of making a takeover offer for BCL,” Holcim said.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Meda AB, the Swedish drugmaker that rejected a takeover approach from Mylan Inc, chose Italian pharmaceutical company Rottapharm Madaus from a short list of about 10 acquisition targets as it seeks to double in size.
 A year after rebuffing a $3 billion takeover proposal from Mark Zuckerberg, Snapchat Inc.
 “But the potential for further loss of share in fungicides and seeds and near-term pressure on market volumes create headwinds that will more than offset the long-term potential in the coming quarters” Shares of the Swiss company, the target of a failed takeover approach by Monsanto Co.
 Largest Deal This deal is the largest takeover of a diversified chemicals company since Solvay SA bought Rhodia SA in 2011, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “This is going to damage Skymark’s financial situation,” said Senri Sasahara, an individual investor and chief executive officer of Innovative Advisor Corp, which advises on takeovers and mergers.
 Investors this week accepted OCBC’s $5 billion bid for Wing Hang Bank Ltd, the biggest takeover of a Hong Kong lender since DBS’s $54 billion acquisition of Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 Acquisitions through company takeovers are “going to be lumpy,” he said.
 I can’t speak for Valeant if it’s a year from now” With Allergan resisting a takeover, both companies have attacked each other’s business models.
 consumers restraining discretionary spending since it was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout put together by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital at the peak of the last takeover boom in 2008.
 Liberty Global said it doesn’t plan to make a full takeover bid for now.
 It’s also reminiscent of earlier Malone deals to build stakes in cable companies before seeking takeovers.
 ITV’s shares have more than quadrupled in the past five years and the company has long been the subject of takeover speculation.
 Liberty Global has been building stakes in companies as well as orchestrating full takeovers.
 takeover rules, Liberty Global must now wait six months if it intends to make a full bid for ITV.
 Rosenstein said in May that Jana was working behind the scenes with Walgreen, which is mulling a full takeover of the UK’s largest pharmacy chain.
 And some investors may be betting that Molson Coors itself is a takeover target.
 takeover rules, AbbVie, based in North Chicago, Illinois, needs to make a formal offer by 5 pm.
 Shares of $19 billion Mead Johnson reached a record this week on renewed speculation of a takeover by Danone.
 The company is in a weaker position now to defend itself from a takeover, should a larger company such as Nestle SA or PepsiCo Inc.
 “It would make sense as it’s a great company with know-how in this field and has a big focus on R&D, which would both strengthen Danone” Danone last year said that a takeover of Yakult isn’t on the agenda after a previous agreement that prevented it from raising its stake in the company was replaced with a new one.
 “A takeover of Mead Johnson would better diversify Danone, but that would not at all be cheap,” said Benno Galliker, a trader at Luzerner Kantonalbank AG in Lucerne, Switzerland.
 Then they need to grow organically and grow punctually with smaller takeovers” Possible Target Danone itself may become vulnerable to bids, Tegner of Natixis wrote in a June 26 report.
 Concern that the French government would block a purchase of Danone damped takeover speculation back in 2005.
 Saunders said he was surprised by how it worked out, given that the company making the takeover often kicks out the management team of the target.
 Adding Scale Dow added scale to its consumer division in 2008 with the $189-billion takeover of Rohm & Haas Co, which added acrylic chemistry to Dow’s offering spanning glycol esthers, surfactants and amines used widely in cosmetics.
 (RAI)’s takeover of LorillardInc.
 That’s prompting investors to seek ways to profit from the growing pool of health-care consumers, spurring deals including the takeover of Amil Participacoes SA by UnitedHealth Group Inc.
 made an $80 billion takeover bid in recent weeks for Time Warner Inc.
 Later that month, Fox delivered a formal takeover proposal worth $85 in stock and cash for each Time Warner share.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- Gentiva Health Services Inc, the home health and hospice company resisting a hostile takeover attempt from Kindred Healthcare Inc, said it was approached by another investor in the sector with a higher bid.
 Kindred offered this week to buy a 149 percent stake in Gentiva after the company rebuffed two takeover bids, a change in strategy to try to force the company to enter talks.
 That’s the most Kindred can buy without triggering a “poison pill” takeover defense as it seeks to force a deal with Gentiva.
 Premium Revenue As chairman and CEO, Buffett, 83, fueled Berkshire’s growth over the last five decades by investing insurance premiums in stocks and takeovers.
 Liberty Global bought the ITV holding this month from Rupert Murdoch’s British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc for 481 million pounds ($815 million), saying it didn’t plan to make a full takeover bid for now.
 ITV’s shares have more than quadrupled in the past five years and the company has long been the subject of takeover speculation.
 In May, JPMorgan agreed to buy about $5 billion of government bonds that Argentina gave to Spanish oil producer Repsol SA as compensation for the takeover of its local unit in April 2012.
 TRW Automotive Holdings Corp, which has a market value of more than $11 billion, received a preliminary takeover approach from ZF Friedrichshafen AG.
 Volkswagen, Europe’s biggest carmaker, sold 2 billion euros ($27 billion) in preferred stock a month ago to help fund the takeover of truck producer Scania AB.
 “We’ll continue with the strategy because the value will still be realized as long as we own more than 50 percent” Under Hong Kong takeover rules, OCBC needs to own at least 90 percent of Wing Hang’s shares to delist the bank.
 The bid is the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since DBS Group Holdings Ltd, OCBC’s biggest competitor in Singapore, offered $54 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 Business Secretary Vince Cable brushed aside calls for a tighter public-interest test on takeovers following Pfizer Inc’s abandoned attempt to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 He said earlier this month that if Labour wins next year’s general election he would legislate to introduce a national-interest test on takeovers.
 Answering questions from the House of Lords Economic Affairs Committee in London today, Cable said foreign takeovers could benefit UK.
 After each, the stock market has advanced, including this year: The benchmark index rallied 82 percent in the two months since the May 22 takeover.
 The SET index climbed 45 percent in the two months after the 2006 military takeover that sent Yingluck’s brother, Thaksin Shinawatra, into exile, and rose 15 percent following the ouster of Premier Chatichai Choonhavan in 1991.
 The SET index dropped 15 percent in the six-month period after the takeover in 1991, and declined 5 percent after Thaksin’s ouster.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Exact Holding NV, a Dutch software provider, saw its shares rise the most since its 1999 public offering, after Reuters reported the company is in takeover talks with private equity firms such as Apax and KKR & Co.
 Earlier this week, Chicago-based AbbVie Inc, which is seeking to take Shire’s address, made a cash-and-stock takeover offer worth about 5320 pounds at the time.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- As takeover talk swirls around Talisman Energy Inc, the chief executive gave prospective buyers a hint today about what he reckons his company is worth: more than the market thinks.
 Unlike recent Internet takeovers that helped buyers branch into new services, this merger would mimic the GrubHub deal by bringing together two very similar businesses -- and reduce marketing and overhead expenses so significantly that CRT Capital Group LLC sees the combined entity getting close to turning a profit.
 announced a $19 billion takeover of WhatsApp Inc, the text-messaging mobile application.
 Even before the latest measures, external debt markets have been largely closed to Russia since the takeover of Crimea.
 shareholders vote on a A$215 billion ($2 billion) takeover bid from South Africa’s Woolworths Holdings Ltd, with the company’s largest shareholder Solomon Lew abstaining.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Syrah Resources Ltd, a graphite and vanadium developer, rose to a record in Sydney trading after a report the global commodity trader and metals producer Glencore Plc made an informal takeover approach.
 Syrah gets informal takeover inquiries from time to time, though none “have progressed to formal discussions or resulted in any indicative offers being received,” the company said today in a statement.
 To fund them, buyers are using a little creative thinking and a lot of common stock to fuel the best quarter for global takeovers since 2007.
 For buyers with public listings, all-cash offers made up about one-third of the takeovers announced in the second quarter, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 European Shift European buyers have made the biggest shift away from cash, the data show, with all-cash purchases falling to just 28 percent of the $88 billion of takeovers announced by public companies during the quarter, compared with 68 percent from 2008 to 2013.
 is resisting a $542 billion takeover bid by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 aerospace parts maker Firth Rixson Ltd, its biggest takeover in 14 years.
 Kindred, based in Louisville, Kentucky, is seeking 149 percent of Atlanta-based Gentiva’s shares, the most it can buy before triggering a “poison pill” takeover defense.
 during his 1986 unsuccessful takeover attempt of the rival casino operator.
 Greenberg was Pickens’ banker in the 1980s, when Pickens stormed Wall Street with his attempted corporate takeovers.
 Medtronic Inc, a Minneapolis-based medical-device maker, last month also said it would renounce its American address as part of its planned $429 billion takeover of Dublin-based Covidien Plc.
 An attorney with Sidley Austin LLP in Washington, Mendenhall worked for the trade office from 2001 until January 2007, including representing the agency on the Treasury panel that scrutinizes for national security implications the takeovers of US.
 into the largest company in the transport-services industry through serial takeovers.
 In 2007, while leading United Rentals, Jacobs agreed to a $4 billion takeover by Cerberus Capital Management LP after shares dropped following earnings restatements for accounting errors.
 Buyout Scrutiny In the last presidential campaign, Romney, the co-founder of Bain Capital LLC, was attacked by Democrats and dubbed a ‘vulture’ capitalist because of the jobs eliminated after the investment firm’s takeover of companies.
 The Reynolds takeover of Lorillard will give the effort more publicity, the Lutheran minister from Philadelphia said in an interview.
 Business Secretary Vince Cable talked about plans to tighten rules governing foreign takeovers of British companies to ensure bidders are held to commitments such as maintaining jobs.
 In that role, she shepherded through last year’s C$12 billion ($11 billion) takeover by Lifelabs Medical Laboratory Services.
 The board responded to Charney’s moves by adopting a so-called poison pill, which prevents a takeover by diluting shares.
 China-based hackers looking to derail BHP Billiton Ltd’s $43 billion takeover of Potash Corp.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- CWCapital Asset Management LLC was sued by lenders claiming they are being cheated out of hundreds of millions of dollars in the takeover of the Stuyvesant Town-Peter Cooper Village, Manhattan’s largest apartment complex.
 The lenders alleged in the complaint that the takeover was “executed on the flawed premise that the amount owed on the senior loan was greater than the value of the property” CW represented that $44 billion was owed on the mortgage when the amount was really $345 billion, the lenders said.
 The takeover would help the world’s top corn crusher diversify away from grain processing and gain a bigger foothold in overseas markets for food and beverages made with more natural raw materials.
 Smaller mobile takeovers the European Commission cleared recently include Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s purchases of Orange in Austria and of Telefonica’s Irish unit.
 Deals that are more likely to take place include a combination of Hutchison’s Three unit in Italy with Wind, owned by VimpelCom Ltd, and takeovers involving TeliaSonera AB’s Yoigo business in Spain and Bouygues SA’s mobile division in France, according to Vincent Maulay, an analyst at Oddo & Cie.
 The Dublin-based drugmaker said on July 14 that it would back a takeover bid from AbbVie Inc.
 The mine was acquired in a $9 billion takeover in 2010 and is situated inside the Luise Caldera, a crater of an extinct volcano.
 The Goldman Sachs figure included $506 million of financial-advisory revenue, including fees for takeover advice, an increase of 4 percent.
 The takeover would leave the 400-year-old US.
 The management changes were surprising and “not an intended game plan at the outset” of Loblaw’s takeover of Shoppers Drug Mart Corp, which was completed in April, Patricia Baker, an analyst at Bank of Nova Scotia in Montreal, said in a note.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the largest independent merger-advisory firm, posted second-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates on record revenue from advising on takeovers and asset management.
 Glass Lewis said it isn’t commenting on the merits of the takeover.
 The Hong Yuan purchase is the biggest takeover in mainland China’s financial industry, surpassing Ping An Insurance Group Co’s $43 billion acquisition of Shenzhen Development Bank Co.
 The proposed takeover of DirecTV is just one of many deals in the communications industry, which is facing accelerating consolidation.
 Frasers completed due diligence and will proceed with an off-market takeover offer to acquire all Australand shares, following a preliminary bid last month of A$448 per share, the two companies said in a regulatory filing today.
 shareholders seats on the board of the combined company should its $75 billion takeover bid succeed, people familiar with the situation said.
 New York-based Time Warner rejected a takeover offer made last month by Fox, saying it could create more value for shareholders as an independent company.
 stocks rose with European equities on an increase in takeover activity and Citigroup Inc.
 drugmaker said it’s willing to back a 314 billion-pound ($537 billion) takeover by AbbVie Inc.
 “You had all these mergers and takeover announcements over the weekend.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Joy Global Inc, the world’s largest maker of underground mining equipment, rose the most in more than two years on speculation the company is a takeover target.
 takeover attempt, is building up its respiratory business by buying the rights to Almirall SA’s lung medicines for $875 million.
 In a June interview, Pascal Soriot, the chief executive officer, said AstraZeneca wouldn’t make big takeovers part of its defense strategy, although he said he would consider small to medium-sized acquisitions.
 “When they make a takeover bid, they should pay for some of the future opportunity,” said Cato Stonex, a fund manager at Taube Hodson Stonex Partners LLP, which ranks among Sky Deutschland’s top five shareholders.
 An eventual takeover of a European Sky by telecommunications-network owners such as Vodafone or billionaire John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc may take place, but it will be difficult to create value from such a deal, Stonex said.
 Mineral Resources Ltd, which holds 13 percent of Aquila and had made a rival takeover offer, agreed to accept the bid today.
 This includes AbbVie Inc’s $55 billion takeover of Dublin-based Shire Plc, announced July 8, which will make it the largest US.
 drugmaker, tried for its own deal with a proposed $117 billion takeover of London-based AstraZeneca Plc.
 Moynihan, has booked more than $55 billion in expenses tied to home loans, mostly linked to the disastrous 2008 takeover of subprime lender Countrywide Financial Corp.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- DBS Group Holdings Ltd, Southeast Asia’s biggest bank, vaulted to the top among takeover advisers in the region for the first time in its history after winning more business from Temasek Holdings Pte, its main shareholder.
 2 spot with its work on $16 billion of takeovers, while Credit Suisse Group AG was ranked third with $158 billion.
 for $5 billion in the biggest takeover of a Hong Kong lender since 2001.
 “DBS is sitting pretty” Choe, a managing director who has headed the strategic advisory unit since 2009, said he expects the volume of takeovers in the second half to be similar to the first half, which would make 2014 the best year on record for Southeast Asia since Bloomberg began compiling the data in 1990.
 In Indonesia, where former general Prabowo Subianto has filed an appeal contesting an official count declaring he lost this month’s presidential election, Choe said he doesn’t expect any fallout for takeovers linked to the largest Southeast Asian economy.
 The takeover will help the world’s top corn crusher diversify from grain processing and gain a bigger foothold in overseas markets for food and beverages made with more natural raw materials.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Mennica Polska SA raised its stake in Netia SA, Poland’s second-largest fixed-line phone company, to 129 percent, becoming its biggest shareholder and fueling speculation about a takeover by a strategic investor.
 “The fact that in the last transaction Mennica bought shares above the Vectra offered price shows that the fight intensifies” Central Europe’s telecommunications market has been active for takeover deals in past years as rising competition and slowing growth prompted operators to review expansion plans.
 to create an A$800 million ($751 million) company, said it will consider whether two takeover offers it received are genuine.
 “It’s important to see whether they are genuine bidders, so we’ll do what we need to do to capture maximum value, whether that’s through a merger or a takeover” Roc, which rose the most in two weeks in Sydney trading today, said yesterday it had received a second acquisition proposal following a separate approach last month.
 The two takeover bids from the unidentified companies may complicate the April agreement between Horizon and Roc to merge oil and gas operations stretching from China to Malaysia.
 ZF Friedrichshafen AG is exploring a takeover of TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 “The takeover certainly makes sense for Lindt, as it really strengthens their position in the US,” Jean-Philippe Bertschy, an analyst at Bank Vontobel AG, said by phone.
 company raised its takeover offer to about $515 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Family Dollar received a $7450-a-share takeover proposal yesterday from Dollar Tree, a surprise suitor after activist investors including Carl Icahn had pushed for a sale to rival Dollar General Corp.
 Prior to the announcement, the $86 billion discount chain had only reached the takeover price once on its own.
 There’s a little more of a differentiation between Family Dollar and Dollar Tree” That puts Dollar Tree in a better position to gain regulatory approval for the takeover, whereas Dollar General may have faced obstacles because of the significant overlaps with Family Dollar, said Montagna of Avondale.
 The bank debt includes a $5 billion term loan, which would be the biggest of its kind backing a takeover this year, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The commitments reflect how unprecedented demand for high-yield, high-risk debt has made it easy for a junk-rated borrower such as Valeant to finance an acquisition that exceeds the combined value of all other takeovers it’s ever attempted.
 more than 20 times in just over two months, boosting the chances of a takeover, Monex Casa de Bolsa said.
 Under Canadian law, a company must make a public takeover bid in most cases if it reaches or seeks to reach a 20 percent stake in another company.
 Pacific Rubiales investment could be part of that structure” Alfa and Pacific Rubiales declined to comment on takeover prospects.
 On July 24, after Alfa raised its stake in the company to 141 percent, Conrads said it’s a “bit surprising they keep buying” Bolanos said he thinks the most likely outcome is for Alfa and Pacific Rubiales to form a joint venture, though the odds of a takeover have increased as share purchases mount.
 Coates, who built Hill+Knowlton Strategies into Canada’s top foreign-takeover consultancy, said myopic business leaders are more responsible than Prime Minister Stephen Harper for the country’s stricter foreign takeover rules and the resulting loss of capital investment from countries such as China.
 The slowdown came as Harper imposed limits in 2012 on oil-sands purchases by state-owned enterprises after having been pressured by Canadian oil companies to stop Chinese takeovers of local energy firms.
 Hill+Knowlton Strategies Canada, a division of London-based WPP Plc, advised in almost a quarter of the country’s 50 largest foreign takeovers and attempted takeovers during the past decade, including four of the five biggest, according to data compiled by Bloomberg from company filings and records kept by the country’s lobbying commissioner.
 Politicized Process More recently, Harper has blocked takeovers on national security grounds and concerns over the loss of strategic resources.
 Interpublic has been speculated as a takeover target.
 One technique Elliott has repeated: making a takeover offer for a targeted company to flush out higher-paying buyers.
 Tribune, based in Chicago, emerged from bankruptcy in 2012 after an $83 billion takeover by billionaire Sam Zell.
 Office of Fair Trading that a takeover by Diageo could lead to higher blended whisky prices in the UK.
 The cancellation may be stoking takeover speculation, said Angelo Zino, an equity analyst from S&P Capital IQ in New York.
 “We’re definitely viewing them as more of a potential takeover than we have in a long time,” Zino said in a phone interview.
 Makers of 3-D printers, which layer materials to create objects, have been frequently speculated as takeover targets since Stratasys Ltd.
 3D Systems is still likely to pursue more takeovers this year, Mohan wrote in a research note today.
 Siemens’s budget for takeovers could be limited to 36 billion euros by its debt ratio targets, Bloomberg Industries estimates.
 In the $17 billion takeover battle for Alstom’s energy assets, both GE and Siemens primarily wanted to acquire the French company’s gas turbine-making and -servicing business to meet surging demand from the fracking industry.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Exact Holding NV, a Dutch software provider, said it is in discussions with several parties about a possible takeover of all of its outstanding shares.
 Reuters earlier reported the company is in takeover talks with private equity firms such as Apax and KKR & Co LP.
 Nationale Suisse, which said it was pushed into a takeover by its largest shareholders, rose 25 percent to 7920 francs at 2:30 pm.
 Nationale Suisse received “several” takeover bids before accepting the higher Helvetia offer, Nationale Suisse Chairman Andreas Von Planta told journalists.
 ‘Negative Effects’ The company agreed to a transaction after its three main shareholders, Helvetia, Baloise and Mobiliar, increased their stakes, creating speculation of a takeover that affected employees and customers, Chief Executive Officer Hans Kuenzle said.
 With the takeover, Helvetia will strengthen its market position in Switzerland, while expanding its general insurance business and boost existing European markets including Germany, according to a presentation on its website.
 The takeover will also increase premiums at the company’s specialty lines unit, selling products such as art insurance, by 60 percent to 1 billion francs.
 shareholder contends that directors shortchanged investors in the discount chain by agreeing to an $85 billion takeover by rival Dollar Tree Inc.
 He said he was “hopeful that one or more of them will surface as a result of today’s announcement” After Icahn announced his stake, Family Dollar adopted a shareholder-rights plan that limited investors from acquiring more than 10 percent of the company, a move to prevent a hostile takeover.
 The tribunal in The Hague said Rosneft in particular had implemented the policy of the Russian government in its takeover of Yukos.
 Through the takeover, InBev acquires beer production in the Czech Republic city of Ceske Budejovice, known as Budweis in German, which is the source of the name claimed by both it and Budvar.
 Pershing Square, which amassed a 97 percent stake in Allergan ahead of Valeant’s takeover bids, has called for a special meeting of Allergan shareholders that will include a vote on the board and is expected to be held by the end of 2014.
 “It could be on people’s radar in terms of a takeover” The stock rose as much as 41 percent and traded 23 percent higher at 2064 euros at 9:34 am.
 movie studio rejected a takeover bid from Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 3 1/2 years ago in what was one of the longest-running hostile takeover attempts.
 Comcast is awaiting approval to buy Time Warner Cable, while AT&T needs clearance for its takeover of DirecTV.
 “Such a deal could serve as an effective takeover defense for Time Warner against Fox, given, among other things, FCC rules against the ownership of two Big 4 US.
 The board responded to Charney’s moves by adopting a so-called poison pill, which prevents a takeover by diluting shares.
 The target company said last week that its investors opposed Endurance’s plans to increase the size of Aspen’s board to 19 from 12 to ease a takeover.
 The benchmark stock index, which has gained more than 60 percent since El-Sisi led the army takeover, was little changed today after adding 08 percent yesterday.
 made a takeover bid that was rebuffed.
 A takeover environment creates a lift to the markets.
 More than $11 trillion worth of takeovers have been announced this year, exceeding the total of 2013, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 He also was on the Skadden team advising Sprint Corp’s takeover bid for Clearwire Corp.
 to create an A$800 million ($750 million) company, received an approach from a second unidentified suitor proposing a takeover.
 Roc reported a separate takeover approach on June 25.
 Buffett, too, has said that current yields make fixed-income securities among the riskiest investments and instead steered his company’s funds into stocks and toward takeovers.
 Endurance said that day it was asking Aspen shareholders to approve a special meeting and increase the size of the company’s board to 19 from 12 to ease a takeover.
 to help finance a takeover in 2009 of Rohm & Haas Co.
 While Niel’s $33-per-share-bid is lower than the offer being prepared by Sprint, Iliad has a key trump card: a takeover by the French company would preserve the status quo of the US.
July 28 (Bloomberg) -- Applied Materials Inc, the largest chipmaking-equipment supplier, refiled an application with China’s Ministry of Commerce seeking approval of its takeover of Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 to prevent a takeover by the American company.
 The termination of the Pinnacle merger agreement allows Tyson to complete its $77 billion takeover of Hillshire.
 The Rome-based company borrowed to lead a $60 billion takeover of Spain’s largest power generator, Endesa SA, in 2008.
 A takeover of Qiagen, valued at $57 billion, would add to almost $300 billion in health-care deals this year, the most since at least 2002, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 About $291 billion of acquisitions have been announced or proposed in all of 2014, including Medtronic’s more than $40 billion takeover bid for Covidien Plc.
 Qiagen stock has climbed 45 percent since the Covidien takeover was announced, beating the 14 percent gain for the Stoxx 600 Health Care Index in the same period.
 Even though that’s higher than Ireland’s 125 percent, a takeover may appeal to a company in the US, where the corporate tax rate is almost double Qiagen’s, he said.
 Interesting Business A takeover of Qiagen could also help Illumina and Cepheid lower their tax rates, while adding diagnostic businesses that would be complementary to their existing portfolios, said Jose Haresco, a San Francisco-based analyst at JMP Securities, a unit of JMP Group Inc.
 Expensive Implications Qiagen will probably want more than $30 a share in a takeover, a 22 percent premium to yesterday’s US.
 Bought by Imperial Tobacco in 2008 as part of the takeover of cigarette maker Altadis SA, Logista distributes goods to outlets such as bookshops, gas stations and convenience stores across southern Europe.
 Imperial Tobacco, which makes Gauloises cigarettes, inherited a 596 percent stake in Logista at the time of the 126 billion-euro Altadis takeover and later bought the rest in a deal that valued the logistics company at 23 billion euros.
 “You had all these mergers and takeover announcements over the weekend.
 shale region with its $38 billion takeover of Kodiak Oil & Gas Corp.
 AstraZeneca, which fended off a takeover attempt from Pfizer in May, now has more than 100 experimental medicines that it’s counting on to restore growth over the next three years and convince investors that it should remain an independent company.
 (NPK), Africa’s biggest maker of beverage cans, plans to expand in Nigeria through acquisitions that may exceed its largest takeover deal to counter slowing growth in its main South African market.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, which is attempting a hostile takeover of Botox-maker Allergan Inc, cut its 2014 forecast after it sold a dermatology products line and another deal was delayed.
 If the takeover was unsuccessful, Valeant could move quickly to another acquisition and sees “quality” opportunities especially in emerging markets, Pearson said.
 said it will move ahead with a A$26 billion ($25 billion) off-market takeover offer for the Australian developer.
 have begun to put cash reserves to work - driving $70 billion of takeovers of US.
 Scotiabank expanded gradually through incremental takeovers mostly in Latin America.
 That prompted the banks to look outside Canada for takeovers.
 The company said today it plans to add about 50 stores, excluding takeovers.
 Hugo Boss said currency-adjusted wholesale revenue declined 6 percent in the second quarter, citing a challenging market environment and the takeover of selling spaces previously managed by wholesale partners.
 Leveraged Buyouts The complaint had listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions, in which the private-equity firms were alleged to have shortchanged shareholders in the target companies by agreeing to suppress takeover bids.
 Comcast’s proposed takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Those takeovers haven’t dented Henkel’s budget, according to the CEO.
 In response to Charney’s attempts to regain control, the board last week adopted a one-year takeover defense plan, a so-called poison pill, that would dilute the shares if Charney adds 1 percent more to his current stake in the company.
 An attorney with Sidley Austin LLP in Washington, Mendenhall worked for the trade office from 2001 until January 2007, including representing the agency on the Treasury panel that scrutinizes for national security implications the takeovers of US.
 In an interview last month, Chief Executive Officer Jean-Georges Malcor rejected the possibility of a hostile takeover of the company, which has been the object of takeover speculation in recent months.
 Today’s deal is the largest takeover of a diversified chemicals company since Solvay SA bought Rhodia SA in 2011, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 companies have switched their addresses to low-tax nations such as Ireland since 1982, often through a takeover of a smaller company, reducing their tax bills while typically keeping their executives and listings in the US.
 settled eight shareholder lawsuits that were filed over Comcast’s proposed $452 billion takeover of the cable company.
 The price is 53 percent above Shire’s closing level on May 2, before AbbVie made its first takeover proposal.
 Medtronic Inc, a Minneapolis-based medical-device maker, on June 15 announced a $429 billion takeover of Dublin-based Covidien Plc.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Applied Materials Inc, the largest chipmaking-equipment supplier, refiled an application with China’s Ministry of Commerce seeking approval of its takeover of Tokyo Electron Ltd.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks were little changed, halting five days of losses, amid increased takeover activity and as investors bet the financial troubles of Banco Espirito Santo SA won’t spiral into an euro-area banking crisis.
 Louisville, Kentucky-based Kindred had offered on July 14 to buy a 149 percent stake in Gentiva for $16 a share after the company rejected two takeover bids.
 That’s the most Kindred can buy without triggering a “poison pill” takeover defense by Gentiva.
 “It was dictated by lenders” A group including Morgan Stanley stepped forward with a rival loan at lower rates, part of the alternative restructuring plan that includes a NextEra takeover of Oncor.
 “South Africa’s banking sector remains healthy and robust, and there have been no indications that other South African banks have been affected negatively by Abil’s trading update” Growth Fixation “The Ellerines acquisition was bad, but Abil also became fixated on growth,” said Brodziak, adding that the bank may attract takeover bids.
 could garner takeover bids that would enrich shareholders by a total of $5 billion.
 Should those companies fetch the same premium in a takeover, it would create a combined $5 billion windfall for their investors.
 If each were to receive takeover offers for a 56 percent premium like International Rectifier just did, it would create $5 billion in shareholder value, though there’s no guarantee any will get bids.
 The San Francisco-based hedge fund said it intends to engage in direct dialogue with InterContinental regarding its proposals, as well as hold “broad discussions” with shareholders and “industry participants” InterContinental Chief Executive Officer Richard Solomons said in a June interview that the Denham, England-based hotel company can grow without a merger or takeover and it has served investors well.
 Marcato, responding to the report, said in a May 29 statement that “a combination with a larger hotel operator would have compelling strategic and financial merit and represents a unique opportunity to reshape the global hospitality industry” An overseas takeover could have tax advantages.
 ZF is exploring a takeover proposal for Livonia, Michigan-based TRW that could value the car-safety technology provider at as much as $13 billion, people familiar with the matter have said.
 The stock has also been boosted by takeover reports.
 The company might be an attractive takeover target for Danone, Bocom International Holdings Co.
 Second-quarter net income surged to 506 million dirhams ($138 million) from 189 million dirhams, after excluding 106 billion dirhams of a one-time gain related to the takeover of Sorouh, in the year-earlier period, the developer said in a statement today.
 Saks Fifth Avenue, still run from New York even after its takeover by Canada’s Hudson’s Bay Co.
 Since 2009, the firm has made an average investment of $306 million and hasn’t participated in a consortium, or a takeover done by a group of buyout firms, the marketing document shows.
 A takeover of London-based Glaxo, which has gotten about 8 percent cheaper in the past two weeks, would give Pfizer a lung-drug business and more vaccines.
 Glaxo Perks A takeover of Glaxo would offer the tax benefits of the AstraZeneca deal, and a few additional perks as well.
 “We prefer buybacks over takeovers,” said Barry James, who helps oversee $55 billion as president of James Investment Research Inc, a Pfizer shareholder in Xenia, Ohio.
 “I can’t say from a strategic point of view if a takeover would be good, but in the shorter term they rarely work well for shareholders, which is our chief concern for our clients” Double-Whammy A Bloomberg News analysis last year found that about two-thirds of company takeovers exceeding $20 billion since 1996 -- including Pfizer’s merger with Pharmacia Corp.
 While Alfa describes the share purchases as a “financial investment,” the San Pedro Garza Garcia, Mexico-based company’s actions boost the chances of a takeover, according to Monex Casa de Bolsa.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury Wine Estates Ltd, the winemaker fielding separate A$34 billion ($32 billion) takeover offers from US.
 The company had been looking at acquisition options before the takeover approaches, Clarke said, and set them aside to save management time.
 owner of the namesake banana label, is facing a proxy contest after the two companies whose proposed takeover was rejected urged investors to support their bid and scrap Chiquita’s acquisition of Fyffes Plc.
 Walgreen in a statement today said it will keep its legal address in Illinois when it completes its takeover of Switzerland’s Alliance Boots GmbH.
 made an unsolicited takeover bid for the current owner, Time Warner Inc.
 Murdoch had said he would sell CNN if his takeover effort prevailed.
 The company proposed to pay $7850 a share in cash for Family Dollar, challenging Dollar Tree Inc’s takeover bid of $7450 a share in cash and stock.
 Siemens, which has evaluated Dresser-Rand as a takeover candidate since at least 2011, may be willing to pay more than $80 a share to add the $48 billion company’s dominant position in compressors as it seeks to expand in the energy industry, said Gabelli & Co.
 In the past, Volpe’s high price expectations have been the biggest obstacle to a takeover, other people said.
 The company may want as much as $90 a share in a takeover, which could be too much for potential buyers, said Daniel Leben, an analyst at Robert W.
 Dollar Tree’s pursuit of Family Dollar came closer to fruition today after the takeover target rejected a $9 billion offer from Dollar General Corp, citing antitrust hurdles.
 broker, learned about a pending takeover from another AA member he mentored.
 withdrew its $75 billion takeover offer.
 Dollar General gained 34 percent during regular trading as people with knowledge of the matter said the company is weighing a bid for Family Dollar that would challenge Dollar Tree Inc’s $85 billion takeover of the discount retailer.
 The deal came closer to fruition today after the takeover target rejected a $9 billion offer from Dollar General Corp, citing antitrust hurdles.
 Late last year, Hertz’s board voted unanimously to adopt a one-year shareholder-rights plan, which the company said wasn’t adopted in response to any specific takeover bid or proposal to acquire the company.
 is setting up the Castlerigg Equity Event and Arbitrage Fund, a mutual fund that will invest in companies undergoing “extraordinary events” including mergers, takeover bids, spinoffs and restructurings, the firm said in a filing last week with the US.
 The number of takeovers has surged this year, with some $19 trillion of mergers and acquisitions announced globally, a 65 percent increase from the same period in 2013.
 Risk Arbitrage The heightened deal flow can benefit managers such as Sandell who engage in risk arbitrage, a trading strategy that involves buying shares in the target of a takeover after the transaction has been announced.
 They surged 186 percent the first trading day after Alibaba’s takeover was announced in March and have quadrupled since the start of the year.
 Less than a month after Alibaba completed the takeover, the media company said it expects to swing to a first-half loss of HK$97 million to HK$180 million.
 That was the impression that came from BMO Capital Markets’ David Maris in a research note yesterday, in which he also noted that, instead of the resignation being a bad omen, it “may be a sign that a strategic transaction marking a new chapter in Allergan’s growth may be nearing” Which certainly got more interesting when the Wall Street Journal reported yesterday that Allergan may be in the hunt for Salix Pharmaceuticals, a deal that would add a layer or two of complication to the uber-hostile, $53 billion takeover attempt by Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square and Michael Pearson’s Valeant.
 *** Sure, some people may say the immediacy of a Scripps Networks takeover is slim, but you can’t tell that from its price.
 said in a report the company might be an attractive takeover target for Danone.
 The contrast illustrates the challenge facing Bewkes as he seeks to prove Time Warner’s value without a mega-merger like the $85-a-share takeover bid Fox withdrew on Aug.
 Traders trying to profit from takeovers lost more than $20 billion on Aug.
 The firm’s Paulson Partners, which bets on companies involved in takeovers, fell 13 percent, pulled down by positions in health care and telecommunications sectors, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Challenging August August is already proving challenging to hedge funds that seek to profit from takeovers.
 position themselves as potential takeover targets.
 The Montney-focused companies best poised to be considered for a takeover, based on proximity to potential LNG plants and quality of the gas resource, are Painted Pony and Crew, McCrea said.
 “Others just see it as possible upside” There are no takeover premiums built into Montney stocks, partly because no LNG proponent has made a final decision to proceed, Birchcliff CEO Jeffery Tonken said in an interview.
 Under CEO Samuel Tsien, OCBC has been growing outside its home country to counter Southeast Asia’s lowest lending margins, an expansion that included the biggest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since 2001.
 “Our sense is that they’ve probably understated, rather than overstated, the speed with which that transaction will start becoming earnings accretive” Trading Business OCBC will “shortly” organize a briefing that will detail plans for integrating the operations of the two banks and also address how the takeover will be funded, Tsien said today, without providing a date.
 The deal is the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since DBS bid $54 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 may be poised for a takeover after Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp.
 Buying more than a 30 percent stake would trigger a mandatory takeover offer for the company under Singapore rules.
 Selling the stake would help OCBC bolster capital after its $5 billion takeover of Hong Kong’s Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 “The F&N takeover demonstrated that Charoen is a savvy investor who will not overpay for assets,” said Xuan Tan, an analyst at CIMB Group Holdings Bhd, in a note yesterday.
 Securities and Exchange Commission review of its takeover tactics and defended them.
 “You should know that we and Valeant are well-versed in the takeover and tender-offer rules,” Ackman wrote in the letter, which was obtained by Bloomberg News.
 Courts Lloyds Is Sued by 220 Investors Over Its 2008 Takeover of HBOS Lloyds Banking Group Plc was sued by 220 investors who said they were misled into supporting a 2008 takeover of HBOS Plc that prompted a 20 billion-pound ($34 billion) bailout from the UK.
 fell the most in more than five months as bets for a takeover by majority owner Deutsche Telekom AG faded after the parent’s plans to sell a US.
 Tim gained 38 percent in the 12 months through yesterday on wagers it was a takeover target for Telefonica, which controls Vivo, Brazil’s biggest phone carrier by market share, or would merge with Vivendi SA’s Brazilian Internet-provider unit, GVT, according to Alex Pardellas, an analyst at CGD Securities.
 order in June to bolster its payment systems against money launderers, while flaws in M&T Bank Corp’s controls have stalled its takeover of Paramus, New Jersey-based Hudson City Bancorp Inc.
 The stock jumped 47 percent yesterday, as other semiconductor shares also surged after Bloomberg News reported that Infineon was nearing a takeover.
 economy is still healthy with rising corporate earnings and takeovers becoming more common.
 With many of the operations that will probably be spunoff acquired as part of the Melbourne-based company’s 2001 takeover of Billiton Plc, the plan also bookends an era of ever-rising prices.
 distiller Beam Inc, the country’s biggest takeover so far in 2014, as Japanese companies expand abroad to counter a declining population and slow economic growth.
 ‘Very Busy’ Mitsubishi UFJ Morgan Stanley advised on 21 takeover deals in Japan this year valued at $265 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Morgan Stanley, which counts Mitsubishi UFJ as its largest shareholder, is second among advisers on takeovers worldwide, trailing only Goldman Sachs Group Inc, the data show.
 during the second quarter, a takeover that’s attracting regulatory scrutiny.
 Securities and Exchange Commission of its takeover tactics and that it did nothing wrong.
 The brokerage said the company has received possible takeover bids.
 With Time Warner, for instance, Bewkes gradually made the company a more attractive takeover target by winnowing the business down to cable networks and production of movies and TV shows.
 Since June, the same month that Bewkes completed the last spinoff, he has been fending off a $75 billion takeover offer from Murdoch’s Fox.
 Even after the shares jumped more than 30 percent this week on news of a surprise $13-per-share takeover bid, investors are betting they will get more.
 “It’s up to the board to make sure that they literally shake the tree as much as possible to get the best offer” Accepting the takeover proposal would force Charlotte, North Carolina-based Chiquita to scrap its plan to buy Irish competitor Fyffes Plc in a tax-advantageous inversion deal.
 just weeks after Hillshire announced a takeover of Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Court of Appeals in Atlanta dismissed a human-rights case against the fruit importer in July, helping to alleviate the legal risk of a takeover, said a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be named because the discussions are private.
 You’re going to have people owning the shares now that believe they would rather have $13, preferably more, in cash as soon as possible” The takeover proposal values Chiquita at about 12 times its adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization in the last 12 months, according to Cutrale and Safra.
 Deal Door Even so, the fee Chiquita would have to pay for calling off the Fyffes deal isn’t too punishing and if takeover bids start approaching $15 or higher, it will be harder for the board to keep saying no, Hundley wrote.
 The company’s takeover target, Allergan Inc, approached Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 isn’t giving up on striking an overseas takeover to cut its tax rate and gain a new pipeline of drugs, even as the potential cost of acquiring AstraZeneca Plc rises.
 takeover rules it can make the first steps toward a renewed bid next week, on Aug.
 AstraZeneca declined to comment on Pfizer’s interest, citing the UKtakeover panel’s rules.
 Actavis, which on July 1 closed a $28 billion takeover of Forest Laboratories Inc, now has a $59 billion market value that makes it large enough for Pfizer to change its tax domicile to Dublin through an acquisition, the people said.
 “I think that operation will operate with better underwriting results than competitors” Buffett has used the float -- or premiums held until claims are paid -- at Berkshire’s insurance operations to make stock bets and fund takeovers.
 The sale satisfied the final condition of its $29 billion takeover of Xstrata Plc last year.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd, thwarted in a bid for Alstom SA’s power business in June, is seeking other takeover opportunities as it targets 5 trillion yen ($49 billion) in revenue by 2017.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Meda AB, the Swedish drugmaker buying Rottapharm Madaus of Italy after spurning a takeover bid from Mylan Inc, fell the most in three months after cutting its sales forecast on difficulties manufacturing a skin treatment.
 The shares fell as much as 10 percent, the steepest intraday decline since Meda rebuffed a takeover approach from Mylan on April 28, and were down 83 percent at 9325 kronor as of 12:56 pm.
 “It puts Wall Street to shame” In March, Lions Gate said it failed to properly disclose share transfers to a director that prevented activist investor Carl Icahn’s takeover attempt of the company in 2010.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- PanAust Ltd, an Australian copper miner that’s the target of a A$11 billion ($1 billion) takeover approach from China, is seeking formal offers from interested groups by October.
 withdrew its unsolicited takeover bid.
 Apollo Global Management LLC did the same on $620 million of debt to back its takeover of the television programmer Endemol, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “Things are going to have to price at the wide end” Albertsons increased the proposed rates on two term loans to fund its $92 billion takeover of Safeway.
 research on driverless cars and on recognizing images of cats to show the robot takeover is more hype than fact.
 The company’s ADRs have more than doubled since the takeover to $3164.
 It’s a “mild plus” for Comcast’s pending takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 ISS is weighing in on the increasingly acrimonious takeover attempt by Laval, Quebec-based Valeant, backed by Ackman who amassed a 97 percent stake in Allergan to help shepherd the deal.
 jumped 19 percent, touching the highest since October 2000, after people with knowledge of the matter said the company received takeover bids from some of Europe’s biggest drugmakers, including Sanofi and Roche Holding AG.
 Investors this week accepted OCBC’s $5 billion bid for Wing Hang Bank Ltd, the biggest takeover of a Hong Kong lender since DBS’s $54 billion acquisition of Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 said that the broadcasting company may become a takeover target.
 Valeant has joined with the hedge fund Pershing Square Capital Management on a $54 billion takeover bid for Allergan, the maker of Botox.
 during the second quarter, as the pharmaceutical company was targeted for a takeover.
 Securities and Exchange Commission of its takeover tactics and that it did nothing wrong.
 Citigroup said it could face “consequences as serious as the loss of Citibank Argentina’s banking license and its takeover by the Republic” In a nationwide address Aug.
 Son’s takeover of Sprint about a year ago was accompanied by a pledge to upgrade its network so the Overland Park, Kansas-based company could compete with Verizon Communications Inc.
 buyout firm TPG Capital offered A$34 billion ($32 billion) for the world’s second-biggest listed winemaker, according to a person familiar with the matter, matching a takeover bid by KKR & Co.
 Absent a takeover, some analysts predict the stock will climb to as high as $55 over the next year -- near its record -- signaling offers may need to top that price.
 We would expect significant over-subscription” The lender bought most of Wing Hang last month in a $5 billion takeover that allows it to delist the Hong Kong bank and combine operations.
 The Singapore bank’s common equity Tier 1 capital adequacy ratio, a measure of financial strength under international Basel III banking guidelines, will fall to 132 percent following the acquisition and the rights offer from 147 percent before the takeover, OCBC said in presentation materials distributed at a press briefing in Hong Kong today.
 The bank will look to sell non-core assets following the takeover at the right price, Tsien said.
 The Wing Hang purchase is the largest takeover of a Hong Kong bank since DBS, OCBC’s biggest domestic rival, offered $54 billion for Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 trading head, has gained clout at Bank of America since joining the Charlotte, North Carolina-based firm with the 2009 takeover of Merrill Lynch & Co.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Allergan Inc, the maker of Botox, sued Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, claiming the drugmaker colluded with Bill Ackman’s hedge fund to profit from insider trades ahead of a $54 billion takeover bid.
 Allergan surged 15 percent after the takeover bid was announced, giving Ackman a $1 billion gain on paper in the week after the disclosure.
 Allergan’s lawsuit may delay the takeover, according to a BMO Capital Markets Corp.
 “Even if an investor thinks Allergan does not stand a 100 percent chance of winning, but 50 percent or 30 percent or even 10 percent, the likelihood of a deal closing has just been reduced by whatever chance one assumes Allergan wins” The outcome of the lawsuit and takeover battle may not be resolved until 2015, he said.
 To get around those restrictions, Valeant came up with a plan with Ackman to acquire large amounts of stock while avoiding revealing takeover intentions until the right time, according to the complaint.
 Hostile Takeover On April 22, Valeant announced its initial takeover proposal, which Allergan rejected in May.
 On June 18, Valeant began a hostile takeover with an offer made directly to Allergan shareholders.
 The takeover of the Black Sea peninsula “brought a patriotic surge,” Putin, 61, said Aug.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs Group Inc, this year’s top-ranked takeover adviser, hired Paul Parker to be a co-chairman of its mergers and acquisitions group less than three months after he left Barclays Plc.
 The investment advisory firm is weighing in on the increasingly acrimonious takeover attempt by Laval, Quebec-based Valeant, which is backed by activist investor Bill Ackman.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Symrise AG will harness technology acquired in the $18 billion takeover of Diana Group, its largest purchase ever, to expand further into nutritional supplements.
 Takeover Interest Horizon Chief Executive Officer Brent Emmett said his company may attract takeover interest based on the price Fosun agreed to pay for Roc.
 “I don’t rule out there might be some takeover interest in Horizon” While Horizon has a viable standalone business, the funding of future projects will be more challenging now, John Young, an analyst at Ord Minnett Ltd, wrote today in a note.
 and Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc’s takeover of Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s aviation unit, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Lloyds Banking Group Plc was sued by 220 investors who said they were misled into supporting a 2008 takeover of HBOS Plc that prompted a 20 billion-pound ($34 billion) bailout from the UK.
 Had this been revealed, the “folly” of the takeover would have been exposed and Lloyds would have been forced to pull out.
 Lloyds executives at the time of the takeover are also named as defendants in the case, including Blank, former Chief Executive Officer Eric Daniels and ex-finance director Timothy Tookey.
 takeover rules it can make the first steps toward a renewed bid on Aug.
 in 2013, while preventing takeovers of oil-sands companies by state-owned companies, except under “exceptional circumstances,” Hall said.
 A spokeswoman for SoftBank declined to comment on any specific takeover targets.
 A spokeswoman for Melbourne-based Myer declined to comment on any potential takeover.
 plans to use debt to fund a joint takeover of Paris-based rival Generale de Sante SA.
 “We’re at the front end of a significant period” for takeovers, he said.
 bought Arcelor SA in 2006 in the steel industry’s biggest takeover.
 jumped 14 percent to $5206, the most since October 2000, after reports the company had received takeover bids from some of Europe’s biggest drugmakers, including Sanofi and Roche Holding AG.
 maker of knee and hip replacements that has been a takeover candidate for a decade, isn’t facing shareholder pressure to accept any offers, Chief Executive Officer Olivier Bohuon said.
 Hedge Funds Win The Delphi takeover proved to be a huge win for the hedge funds, and for Treasury-controlled GM.
 Pandora “does not spend any time wondering if we’re going to be a takeover target” and is focused on building its independent business, DealReporter cited CFO Michael Herring as saying.
 In July, Liberty Global bought a stake in ITV Plc, the UK’s biggest commercial broadcaster with top-rated shows such as “Downton Abbey” The 64 percent investment was purchased from Rupert Murdoch’s British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc for 481 million pounds ($811 million), with Liberty Global saying it doesn’t plan to make a full takeover bid for now.
 Then-Emir Sheikh Hamad visited Gaza in 2012, becoming the first head of state to do so since Hamas’ violent takeover of the enclave in 2007.
 Stratasys bought startup MakerBot Industries LLC for about $400 million last year, prompting speculation that makers of 3-D printers, which layer materials to create objects, may be takeover targets.
 He split the B shares 50-for-1 in 2010 to help the takeover of the railroad.
 after an internal review of the takeover target, people familiar with the situation said.
 It still has a chance to clinch a big deal by instead pursuing a takeover of GlaxoSmithKline Plc or Actavis Plc, analysts said this week.
 CEO Ian Read last week signaled he’s willing to look at other large takeover opportunities.
 misled it by not mentioning that it was in takeover talks with Dollar Tree Inc.
 Dollar General maintains it said the exact opposite and that Family Dollar CEO Howard Levine didn’t mention that his company had since March been in takeover talks with Dollar Tree, which made the $85 billion bid that Family Dollar still favors.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- There’s no sign of a let up in gold industry takeovers as a surge in acquisitions by producers, led by Agnico Eagle Mines Ltd.
 Valeant, backed by activist investor Bill Ackman, is pursuing a hostile takeover of Allergan.
 Roc Oil will likely terminate its merger agreement with Horizon after Roc’s board unanimously recommended a rival takeover offer from Fosun International Ltd, Horizon said.
 The 2008 fund in April backed a $750 million debt investment in yogurt maker Chobani Inc, invested $600 million in Danish online trader Saxo Bank A/S in 2011 and led a $3 billion takeover of clothing retailer J.
 offered about $9 billion for Family Dollar Stores Inc, excluding debt, setting off a bidding war for a company that had agreed to a $85 billion takeover by Dollar Tree Inc.
 But the combination of Family Dollar and Dollar Tree “would represent a marginal long-term threat to market share” The Dollar General chain is more similar to Family Dollar’s, meaning it may be able to extract bigger benefits from a takeover than Dollar Tree, according to Poonam Goyal, a senior retail analyst for Bloomberg Intelligence.
 filed for bankruptcy after an $83 billion takeover by billionaire Sam Zell, and emerged in 2012.
 In an interview last month, Malcor rejected speculation over the possibility of a hostile takeover of the company.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Chiquita Brands International Inc, owner of the namesake banana label, received an unsolicited $611 million takeover proposal that envisages the company scrapping its pending merger with Irish competitor Fyffes Plc.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- For traders trying to profit from takeovers, Aug.
 After volatility reached a seven-year low and the Dow Jones Industrial Average traded little changed for 2014, takeovers have been one of the few sources of action in the US.
 withdrew its unsolicited takeover offer of $75 billion for Time Warner.
 Blackstone Group LP, which controlled the theme-park operator, chose an initial public offering for SeaWorld, snubbing takeover bids from Apollo Global Management LLC and Onex Corp, because the firm expected an IPO to yield better returns over time than a sale, a person familiar with the matter said last year.
 A large number of overlapping store locations means that were Ahold to buy Market Basket, some outlets might have to be closed, making a takeover less likely, Vos said.
 stands to gain even more for shareholders in a takeover.
 says that market makes Health Net “ripe for the picking,” and analysts estimate the $34 billion company could get about $60 a share in a takeover, a 43 percent premium to last week’s close.
 “Because of that, you’ll probably see the shift from employer-sponsored insurance earlier than you will in other markets” Wright said Health Net may be able to get $60 a share in a takeover.
 “Are they locked into this deal? Is there a clause that gets them out of it?” Schachter, who also estimates a $60 takeover price, said Health Net is still attractive to national plans now because the company has already reviewed where it could scale back, making such cuts easier to execute for potential acquirers.
 Julius Caesar used a divide-and-conquer strategy to takeover ancient Gaul, playing Celtic tribes against one another toincrease his power.
 Foreign Intrigue Murdoch this month dropped a $75 billion unsolicited takeover bid for Time Warner Inc.
 maker of oilfield equipment, is working with Morgan Stanley to prepare for possible takeover bids from companies including Siemens AG, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 In the past, Volpe’s high price expectations have been the biggest obstacle to a takeover, other people said.
 Post has been working to reduce its dependence on cereals and has announced seven acquisitions since August 2013, including the $245 billion takeover of food processor Michael Foods Group Inc.
 He declined to elaborate on potential takeover targets.
 In May, JPMorgan agreed to buy about $5 billion of government bonds that Argentina gave to Spanish oil producer Repsol SA as compensation for the takeover of its local unit in April 2012.
 “South Africa’s banking sector remains healthy and robust, and there have been no indications that other South African banks have been affected negatively by Abil’s trading update” Growth Fixation “The Ellerines acquisition was bad, but Abil also became fixated on growth,” said Brodziak, adding that the bank may attract takeover bids.
 Smith & Nephew, a maker of knee replacements that has been a takeover target for a decade, dropped 41 percent to 1,020 pence.
 “With takeovers of Exxon and ConocoPhillips upgraders, these assets could be potentially taken to satisfy an arbitration ruling against them,” Andy Lipow, president of Houston-based energy consultant Lipow Oil Associates LLC, said in a phone interview.
 is on track to complete its biggest acquisition after more than half of Australand Property Group shareholders accepted the Singapore company’s takeover offer, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- The timing may be right for a takeover of Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Cubist may receive takeover offers based on the prospects for those remedies and could get sold for about 50 percent more than its current price, Cowen Group Inc.
 “Cubist is big enough that if someone were looking to get into that market that could be one way to get in” Cubist would also be a cheap takeover candidate, making a deal even more compelling, he said.
 The new structure may also make Vifor a takeover candidate, said Olav Zilian, an analyst at Helvea SA in Geneva.
 in March, has been seen as a takeover candidate for at least three years, in part because of its rapid growth.
 buyout firm TPG Capital offered A$34 billion ($32 billion) for Treasury Wine Estates Ltd, according to a person familiar with the matter, matching a takeover bid by KKR & Co.
 Extracting Value The offer looks high and may be cut, as with the ongoing takeover of Australian baker Goodman Fielder Ltd, said Young, who doesn’t hold Treasury Wine shares.
 Buying more than a 30 percent stake would trigger a mandatory takeover offer for United Engineers under Singapore rules.
 Selling the stake would help OCBC, Southeast Asia’s second-largest lender, bolster capital after its $5 billion takeover of Hong Kong’s Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 The complaint, filed in December 2007, listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions in which the private-equity firms were accused of shortchanging shareholders in target companies out of billions of dollars by agreeing to suppress takeover bids.
 “This raises the bar further on what is already thought to be a strong quarter for the capital markets business” The RBC Capital Markets unit had record profit of C$641 million, up 66 percent from a year earlier, on higher trading and fees from arranging stock sales and advising on takeovers.
 Companies will benefit from improvements in capital markets as takeovers and stock sales bolster investment-banking fees, Sedran said, while improving North American equity markets boost assets under management.
 movie studio rejected a takeover bid from Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 3 1/2 years ago in what was one of the longest-running hostile takeover attempts.
 Comcast is awaiting approval to buy Time Warner Cable, while AT&T needs clearance for its takeover of DirecTV.
 “Such a deal could serve as an effective takeover defense for Time Warner against Fox, given, among other things, FCC rules against the ownership of two Big 4 US.
 In March, Bank Asya announced that it was in exclusive talks for a takeover with Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ - an arrangement that ended last week.
 While he shaped up Sprint enough to attract a takeover from SoftBank, Hesse was unable to stem subscriber losses, ending his tenure without a single annual gain in monthly contract customers.
 Less than a month after Alibaba completed the takeover, the media company said it expects to swing to a first-half loss of HK$97 million to HK$180 million.
 Its discussions with the San Francisco-based company, which rebuffed a $3 billion takeover offer from Facebook Inc.
 The acquisition data compiled by Bloomberg includes announced asset sales, sale-and-leasebacks and takeovers involving homebuilders, REITs, housing authorities, property managers, lodging companies and developers in Europe.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Investors are pricing Scripps Networks Interactive Inc, the owner of HGTV and the Food Network, as if it’s already in takeover talks.
 Timeline A takeover of Scripps probably won’t happen in the immediate future, Harrigan said.
 Fox’s interest in Time Warner won’t necessarily spur a wave of consolidation though, particularly given that the industry’s takeover candidates tend to trade at richer multiples, according to Martin Pyykkonen, an analyst at Rosenblatt Securities Inc.
 that would challenge Dollar Tree Inc’s $85 billion takeover of the discount retailer, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 With more similarities to Family Dollar, Dollar General may be able to extract even greater benefits from a takeover than Dollar Tree through cost cuts, according to Poonam Goyal, a senior retail analyst for Bloomberg Intelligence.
 While Niel’s $33-per-share-bid is lower than the offer being prepared by Sprint, Iliad has a key trump card: a takeover by the French company would preserve the status quo of the US.
 gained control of Sprint last year, has been trying to sway skeptical regulators to allow a takeover of T-Mobile.
 That takeover, which valued Aquila at A$14 billion, gave Baosteel and its bidding partner Aurizon Holdings Ltd.
 A takeover approach “would certainly feel like it would be opportunistic at today’s prices, but we are a publicly traded stock so what can you do if someone wants to buy you? The door is always open when you are publicly listed” Port Access With projects such as Corunna Downs, Atlas’s resources in the Pilbara total 17 billion tons, the company said in a June presentation.
 withdrew its $75 billion takeover offer, sending the stock down 13 percent.
 He was referring to deals such as AT&T Inc’s planned acquisition of DirecTV and the proposed takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The two sides also have clashed over how negotiations were handled, making the takeover battle increasingly personal.
 Under German takeover law, when a buyer acquires at least 30 percent in a target company, they are required to make an offer to the remaining shareholders unless granted an exemption by Germany’s regulator BaFin.
 and Pershing Square Capital Management said 31 percent of Allergan Inc’s shareholders support their effort to call a special meeting as part of Valeant’s $54 billion takeover bid for the maker of the Botox anti-wrinkle cream.
 While Rosneft’s sudden growth stymied the Gazprom takeover, the Russian government still wanted to raise its stake in the gas company.
 With nothing left to spin off, what’s the growth plan? Time Warner has become more attractive as a takeover target after spinning off the cable, Internet and publishing properties, leaving the company focused on cable networks and the production of movies and TV shows.
 The complaint, filed in December 2007, listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions in which the private-equity firms were accused of shortchanging shareholders in target companies out of billions of dollars by agreeing to suppress takeover bids.
 In other industries, Azentus added Mead Johnson Nutrition Co, amid speculation that the baby-formula maker is a likely takeover target of Danone SA, Europe’s second-largest food company.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA’s negotiations to bolster the market power of smaller competitors in Germany, a condition for European Union clearance of its takeover of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit, are under EU scrutiny.
 That agreement, which left Drillisch rivals United Internet, Freenet AG and Liberty Global Plc’s Unitymedia KabelBW in the cold, is key to allaying the commission’s concerns about Telefonica’s 855 billion-euro ($115 billion) takeover of E-Plus.
 ‘More Expensive’ Evercore, which makes most of its revenue from advising companies on takeovers and restructurings, has been expanding into some other areas.
 for an international takeover of the Fukushima cleanup.
 Allergan Chief Executive Officer David Pyott said he is seeking acquisitions while attempting to fend off a takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 It has been speculated by analysts as a takeover target and, with its $94 billion market capitalization, may be within Allergan’s reach.
 Valeant’s takeover bid for Allergan, backed by activist hedge-fund manager Bill Ackman, has become increasingly acrimonious.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Mexico’s takeover of Oceanografia SA is proving anything but a rescue for the oil services provider.
 Protecting Operations When Mexico Attorney General Jesus Murillo Karam disclosed the takeover on Feb.
 Luis Maizel, who manages about $55 billion in fixed-income securities as president of LM Capital Group LLC, said the government takeover of Oceanografia was more designed to rescue the company’s assets than it was the company itself.
 Gustavo Hernandez, Pemex’s head of exploration and production, referred to Oceanografia’s takeover during a conference call with investors on July 25, on which he discussed reasons for the company’s drop in oil output in the second quarter.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Chiquita Brands International Inc, owner of the namesake banana label, said it will continue with its planned purchase of Irish competitor Fyffes Plc after rejecting an unsolicited $611 million takeover proposal from Cutrale Group and Safra Group.
 According to Cutrale and Safra, their takeover bid values Chiquita at about 12 times its adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization in the last 12 months.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Suzlon Energy Ltd’s Senvion SE unit is preparing to raise about 500 million euros ($665 million) in a bond sale this year to fund a takeover of the parent’s global business servicing wind turbines.
 Senvion’s takeover of the maintenance business will position it to raise an additional 500 million euros from selling a 25 percent stake on the London Stock Exchange by March, Tanti said.
 for $404 million as part of the iPhone maker’s takeover of the headphone company.
 Under German takeover law, when a buyer acquires at least 30 percent in a target company, it is required to make an offer to the remaining shareholders unless granted an exemption by Germany’s regulator BaFin.
 “It’s a clean set of numbers and there’s a lot of confidence there” Cash Payout The cash return to shareholders -- Wesfarmers’ second in 12 months -- shows the dearth of investment opportunities seen by the company, which carried out Australia’s biggest takeover with its A$18 billion acquisition of Coles Group Ltd.
 While Siemens said it expects to close the transaction by summer 2015, there is leeway for potential competing offers to be placed as the takeover must still be approved by Dresser-Rand shareholders.
 Kaeser told Bloomberg News in a July interview he had “firepower” for takeovers, after he unsuccessfully tried to compete with GE for Alstom SA’s gas turbines business.
 Dresser-Rand, which has the largest installed base of compressors serving the energy industry, has been seen as a takeover candidate for more than year.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks fell the most in eleven weeks as health-care companies tumbled amid concern tougher American tax rules will erode their takeover appeal and as manufacturing growth slowed in the euro area.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Anheuser-Busch InBev NV’s credit rating would probably be cut to junk should the world’s biggest brewer pursue a takeover of its closest rival SABMiller Plc with a fully debt-funded offer, Fitch Ratings said.
 While the Islamic lender was still involved in partnership negotiations with Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ, Babacan said that the government desired a takeover by state-owned TC Ziraat Bankasi AS, as part of a push to expand Turkey’s share of Shariah-compliant banking.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs Group Inc, the top adviser on corporate takeovers, is changing a policy addressing conflicts of interest to bar investment bankers from trading individual stocks and bonds, a person with direct knowledge of the matter said.
 In 2012, a Delaware judge rebuked Goldman Sachs over its “incomplete and inadequate” handling of a conflict of interest in pipeline operator Kinder Morgan Inc’s $211 billion purchase of El Paso Corp, the investment bank’s biggest takeover assignment the previous year.
 Still, Dollar Tree and Family Dollar reiteratedtheir expectation that the takeover will be completed as soon asthe end of November.
 Deals such as London Stock Exchange Group Plc’s takeover of LCHClearnet Group Ltd.
 “He gets hard stuff done fast, to a level that I have never seen” Nuttall said KKR “overpaid and overleveraged” the First Data deal, which was part of a surge of debt-fueled, supersized takeovers that peaked before the 2008 financial crisis.
 With a takeover of PayPal, Google would stand to become the leader in online payments, which could be integrated into its Android system and counter Apple Inc’s new Apple Pay, according to Gene Munster, an analyst at Piper Jaffray Cos.
 CEO Comments When asked about the potential for a takeover, EBay Chief Executive Officer John Donahoe said a deal isn’t the motivation behind the split.
 (GFIG)shares 11 percent yesterday are reaping rewards after thebrokerage became the subject of a hostile takeover offer.
 Hamstrung by sanctions on Russia and unrest in the Middle East, the corporate giants of Europe’s largest economy are using takeovers to reshape strategies and buy into a US.
 Economic Growth “Global economic growth is coming back and companies are seeking to participate with takeovers as well as by readjusting their structure,” said Tereza Tykvova, a professor and the head of corporate finance at the University of Hohenheim in Stuttgart.
 In being focused on exposure to economic growth and adding new technologies, the current German deals differ from the year’s other major takeover trend -- the run of so-called inversion deals by US.
 Beer Demand “We embrace it,” said Schoen, who spent 28 years at Anheuser-Busch before leaving after a takeover by InBev NV in 2008.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- The takeover of cigarette maker Lorillard Inc.
 and AT&T Inc’s takeover of DirecTV.
 Cuomo promised he’d allow local governments to raise theminimum wage on their own, decriminalize small amounts ofmarijuana and support a Democratic takeover of the New Yorksenate.
 After Orange’s takeover by France Telecom SA, Trujillo in 2005 became the CEO of Melbourne-based Telstra, from which he resigned in 2009 after a tenure marked by clashes with the Australian government over telecommunications regulation.
 takeover rules last summer after New York-based Pfizer Inc’s failed bid for rival drugmaker AstraZeneca Plc, with lawmakers questioning Pfizer’s assurances on retaining jobs and drug research in the UK.
 That wouldn’t be a concern in a takeover of Colgate, as long as the potential acquirer doesn’t seek to move its legal address.
 The firm’s Paulson Partners fund, which bets on companies involved in takeovers, was little changed in August, leaving year-to-date gains at 51 percent.
 So far, there have been disagreements with Hewlett-Packard over issues including the takeover price, signaling EMC may need to devise a backup plan in case it can’t get a deal done.
 While EMC making acquisitions isn’t a bad idea, a takeover of the company may still be more likely at this point, according to Joe Wittine, an analyst at Longbow Research.
 began trading and corporate takeoversboosted investor optimism.
 secured more favorable terms for a proposed acquisition of rival banana producer Fyffes Plc as it tries to fend off an unsolicited takeover approach from a Brazilian group.
 rallied on takeover speculation.
 AOL may have a “seasonally stronger” December quarter and could be target of a takeover by Yahoo Inc! after that company’s windfall of cash following the Alibaba IPO, according to derivatives strategist Richard Anthony.
 Orange this week offered to acquire Spanish broadband provider Jazztel Plc for about 34 billion euros in cash, marking the French carrier’s biggest takeover attempt in almost a decade.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire investor Warren Buffett, who agreed to help finance Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned takeover of coffee-and-doughnut chain Tim Hortons Inc, said the deal wasn’t motivated by taxes.
 is in talks to acquire the company to help it fend off a hostile takeover offer from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 With little debt and a market value that’s almost 16 times the size of MYR, it could easily finance a takeover, he said.
 The offer is 16 percent higher than TRW’s closing price in New York on July 9, the day before Bloomberg News reported ZF’s interest in the takeover.
 In 2012, he engineered a takeover bid for US.
 Veto Right After Orange’s takeover by France Telecom SA, Trujillo in 2005 became the CEO of Melbourne-based Telstra, from which he resigned in 2009 after a tenure marked by clashes with the Australian government over telecommunications regulation.
 Vodafone completed the takeover of Spanish cable provider Grupo Corporativo ONO in July.
 GFI has asked BGC not to recruit key employees for a period of time before talks to discuss BGC’s $675 million takeover offer can begin, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 Let it be known” Arreaza said last week the government would inspect sites to ensure they could be safely “reactivated” The government’s takeover of sites raises “grave concerns” and the company “cannot be responsible for the safety of workers and the surrounding communities or any liability or damages resulting from this occupation,” Clorox said in a statement Sept.
 takeover rules last summer after New York-based Pfizer Inc’s failed bid for rival drugmaker AstraZeneca Plc.
 Pfizer’s attempted takeover of AstraZeneca and General Electric Co’s proposed acquisition this year of Alstom SA’s power business spurred debate about widening public-interest tests in merger control.
 Valeant teamed up with investor Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square to help drive the hostile takeover for the maker of Botox anti-wrinkle treatment.
 The December meeting will allow Allergan shareholders to vote on whether to replace members of the drugmaker’s board as part of the takeover fight.
 (VRSK), the supplierof data to insurers and banks, said its planned $650 milliontakeover of EagleView Technology Corp.
 Sulzer AG slid 41 percent to 12480 Swiss francs after terminating takeover talks with Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 The offer is 16 percent higher than TRW’s closing price in New York on July 9, the day before Bloomberg News reported ZF’s interest in the takeover.
 will borrow more to complete its takeover of the drugmaker after the US.
 The hedge fund founded by billionaire John Paulson is the third-largest holder of Family Dollar stock, with 7 percent of the shares outstanding, and the biggest investor that hasn’t yet publicly taken a stance on the three-way takeover battle.
 Ted Tawinganone, a Los Angeles-based vice president at TCW Group Inc, which oversees $1416 billion of assets, said his firm bought Family Dollar shares as a long-term holding and wasn’t banking on a takeover.
 The world’s largest exporter of power-station coal, which last year completed a $29 billion all-share takeover of Xstrata Ltd, is planning to sell five-year senior unsecured Australian dollar-denominated notes via its local unit, according to a statement from joint sale manager National Australia Bank Ltd.
 15 following a five-weeksuspension imposed on the heels of a failed takeover bid byQatar Islamic Bank SAQ and amid speculation the government willseize the lender.
 “It would begin to address one of the potential sources of competitive disadvantage on the side of Dresser” Takeover Candidate Dresser-Rand, which has the largest installed base of compressors serving the energy industry, has been seen by the industry as a takeover candidate for more than year.
 Dresser-Rand is working with Morgan Stanley to prepare for possible takeover bids from companies including Siemens AG, people with knowledge of the matter said in August.
 Complexity Discount Visteon expanded its electronics division this year with a takeover of a business from Johnson Controls Inc.
 Continental AG and Delphi also make car-electronic parts and could seek to add scale with a takeover of Visteon’s business, said Langan of UBS.
 Full-on Buyer A takeover of all of Visteon also can’t be ruled out, said Sponheimer of Gabelli, who sees Delphi as a possible buyer for the entire company.
 In July, UBS and Gabelli named Visteon as one of the likely next auto-parts takeover targets after ZF Friedrichshafen AG’s talks to acquire TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 AbbVie should be barred from holding a shareholder vote on the takeover until it addresses problems with the deal, including a coercive $545 million termination fee, the Plumbers & Steamfitters Local 60 Pension Plan said today in a Delaware Chancery Court suit.
 franchise is being elevated as it reaps the benefits from its July 2011 takeover of Milwaukee-based lender Marshall & Ilsley Corp, the C$41 billion ($37 billion) deal that doubled US.
 Still, the gap has narrowed since the M&I takeover, Klock said.
 London-based SABMiller had bet that $45 billion Heineken would be the answer, only to have its takeover offer turned down by the company’s founding family, which still controls Heineken, Bloomberg News reported this week.
 is examining plans to raise additional financing to complete its takeover of Shire Plc, after US.
 And, when you have such a large, liquid mega-cap company coming to market, there’s going to be demand” A boom in stock buybacks and corporate takeovers has offset new offerings and reduced the supply of US.
 outlets including Chef & Brewer and Wacky Warehouse, said it rejected a 661 million-pound ($11 billion) all-share takeover approach from competitor Greene King Plc.
 Earlier, Greene King, the owner of the UK’s Hungry Horse pubs and Loch Fyne restaurants, said it made a proposal to Spirit relating to “a potential combination” Under British takeover rules, Greene King has until 5 pm.
 Madrid-based Repsol, studying a full takeover of Talisman, rethought its plans after failing to find buyers for assets it wasn’t interested in owning, including Talisman’s North Sea and Southeast Asia fields, people with knowledge of the matter said Aug.
 The bank claims Citibank Argentina faces possible regulatory and criminal penalties, including the loss of its banking license and its takeover by the government.
 had evaluated as a takeover target, lost 28 percent to 1,038 pence.
 Courts Barclays Settles Lawsuit as Judge Says It Misused Client’s Data Barclays Plc settled a lawsuit in which its client CF Partners (UK) LLP accused the bank of advising on a takeover bid then buying the target itself.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Monarch Group said employees spanning pilots to engineers agreed to contract changes and pay cuts of as much as 30 percent, paving the way for a planned takeover of the UK.
 Since then, Sprint has begun gaining more customers than it loses for the first time since the SoftBank takeover, and the new users have higher credit quality, making them more profitable, he said.
 Fiduciary Duty Williamson said at the meeting that the company was not for sale though it had a fiduciary duty to its shareholders to evaluate takeover proposals.
 A group of state attorneys general recently decided to probe whether the takeover violates antitrust laws, adding to the work they were already doing with the Justice Department on a review of Comcast Corp’s purchase of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The Italian carrier in turn is weighing a takeover of Oi, people familiar with the discussions said this week.
 “I think they want to build an Internet ecosystem like Apple or Google, and e-commerce is just the start” Paul Kranhold, a spokesman for Alibaba at Sard Verbinnen & Co, declined to comment on the company’s takeover plans.
 A small studio such as Lions Gate, which has a market value of $45 billion, or privately held Roku are logical takeover candidates, he said.
 Akamai, another long-speculated takeover candidate, valued at $11 billion, helps make websites and online videos load faster.
 He noted that while Alibaba has tended to opt for minority stakes over full takeovers, it’s possible that could start to change after it lists in the US.
 jumped 45 percent, the most ever, after getting a takeover bid.
 In the News Buffett Says Taxes Didn’t Drive Burger King-Tim Hortons Deal Billionaire investor Warren Buffett, who agreed to helpfinance Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned takeover of coffee-and-doughnut chain Tim Hortons Inc.
Anheuser-Busch InBev NV (ABI) risks a cutto credit ratings should the world’s biggest brewer pursue atakeover of nearest competitor SABMiller Plc, (SAB) researcher FitchRatings said today.
 After boosting revenue more than fivefold in thelast decade with the help of $91 billion of takeovers, growthfor the maker of Budweiser is forecast to slow over the nextdecade, according to analysts’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Ron Zwanziger, who served as Alere’s CEO until July, is one of the Waltham, Massachusetts-based company’s biggest stockholders and has been contacting investors and at least one fellow former executive about a possible takeover for the last two months, according to a filing today.
 “Unfortunately, you can’t have a hostile takeover of a basketball team,” Ellison quipped at an Oracle public event in 2010, the year he was outbid for both the Warriors and the Hornets.
 Clorox, the maker of products from its namesake bleach andFresh Step cat litter to Brita water filters and Burt’s Beeschapstick, became the subject of takeover speculation in Juneand had previously been urged by activist investor Carl Icahn toput itself up for sale.
 SABMiller, long the subject of speculation regarding a takeover by AB InBev, is assessing its next move, the person added, and it’s not clear if it will approach the family again.
 The growth potential of HBO, home to “Game of Thrones” and “Boardwalk Empire,” was a factor in New York-based Time Warner’s decision to reject a $75 billion takeover offer from Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 Top Perch The takeover fight for Family Dollar began in July, whenthe company agreed to be acquired by Dollar Tree for $7450 ashare.
 Bank of America is also advising Hua Capital on the proposed takeover of OmniVision, whose camera sensors have been used in Apple Inc’s iPhone, Steven Zhang, president of the Chinese firm, said in a phone interview.
 Yahoo, now worth less than those Asian stakes, has put $13 billion toward takeovers since 2012, around the same time Mayer took the helm, according to Starboard.
 Yahoo’s trailing 12-month Ebitda was about $18 billion in the period before Mayer took over and embarked upon a takeover spree, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 named activist investor Jeffrey Ubben to its board, underlining the money manager’s support for the drugmaker in a hostile takeover bid for Allergan Inc.
 Allergan CEO David Pyott said in July that the company was seeking acquisitions and “has a lot of options” Ackman earlier this year quietly amassed a 97 percent stake in Allergan, giving Valeant a head start in its takeover effort.
 It would consider takeover offers for the plastics unit, though the priority is a stock listing, he said.
 Today’s announcement may prompt renewed takeover interest from chemical companies seeking to buy the plastics unit, Wenner said.
 Apollo, TPG The parent company, loaded with debt by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in a $307 billion deal at the peak of the last takeover boom in 2008, is talking with senior creditors of the operating unit to craft a restructuring plan that reduces borrowings and curbs $215 billion in annual interest expense, four people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified because the discussions are private, said last week.
 Oliver added that the government remains focused on “jobs, growth and long-term prosperity” Coffee, Doughnuts Trudeau said he doesn’t have a problem with Burger King Worldwide Inc’s proposed C$125 billion takeover of Tim Hortons Inc, the Oakville, Ontario-based company whose coffee and doughnuts are considered Canadian symbols.
 “We need to respect and understand the Canadian-ness of the icon, but I don’t know that we’re taking away from it by growing the company” Burger King applied last week for approval of the deal under Canada’s foreign-takeover law, which requires that purchases of companies worth at least C$354 million be of “net benefit” to the country, Industry Minister James Moore said yesterday from Washington.
 Enterprise value, a metric to gauge the takeover value of a company, includes market capitalization and debt, minus cash and equivalents.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- The UK’s takeover regulator has proposed giving itself powers to enforce commitments by buyers to retain jobs or factories in a merger.
 The Takeover Panel today published a consultation document on new rules, which it said were prompted by Pfizer Inc’s attempted takeover of British drugmaker AstraZeneca Plc, which was rejected earlier this year.
 DirecTV shareholders are scheduled to vote on AT&T’s $485 billion takeover on Sept.
 NextEra Energy Inc, which helped prompt the auction with a takeover bid this year valuing Oncor at more than $175 billion, also signed a non-disclosure agreement letting it conduct due diligence, said the people, requesting anonymity because the process is private.
 Berkshire added fuel to the debate last month when it agreed to provide financing for Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned takeover of coffee-and-doughnut chain Tim Hortons Inc.
 CIMB, Malaysia’s second-biggest bank, and RHB are discussing structuring the deal as a reverse takeover, people familiar with the matter said this month.
 Aabar bought its RHB stake from Abu Dhabi Commercial Bank PJSC for 1080 ringgit per share in 2011, when RHB was the target of a takeover battle between the country’s biggest lender Malayan Banking Bhd.
 They can then decide clear the takeover or open an extended probe of up to four months to examine potential antitrust concerns.
 The shares rose the most since 2011 after the announcement and a weekend report by the New York Post that Clorox had spurned a takeover offer from another consumer-products company earlier this year.
 Takeover Talk The move could also help make Clorox a “cleaner” takeover target, said Ali Dibadj, an analyst at Sanford C.
 17 and fund thepurchase with cash, according to data compiled by BloombergThat implies a takeover price of almost $48 a share.
 Smaller brewer Heineken NV yesterday said in a statement that it turned down a takeover offer from SABMiller, saying it intends to remain independent.
 That’s stoking speculation debt investors stand ready to fund potential takeovers such as a purchase by Anheuser-Busch InBev NV of rival beermaker SABMiller Plc.
 “There is no shortage of investors calling us up and asking what’s the pipeline and saying here’s how we could help” Speculation rose this week that Leuven, Belgium-based AB InBev, the world’s largest brewer, will move forward on a takeover of SABMiller after Heineken NV said Sept.
 analyst Paul Gait yesterday fueled speculation that miner Rio Tinto Plc could become a takeover target for Baar, Switzerland-based Glencore Plc, citing chief executive Ivan Glasenberg’s ambition for expansion and the challenges facing Rio with the price of iron ore down almost 40 percent this year.
 Strategic Review For Rackspace, the deal would cap a strategic review that started in May after years of takeover speculation.
 CenturyLink’s largest acquisition was the $22 billion takeover of Denver-based regional phone company Qwest Communications International Inc, which was completed in 2011.
 The spread between the stock price and Expedia’s offer has left traders with an opportunity to make about an 8 percent return including the special dividend, if the takeover gets approved, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Over the long term, there are lot of mitigating factors and a very strong case as to why the takeover should go ahead” Wotif may have to raise commission rates anyway as it struggles to lift profit in the face of bigger rivals such as Norwalk, Connecticut-based Priceline Group Inc, which offers its namesake website as well as Kayakcom in Australia, he said.
 investors voicing concern the maker of Botox may pursue a costly acquisition to fend off a $54 billion takeover bid by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 That gave Valeant a head start in its takeover effort.
 Chiquita said it continues to support the Fyffes takeover, which would create the world’s largest banana company.
 “But I still think you could ultimately see $83 or $84 because once this asset is bought by one buyer, the buyer that’s left out really doesn’t have a lot of choices” for other takeover targets to pursue.
 Oliver said it’s not clear whether the changes will be retroactive, a move that might affect Burger King Worldwide Inc’s takeover of Canadian coffee and doughnut retailer Tim Hortons Inc.
 Three years after buying the data-analysis company, an acquisition that resulted in an $88 billion writedown and a flurry of shareholder lawsuits, HP Chief Executive Officer Meg Whitman says her company is once again in a position to consider takeover options.
 Buying SimpliVity “would jumpstart them into what’s probably the fastest-growing part of the storage and networking markets” Upton Hack Another takeover candidate that made the Raymond James list is Imperva, an $805 million cybersecurity firm.
 Small Expectations Investors may prefer that HP make several small acquisitions, rather than one large one, given the middling performance of its big takeovers such as Autonomy, Electronic Data Systems Corp.
 Reading Takeover Vibrac this year became part of Reading’s takeover talks because it was a creditor of the Championship club, team director Ian Wood-Smith said in an e-mail.
 Forest Laboratories In July, Actavis closed a $28 billion takeover of Forest Laboratories Inc, making it large enough for Pfizer to target in an inversion under US.
 The complaint comes after New York-based BGC disclosed earlier this week a hostile takeover offer to buy the company for $525 per share in cash, 15 percent higher than CME’s all-stock transaction.
 SABMiller, long the subject of speculation regarding a takeover by Belgian giant Anheuser-Busch InBev NV, is assessing its next move, according to a person familiar with the situation, and it’s not clear whether it will approach the family again.
 “This acquisition will actually give us more financial horsepower on our balance sheet to do even more around the world,” McLoughlin, who last announced a takeover in 2011, said in an interview today.
 (MYR),part of the company that pushed the billionaire out 12 yearsago, is now so cheap after a plunge this month that Lew hasalmost nothing to lose from a takeover, according to ShawStockbroking Ltd.
 Lew declined recently to comment on Myer as a potentialtakeover target.
 “It probably comes down tohow much debt you could put into any transaction” No Risk Myer’s free cash flow, which was A$1425 million in theretailer’s latest fiscal year, would be enough to repay thecosts of Lew’s takeover, said Scott Marshall, a Sydney-basedanalyst at Shaw Stockbroking.
 European antitrust authorities have blocked a full takeover and the UK.
 takeover rules, one person said.
 in an effort to fend off a hostile takeover offer from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, people familiar with the matter have said.
 In July, Actavis closed a $28 billion takeover of Forest Laboratories Inc, making it large enough for Pfizer to target in an inversion under US.
 In a July interview, Kaeser said he has “firepower” for takeovers.
 That takeover turned sour, culminating in a 14 billion-euro impairment charge in 2010 after failing to meet growth targets.
 The acquisition, Telefonica’s biggestsince its $31 billion takeover of O2 Plc in 2005, creates acarrier with 45 million subscribers, ahead of Deutsche TelekomAG and Vodafone Group Plc.
 15 following a five-week suspension imposed on the heels of a failed takeover bid by Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ and amid speculation the government will seize the lender.
 In addition to Qatar Islamic’s failed takeover, local competitor TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided against making a bid to buy the lender last month in favor of starting its own Shariah-compliant unit.
 German company boards have failed to avert takeover bids in the past.
 The government’s takeover of Parex and the lender’s subsequent split may have cost the state 500 million euros, central bank Governor Ilmars Rimsevics said in January on Latvian TV.
 The Irvine, California-based company is battling a takeover attempt by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 Mobile Applications Bosch’s takeover of ZF Lenksysteme gives it access to electronic-steering systems that will be critical to the development of driverless cars.
 In 2012, a Delaware judge rebuked Goldman Sachs over its “incomplete and inadequate” handling of a conflict of interest in pipeline operator Kinder Morgan Inc’s $211 billion purchase of El Paso Corp, the investment bank’s biggest takeover assignment the previous year.
 Berkshire, led by Warren Buffett, committed $3 billion to help finance Miami-based Burger King’s planned takeover of Tim Hortons Inc, the doughnut maker with headquarters in Oakville, Ontario.
 soared 54 percent after people familiar with the mattersaid it is weighing a takeover offer from SoftBank Corp.
 said the government of Argentina has “a gun to our head,” threatening the forced takeover of its branch in that country if the bank obeys a US.
 In addition to PayPal, EBay’s marketplaces business could also become an attractive takeover target.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Family Dollar Stores Inc, in rebuffing a $91 billion takeover by Dollar General Corp, has cited the antitrust hurdles a deal would face, arguing that the two discount chains compete heavily on price.
 An acquirer can bolster its case by showing that its prices are lower than those of the takeover target, Keeley said.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- A group of state attorneys general is examining whether AT&T Inc’s proposed takeover of satellite-television provider DirecTV violates antitrust laws, the Florida Attorney General’s Office said.
 “The market was expecting a takeover until today,” Marco Contreras, a senior analyst for equities at Kallpa Securities SAB in Lima, said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 “But Origin and AWE have the financial and operating capability to develop and deliver the project, so I don’t believe there’s a need to bring in additional partners” AWE in December rejected a A$752 million ($662 million) initial takeover proposal from Senex Energy Ltd, saying it undervalued its shares.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Epiq Systems Inc, the provider of legal software for electronic discovery in bankruptcy and class action cases, rejected a $20-a-share takeover offer from its now largest shareholder P2 Capital Partners LLC.
 Since July, the Istanbul-based bank’s talks with Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ for a buyout deal failed and state-run TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided against a takeover.
 The original complaint listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions in which private-equity firms were accused of shortchanging shareholders in target companies of billions of dollars by colluding to suppress takeover bids.
 sold $24 billion of debt backingtakeovers of companies to Ares Management LP at a discount.
 (CZR)’s takeover, toAres six months later.
 Enterprise value, a metric to gauge the takeover value of a company, includes market capitalization and debt, minus cash and equivalents.
 The $271 billion IPO, a record for alodging company, came six years after Blackstone’s $26 billiontakeover of the hotel operator in October 2007.
 sank 85 percent in Sydneyafter ending takeover talks with private equity suitors.
 It also could block or at least delay one potential way for Anheuser-Busch InBev NV to add to its own empire, with a long-speculated potential takeover of SABMiller.
 The brewer would be “the best fit” for a takeover by SABMiller, given Heineken’s resistance, Sanjeet Aujla, an analyst at Credit Suisse Group AG in London, said today in a note.
 Not only is he the largest shareholder, he also presided over a fourfold jump in the shares since he became chairman in 2004 as well as the revenue and market-share growth that turned Jazztel into a takeover target.
 Kmart, Sears Kmart acquired Sears Roebuck in 2005 in a $123 billiontakeover that Lampert said would create a company with thegeographic reach and scale to compete with Wal-Mart Stores IncSales peaked at $53 billion in fiscal 2007, Bloomberg data show.
 is in talks to acquire Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd, reviving discussions that began in July in an effort to fend off a hostile takeover offer from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The takeover of assets in Venezuela won’t have an impact on Clorox’s fiscal 2015 financial outlook, according to today’s statement.
 (GE)’s takeover of Alstom SA (ALO)’s energyassets creates a stronger No.
 as part of a $50 billion takeover binge formore than 100 companies over the past decade.
 Mainland companies have favored IPOs in Hong Kong this year, while those seeking a Singapore listing, including developer Chiwayland International Ltd, pursued reverse takeovers of companies on the Southeast Asian bourse.
 The exchange said the suspension was due to “uncertainties over the bank’s ownership” after a takeover bid by Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ failed and state-owned TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided against making a bid to buy the bank.
 The takeover follows Cognizant’s 11 percent share decline this year, driven largely by the company reducing its annual revenue forecast in August because of tech-service deals taking longer to close.
 “That’s what makes this combination of TriZetto and Cognizant so strategically competitive” The takeover will be paid for with a combination of cash and debt, and Cognizant said it has arranged $1 billion in financing to back the purchase.
 Family Dollar is at the center of a three-way takeover battle, with Dollar Tree Inc.
 The additional disclosure requirement was adopted by Congress in 1968 to help make shareholders and a target company’s management aware of a pending takeover attempt.
 The takeover target has accepted a lower bid from Dollar Tree Inc.
 The hostile offer ratchets up a three-way takeover battle that has grown increasingly rancorous.
 “They have a good chance of winning a hostile takeover battle unless Dollar Tree matches their offer,” he said.
 In the wake of the financial meltdown, Lawsky led some of the state’s highest-profile investigations of Wall Street, including the takeover of Merrill Lynch by Bank of America and the collapse of the auction-rate securities market.
 To gain regulatory approval for the takeover, the company sold some assets and stopped using some brands in Brazil.
Waertsilae Oyj (WRT1V), which rebuffedRolls-Royce Holdings Plc (RR/)’s takeover approach earlier this year,is now eyeing its own targets.
 takeovers ifthey are suitable, Chief Strategy Officer Jim Ryan said today ata Royal Television Society conference in London.
 Dresser-Rand is working with Morgan Stanley to prepare forpossible takeover bids from companies including Siemens, peoplewith knowledge of the matter said last month.
 (TWE) endedtakeover talks with two private equity suitors including KKR &Co.
 “The boardhad made it clear that they didn’t believe a takeover was theright way to go but it’s a belligerent move” Treasury Wine, which last month posted its first full-yearloss since listing in 2011, said the suitors hadn’t identified“any major concerns with the business” KKR, which made the approach with Rhone Capital LLC, saidin a separate statement that Treasury Wine “showed greatcapability and understanding” of its business.
 tumbled the most since February after the cloud-computing provider rejected takeover offers and decided to remain independent.
 in an effort to fend off Valeant’s hostile takeover.
 RBS, which had said it was open to takeover offers for the unit, is spinning off the lender to boost profitability and recoup some of the money spent on a bailout during the financial crisis.
 RBS had been open to takeover offers for Citizens, holding talks with potential buyers that didn’t yield anything substantial, Van Saun said in January.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Kvaerner ASA surged as much as 12 percent in Oslo trading after the Norwegian maker of oil platforms, which is controlled by billionaire Kjell Inge Roekke, said it may seek a merger or a takeover.
 on takeover speculation.
 A lawyer representing Barclays said at an April hearing they were discussing hedging agreements with Tricorona rather than a takeover.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- SABMiller Plc’s failure to erect a defense against Anheuser-Busch InBev NV by combining with Heineken NV has left the world’s second-largest brewer even more vulnerable to a takeover by the industry leader.
 SABMiller is assessing its next move, the people said, yet its options are now more limited and the ball is in the Belgian giant’s court to move forward with a long-speculated takeover.
 And AB InBev risks a cut to its credit ratings should it pursue a takeover, researcher Fitch Ratings said Sept 9.
 Presuming there is an acquisition, we’d have to see what size it is, and probably we would have to take on some debt” A takeover would let America Movil and Oi gain market share in Brazil by dividing the assets of the nation’s second-largest mobile-phone carrier between them.
 Federal Communications Commission stopped the clock on the deal review yesterday to resolve disputes over who can see programming contracts, creating the risk that the takeover may take longer to complete.
 Chevron hasn’t spent more than $1 billion on a takeover since 2010, while ConocoPhillips has sat out for about a decade.
 Oncor Auction The Oncor auction plan was triggered by a June takeover offer by NextEra Energy Inc.
 Managers of Laval, Quebec-based Valeant didn’t specify when they’d make the next move in their hostile takeover battle for Allergan, which makes the anti-wrinkle treatment Botox.
 Valeant plans to raise its takeover offer for Allergan close to the Dec.
 takeover.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Greenhill & Co, the takeover adviser founded by former Morgan Stanley President Robert Greenhill, reported profit that beat analysts’ estimates as revenue from advising on deals increased.
 regulatory scrutiny of leveraged lending is leading the biggest banks to back away from funding some takeovers financed by debt, creating an opportunity for smaller competitors to step in.
 leveraged loans sold to investors, is also arranging $1 billion of loans for Vista Equity Partners’ takeover of TransFirst Inc, according to a person with knowledge of the financing.
 JPMorgan opted to use one of its exceptions to finance Vista’s takeover of Tibco, according to a person with knowledge of the matter who said the bank expects to take a couple exceptions each year.
 The pattern hasn’t slowed takeovers.
 Discussions to acquire data-storage company EMC stalled last month because of disagreements over a takeover price and management structure, people familiar with the talks said at the time.
 Fyffes said in a separate statement today that its merger with Chiquita remains “superior” to Cutrale-Saffra’s takeover of Chiquita.
 The latest offer is below the $16 minimum needed to match the economics of Chiquita’s proposed takeover of Fyffes, David Holohan, a Dublin-based analyst at Merrion Capital Group Ltd, said in an e-mail today.
 French competition authorities yesterday approved billionaire Patrick Drahi’s $23 billion takeover of SFR to combine the French wireless carrier with his cable provider Numericable Group.
 raised its earnings forecast, bolstering the drugmaker’s defense against Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s hostile takeover attempt.
 The activist investor hasn’t spurred the deals some investors expected, with Repsol SA scrapping a takeover bid for the $84 billion company and Chief Executive Officer Hal Kvisle unable to sell assets amid losses at its North Sea operations and declining crude prices.
 Troubled Unit Repsol, Spain’s largest oil producer, had explored a takeover but couldn’t find buyers for Talisman holdings including the company’s North Sea unit, said people with knowledge of the matter, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The arrival of a heavyweight CEO may also help to stem takeover chatter around BG, heightened by the sudden departure of Finlayson.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- A group led by New York-based attorney Joe Tacopina completed the acquisition of soccer’s Bologna, the second takeover of an Italian club by North American investors since 2011.
 rose 14 percent after Qatar Investment Authority and Thomas Lau’s family were said to weigh a full takeover of the department-store operator.
 Qatar Investment Authority and Hong Kong’s Lau family are considering options including a full takeover of the company after the sovereign wealth fund bought a minority stake, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 “It is time to allow GFI shareholders to choose for themselves” Hostile takeovers -- deals opposed by the management of the company being acquired -- are unusual in the financial-services industry, where revenue is often dependent on star traders or salesmen, Alexander said.
 “We just work harder at it” This gave Valeant a leg up in competing for takeovers against US.
 on its failed attempt to get a British address through a takeover of AstraZeneca Plc.
 Undeterred, CEO Pearson is pursuing a $50 billion hostile takeover of California-based Botox maker Allergan Inc.
 “This move sends a clear message that a takeover of Usiminas, even if not imminent, is no longer a highly unlikely scenario” Usiminas became Brazil’s most-shorted stock after the power struggle led to the ouster of Chief Executive Officer Julian Eguren and two other Techint-appointed directors last week.
 The $485 billion takeover -- inching closer to completion after DirecTV shareholders voted in favor -- will give AT&T satellite-TV subscribers across Latin America, particularly in Mexico and Brazil.
 ‘Attractive’ Industry “Software providers in general are very attractive for private equity, especially when the stocks are trailing due to macroeconomic developments, or due to the Dutch discount” that can lower companies’ value in the country because of countermeasures against hostile takeovers, Martijn den Drijver, an analyst at SNS Securities said, by phone.
 “Either management isn’t focused on operations in the run-up to the deal, or they aren’t good operators” The falling number of Americans paying for TV is part of the driving force behind Comcast’s proposed $452 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- It’s time for Big Blue to shift some of its buyback budget to takeovers.
 A takeover of SoftLayer Technologies Inc.
 A takeover like that “would move the needle for IBM in a meaningful way but would keep it core to” the enterprise software it’s known for, said Del Prete at IDC.
 If regulators approve a takeover of Portugal Telecom without requirements of asset disposals, Altice would get a landline market share of more than 56 percent in the country, based on first-quarter data compiled by Bloomberg.
 in failing to secure a takeover of the smallest of the four major US.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Ace Ltd’s Evan Greenberg, who has pursued expansion with takeovers in Mexico, Thailand and the US, said he expects an increase of insurance industry mergers and acquisitions as competition squeezes profit margins.
 For its part, Allergan is looking to fend off a hostile takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square teamed up with Valeant to help drive the takeover.
 The company in June hired Bob Deutsch as chief strategy officer to lead an expansion, including possible takeovers.
 Glass Lewis & Co, another proxy advisory firm, recommended rejecting the Fyffes takeover on Oct.
 1, in a decline that has reinvigorated takeover speculation as large chemical companies look to expand in markets that are closer to the consumer and more resilient to economic downturns.
 stock is being scrutinized by a judge who must decide whether the hedge fund manager can vote his 10 percent stake to help seal a hostile takeover bid by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 The attorney argued that Valeant wanted Pershing Square to acquire a toehold in Allergan so it could use the shares to press for a vote to remove obstructing directors and Allergan’s poison pill against hostile takeovers.
 He engineered Total’s purchase of Belgium’s Petrofina SA in 1999 and five months later began a hostile takeover of Elf Aquitaine SA, which was completed in 2000 after a counter-bid from Elf failed.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Danone’s $566 million purchase of a stake in a Chinese infant formula maker signals the French food company favors a gradual expansion in that market, which analysts say may cool speculation about a takeover of Mead Johnson Nutrition Co.
 (CQB)said its shareholders rejected a proposed takeover of Ireland’sFyffes Plc (FFY) that would have created the world’s largest bananaproducer.
 Asked whether Balfour Beatty could again become a takeover target, the new CEO said he’s confident the company will stay independent.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA plans to eliminate 18 percent of its workforce in Germany following the completion of its $11 billion takeover of wireless carrier E-Plus this month.
 Telefonica’s takeover of E-Plus from Royal KPN NV created Germany’s largest wireless carrier by customers, with almost 47 million connections, ahead of Deutsche Telekom AG and Vodafone Group Plc.
 In the long term, a takeover ofPacific would boost Alfa as well, transforming the Mexican makerof chemicals and car parts into a top energy producer, MonexCasa de Bolsa and Interacciones Casa de Bolsa say.
 Pacific’s support of any acquisition would be crucial, Alfasaid yesterday, ruling out a hostile takeover.
 Chief ExecutiveOfficer Ronald Pantin said in an interview last month thatPacific has takeover defenses in place to assure shareholdersreceive an attractive premium.
 Neuhauser, the fund manager, said an Alfa takeover ofPacific would be a good fit.
 At $5537 a share, the takeover values Cleco at 15 percent more than its Oct.
 Prior to the announcement, the utility had fallen 16 percent since it first said it had received takeover interest in June.
 In General Electric’s takeover of key parts of Alstom SA, in ArcelorMittal’s plan to close a section of a steel factory, in job cuts at Alcatel-Lucent SA or in the record US.
 Australia has a record of blocking controversial takeovers, including Royal Dutch Shell Plc’s bid for control of Woodside Petroleum Ltd.
 takeover rules it will now be barred from a renewed attempt for six months unless it obtains Rio’s board recommendation, a third party makes an offer for Rio or there are other material changes.
 Rejected Deals In November, Treasurer Joe Hockey rejected Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s takeover of GrainCorp Ltd, saying it wasn’t in the national interest.
 The poison-pill plan, which expires in a year, wasn’t adopted in response to any takeover bid or other acquisition proposal, Conn’s said.
 That’s gotta hurt” AbbVie’s proposed $515 billion takeover of Shire was plagued with risk as mounting US.
 Speaking in Canada, where Ackman praised the country’s more lax regulatory environment when it comes to Acktivist (tm) investing strategies, Ackman said his lawyers obtained documents showing Allergan “put out materially misleading statements” in “a conscious takeover defense strategy to malign Valeant,” Scott Deveau and Beth Jinks reported.
 Presumably the documents were discovered in preparation for Pershing Square’s defense of Allergan’s legal complaint that Ackman and Pershing Square engaged in insider trading to acquire the Allergan stake it then used to launch its hostile takeover effort.
 We think it’s the perfect fit” Enterprise’s takeover offer for the rest of the company, sent to the Oiltanking board today, would value Oiltanking at $4957 a unit, according to Bloomberg calculations.
 The two companies are structuring a deal between them as a so-called reverse takeover, with RHB issuing new shares to acquire its larger competitor.
 Aabar paid 1080 ringgit per share, when RHB was the target of a takeover battle between Malayan Banking and CIMB.
 Vocus has announced 14 takeovers since 2000, the data show.
 Shire Plc, which yesterday plunged the most in 11 years, tumbled 73 percent to 3,718 pence today, after AbbVie Inc’s board formally asked shareholders to vote against its takeover of the company.
 “Underlying fundamentals including fundraising, realization activity, investment activity and portfolio performance all remain strong” Blackstone, which under Chief Executive Officer Steve Schwarzman has been the most successful leveraged-buyout firm to diversify beyond corporate takeovers and into businesses such as property and hedge funds, last week decided to spin off its advisory units in an effort to reduce conflicts of interest with its fund management groups.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar Investment Authority and Hong Kong’s Lau family are considering options including a full takeover of department store operator Lifestyle International Holdings Ltd.
 A full takeover offer isn’t imminent, the people said.
 for its takeover of Bear Stearns in March 2008.
 Takeover Advice Goldman’s figure included $594 million of financial-advisory revenue, including fees for takeover advice, an increase of 40 percent.
 jumped 99 percent to a record $10023 after Reuters reported that Danone SA has decided it wants to pursue a takeover of the company, according to people familiar with the matter.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Family Dollar Stores Inc, the discount retailer at the center of a three-way takeover battle, reported earnings that missed analysts’ estimates after price cuts narrowed profit margins.
 “Lumos’s fiber asset would certainly fit that bill” Potential Acquirers CenturyLink, a $23 billion company, earlier this year weighed a takeover of Rackspace Hosting Inc.
 will probably have finished their respective takeovers of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The CEO’s review comes as Glencore Plc’s interest in Rio Tinto Group fuels industry speculation that Anglo may become a takeover target for one of its larger rivals.
 A rebound in consumer demand coupled with a surge in transporting crude oil by rail is driving earnings for CSX, making it an attractive takeover target, said Gary Bradshaw, a fund manager with Hodges Capital Management Inc.
 The total value of global takeovers jumped 29 percent from a year earlier to about $887 billion in the third quarter, led by AbbVie Inc’s $55 billion bid for Dublin-based drugmaker Shire Plc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Earlier this week, Fosun succeeded in its takeover bid of Espirito Santo Saude SGPS SA, Euronext Lisbon said in a statement yesterday.
 A gauge of health-care stocks posted the second-worst performance of the 19 industry groups in the Stoxx 600 as other companies seen as tax-friendly takeover targets also fell.
 had evaluated as a takeover target, lost 54 percent to 9215 pence.
 Heineken, which termed a takeover approach from SABMiller as “non-actionable,” said Aug.
 “We wanted it in black and white” Bakke said, referring to government support for the takeover.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- October was a slow month for mergers and acquisitions, but it’s too soon to assume this means 2014’s takeover boom is over.
 Globally, companies struck about $232 billion of takeovers this month through yesterday -- the lowest amount since March and below the average of about $300 billion in each of the prior six months.
 With two months still to go, 2014 is already the best for takeovers since before the financial crisis, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Bankers and lawyers who advise on takeovers say they’ve got a robust pipeline of deals in the works.
 The Chicago-based company wont make another $50 billion-plus takeover again, Chief Executive Richard Gonzalez said today, citing unique characteristics about Shire that made it “out of the normal course of our M&A strategy” That wasn’t the only deal to die this month.
 takeover rules.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Recruit Holdings Co, Japan’s biggest provider of temporary staff, identified about 100 global companies as potential takeover targets after completing an initial public offering this month.
 will proceed with its 352 million-euro ($449 million) bid to buy rival banana producer Fyffes Plc after rejecting a higher takeover offer from Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group.
 Concessions by billionaire John Malone’s Liberty Global ensured that the takeover wouldn’t be “detrimental to Dutch consumers, who will continue to enjoy the benefits of innovative services and choice,” EU Competition Commissioner Joaquin Almunia said in an e-mailed statement.
 Republicans have been warning that the logical extension of the administration’s approach would be more foreign takeovers of US.
 Chief Executive Officer Stephen Glancey said the company is restricted under takeover rules from making a full-year forecast as it’s deemed to be a potential bidder for Spirit.
 20 it would accept a sweetened 723 million-pound ($117 billion) takeover offer from Bury St Edmunds, England-based Greene King Plc.
 BASF SE, the world’s largest chemical producer, may be interested in a takeover, said Kepler Cheuvreux.
 An acquisition would add to the busiest year for chemical dealmaking since 2008, with more than $55 billion in takeovers announced so far.
 turning its attention to a $485 billion takeover of DirecTV this year to shore up its TV business.
 said its funds filed a complaint to a German court, demanding access to a document related to the cable company’s takeover by Vodafone Group Plc last year.
 Elliott filed the lawsuit to the Munich regional court, seeking a special auditor’s report that “apparently examined several statements and actions” of Kabel Deutschland concerning the purchase and the valuation of the shares during the takeover offer, New York-based Elliott said today.
 bought Arcelor SA in 2006 in the steel industry’s biggest takeover.
 Two years later it sold shares in a Hong Kong IPO after it was the subject of a failed takeover bid from the UK’s Prudential Plc.
 DreamWorks Animation held takeover talks with SoftBank, people familiar with the matter told Bloomberg News and other news outlets last month.
 That suggests talks with EMC -- which were said to have stalled last month because of disagreements over a takeover price and management structure -- aren’t yet dead, said Longbow Research LLC.
 Actavis has been linked to almost $70 billion worth of potential purchases: it could get in a bidding war and try to acquire Allergan Inc, which is looking to thwart a hostile takeover; gastrointestinal drugmaker Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd; or consumer-health company Omega Pharma NV, people with knowledge of the matter have said.
 takeover code.
 Glencore was required by China to sell its $585 billion Las Bambas copper mine as a condition of approving the company’s takeover of Xstrata Ltd.
 Chinalco’s 2008 raid on Rio Tinto was also pivotal in thwarting a takeover approach from BHP Billiton Ltd, the world’s biggest mining company.
 China’s competition regulator focused its review of the Xstrata takeover on the new company’s influence in the copper-concentrate market, according to Glasenberg, Glencore’s chief executive officer.
 Federal Communications Commission stopped the clock on the deal review yesterday to resolve disputes over who can see programming contracts, creating the risk that the takeover may take longer to complete.
 Time Warner is holding its investor day to outline its plans to accelerate revenue and profit growth as an independent company after rejecting a $75 billion takeover bid from Rupert Murdoch’s Fox.
 Failed Takeovers The executive is seeking to prove T-Mobile can thrive on its own after three aborted takeover attempts in the past three years.
 Ackman has called Allergan’s request “drastic and unprecedented,” which we note not without some irony, given the structure of the takeover attempt.
 Evonik is talking to advisers about a potential deal with DSM, which would create a company with about 22 billion euros ($28 billion) in sales, as well as analyzing other takeover options, said the people, who asked not to be identified because discussions are private.
 Evonik hasn’t decided whether it will pursue an acquisition and DSM may resist a takeover, they said.
 Evonik spokeswoman Barbara Mueller denied any plans or considerations to buy DSM, saying “that is definitely not the case and there are no talks” Representatives for DSM, Clariant and Croda declined to comment on whether Evonik is evaluating them as a takeover target.
 European Woes Any takeover may help Evonik boost growth at a time when a recovery in economic growth in western Europe is stuttering.
 It’s the fifth-largest pending or completed takeover of a US.
 Just months after rejecting a takeover offer from 21st Century Fox Inc, Bewkes forecast earnings growth that exceeded the average of analysts’ estimates.
 “This theme of investing both inside and outside the traditional ecosystem is one you’re going to hear today from all our divisions” Bewkes, 62, is under pressure to prove that his company can deliver better returns on its own after spurning a $75 billion takeover offer from Rupert Murdoch’s Fox.
 plans to raise its takeover offer for Allergan Inc.
 A bulk of that profit came from its Indian operations, as the takeover happened on Jan.
 AstraZeneca, a London-based drugmaker that spurned a takeover offer from Pfizer Inc.
 takeover laws and put a 75 percent probability on the deal proceeding.
 takeover code.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Shire Plc raised its profit forecast a third time, after the drugmaker’s sales beat estimates in a quarter during which the company was occupied with AbbVie Inc’s now-defunct $52 billion takeover.
 “The market could get excited again once they announce the details as other banks are watching the outcome and how it might impact on their market positioning” New Shares CIMB and RHB Capital plan to structure a deal between them as a so-called reverse takeover, with RHB issuing new shares to acquire its larger competitor, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 Aabar paid 1080 ringgit per share, when RHB was the target of a takeover battle between Malayan Banking and CIMB.
 This year, Siemens completed the takeover of IBS AG, a quality-control software company based near Koblenz, Germany, to expand its product range.
 A similar-sized pay-TV deal, AT&T Inc’s $485 billion takeover of DirecTV, has followed a different trajectory.
 takeover.
 ahead of a takeover bid, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 He teamed up with the pro-market Trade Minister Matthias Fekl and Macron, who as Hollande’s former economic adviser handled business deals including GE’s Alstom takeover and the record US.
 Viehbacher won the respect of the directors after his success in the takeover fight for US.
 “The buyback is a further step in the creeping takeover of Hochtief by ACS,” UBS analysts including Daniel Porter wrote in a note to clients today.
 The new buyback may boost the holding to 65 percent, increasing expectations of a full takeover, according to analysts at Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Separation Plans EBay and PayPal are considered takeover candidates after their split, for buyers such as Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 $47 billion acquisition of Smithfield Foods Inc, the largest Chinese takeover of a US.
 In July, Greenlight said it saw an opportunity to bet against Mallinckrodt Plc, a specialty-pharmaceuticals manufacturer, if it completed its $58 billion takeover of Questcor Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Shire Plc stock plunged for a second day after AbbVie Inc’s board recommended that shareholders vote against a 325 billion-pound ($52 billion) takeover of the maker of rare-disease treatments, citing a change in tax rules that would undermine the deal’s rationale.
 AstraZeneca Plc, the London-based drugmaker that spurned a takeover offer from Pfizer Inc.
 -Allergan Inc, seeking to fend off a $54 billion takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, will try to persuade a judge to bar billionaire Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP from voting its 10 percent stake at a December shareholder meeting.
 The Botox maker claimed Ackman illegally acquired shares based on inside knowledge of the takeover plan.
 and Shire Plc agreed this week to terminate a $52 billion takeover, citing new US.
 for $799 million, paving the way for a full takeover.
 “The language and nature of the update suggests that theinvestigation has not uncovered any new substantial negatives,”Deutsche Bank, which rates the company at hold, said in a noteThe “announcement will inevitably raise fresh questions onAfren’s vulnerability to a takeover” To contact Bloomberg News staff for this story:Jillian Ward in London at jward98@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Will Kennedy at wkennedy3@bloombergnetAlex Devine Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 Telefonica, owner of the Vivo brand in Brazil, isn’t involved in discussions to acquire Oi and is focused on completing its own takeover of broadband provider GVT, according to another person familiar with the matter.
 Altice is bulking up in Europe through acquisitions, including a $23 billion takeover in France to combine cable operator Numericable Group with phone carrier SFR.
 Since starting in March as head of Ericsson’s newly created cloud unit, Jason Hoffman, 42, has helped orchestrate a takeover of a California software provider and struck a partnership with a security company to bolster his division and differentiate its offering.
 A takeover of San Francisco-based Apcera the same month added cloud-based platform-as-a-service software to Ericsson’s technology.
 Khodorkovsky, Yukos In 2006, Gazprombank helped Rosneft, where Sechin was chairman, fund the state-run crude producer’s takeover of most of Mikhail Khodorkovsky’s Yukos Oil Co.
 While there’s speculation the Pacific Rubiales stake might be a precursor to a joint venture or full takeover, a growing number of analysts have expressed concern the oil company’s reserves are inflated, a potential problem made more acute by the tumble in oil.
 Alfa first disclosed a 10 percent stake in the Colombian producer on May 20, triggering a month-long, 20 percent rally in Pacific Rubiales’s shares as some investors bet that a takeover was in the offing.
 “We definitely do not agree that our reserves are in any way overreported or inflated” Alfa’s stake in Pacific Rubiales is just below the 20 percent threshold that would require a company to start a takeover bid in most cases under Canadian securities law.
 22 that it is in talks with Swisscanto about a takeover of the asset manager.
 -- itself trying to fend off a hostile takeover offer from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 Parish led a takeover of the team following its last period in administration in 2010.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Altice SA won French antitrust approval for its $23 billion takeover of SFR, removing an obstacle for billionaire Patrick Drahi’s plan to combine the phone carrier with cable provider Numericable Group.
 Spokesmen for Alibaba and Youku declined to comment on the prospects of a takeover by Alibaba.
 A takeover valuation for Youku would be low if based on a multiple of its sales or earnings, said Mewawalla at CM Research.
 Ma has described his plan to create an “ecosystem” through takeovers.
 He sealed the $76 billion takeover of Dresser-Rand Inc.
 “We have consistently told the market that part of the problem with oversupply in coal has been due to legacy capex commitments that we inherited with the takeover of Xstrata, which we could not cancel,” Glencore said.
 We believe in being the lowest-cost producer” Glasenberg, a 57-year-old accountant turned coal trader, last year doubled down on the power-station fuel, betting on rising world demand as he completed the $29 billion takeover of Xstrata Ltd.
 Four months after completing the Xstrata takeover, Glencore told investors in September last year that about 30 percent of seaborne coal was being sold at a loss.
 To offset slowing growth in Europe, Orange last month offered 34 billion euros to acquire Spanish broadband provider Jazztel Plc, marking the French company’s biggest takeover attempt in almost a decade.
 A takeover of SABMiller would be “boring,” said Sachin Shah, a special-situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried.
 Cost Benefits One driver for a takeover would be the potential cost and revenue benefits of selling beer and soft drinks through the same distribution system.
 A takeover of PepsiCo may have a better chance of adding to AB InBev’s earnings than a purchase of SABMiller, said Withagen at Kepler Cheuvreux.
 “It’s with other brewers that they’ll get the most cost savings, that they’ll be able to more closely integrate operations, distribution” Beer Options While a Heineken NV takeover would add another strong brand to AB InBev’s beer line-up, it seems unlikely the company’s founding family would be willing to sell after it rejected an offer from SABMiller and said it wants to keep the brewer independent, Gorham said.
 rose 11 percent to C$14684, the highest in a month, after the drugmaker said it’s prepared to raise its hostile takeover bid for Allergan Inc.
 The takeover of Shire would have expanded AbbVie’s portfolio of medicines, particularly by gaining treatments for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.
 Weisfelner countered Keglevic’s arguments, saying bidders might trim their offers because it’s not known whether they can carry out an Oncor takeover on terms set today.
 There hasn’t been a major North American railroad takeover since Warren Buffett’s purchase of Burlington Northern Santa Fe in 2010.
 Each one could use a takeover of Norfolk Southern to form their own transcontinental railroads, should a merger between Canadian Pacific and CSX force them to “scramble to match the scale and pricing power of their peers,” Seidl wrote.
 “We see very strong demand in all the key gateway markets for good-quality real estate” Representatives for CapitaRetail and the company that manages Saizen, Singapore-based Japan Residential Assets Manager Ltd, declined to comment on the prospects for any takeover.
 Soriot, who successfully fought off Pfizer Inc’s $117 billion hostile takeover this year, didn’t express interest, said the people, who asked not to be identified commenting on internal Sanofi matters.
 If the takeover is scrapped, it would be the largest casualty of the US.
 under the nation’s foreign takeover law, according to a spokesman for the minister in charge of the study.
 Canada reviews all foreign takeovers of businesses valued at more than C$354 million to determine if the deal represents a “net benefit” to the country.
 In the decade before she took over as chief executive officer, Hewlett-Packard spent almost three times as much on takeovers and related banker fees -- about $66 billion in all -- than it was left with in market value at its trough.
 as attractive takeover candidates for Hewlett-Packard.
 I do hope that people make acquisitions because of the value of the companies and not because of tax” Actelion, the Allschwil, Switzerland-based maker of Tracleer lung treatment, has become a perennial subject of takeover speculation.
 In a note that may reignite speculation about a possible takeover of the Atlanta-based company, Nomura’s Ian Shackleton and Edward Mundy said Coca-Cola’s plans to bolster its business, including a $3 billion cost-cutting initiative unveiled last week, need to “step up considerably” If not, a leveraged buyout financed by parties such as Buffett, the company’s largest shareholder, and investment firm 3G could value the soda maker’s shares at $90, more than twice their current price, they said.
 AbbVie’s board recommended that shareholders vote against the 325 billion-pound ($52 billion) takeover, saying changes in tax regulation did not support the agreed-upon valuation.
 Cohen had succeeded in re-working the terms of JPMorgan Chase & Co’s takeover of Bear Stearns and the Fed was worried that he might try again with AIG, Baxter testified.
 ‘Tax Tricks’ Actelion, which has been a perennial subject of takeover speculation, is not for sale, and the US.
 Investors allocated more money to event-driven funds, which typically try to profit by trading on corporate events such as takeovers, than any other strategy in the third quarter, according to Hedge Fund Research Inc.
 Comcast’s proposed $452 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable, the second-largest US.
 Comcast said today it still expects the takeover to be completed in early 2015.
 The original complaint, filed in 2007, listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions in which private-equity firms were accused of shortchanging shareholders in target companies of billions of dollars by colluding to suppress takeover bids.
 contacted Hewlett-Packard about selling itself, though disagreements arose over a takeover price and management.
 The airline is one of Australia’s top takeover targets, Matthew Ross, an analyst with Goldman Sachs Inc, wrote in a note to clients dated yesterday.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- RealD Inc, the supplier of 3-D technology to cinemas, received a $12-a-share takeover bid from Starboard Value LP, the activist investor that’s pressing Yahoo! Inc.
 Buffett Deal There hasn’t been a major North American railroad takeover since Warren Buffett’s purchase of Burlington Northern Santa Fe in 2010.
 takeover rules.
 shareholders may be set for a windfall with or without a takeover of the Australian copper producer.
 “If a takeover doesn’t materialize, any selldown would present a pretty attractive buying opportunity” A representative for PanAust declined to comment on the prospects for a deal.
 The auction of Oncor, the company’s prize asset, was triggered by a takeover offer valued at more than $175 billion by a group including Morgan Stanley and NextEra Energy Inc.
 The Atlas Energy takeover amounts to $187 billion.
 “It’s certainly a pinpoint that offers a lot of challenges” Should Canadian Pacific revive acquisition efforts, the Calgary-based company would probably shy away from any hostile takeovers, the CEO said.
 The buyout, two years after Bertelsmann failed to agree with the Jahr family on a full takeover, would facilitate cooperation between the publisher and Bertelsmann’s broadcaster RTL Group SA and its Penguin Random House book-publishing venture.
 withdrew from takeover talks in August over conditions of the deal and concern that regulators wouldn’t approve a combination of the third- and fourth-largest wireless carriers in the nation.
 After price increases that followed Hutchison’s takeover of Orange Austria last year, new so-called virtual operators that rent frequencies from other carriers are poised to enter the local market in coming months.
 takeover rules, the producer and trader is barred from a renewed attempt for six months unless it obtains the Rio board’s recommendation, a third party makes an offer for the company, or there are other material changes.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc won backing from a European Union regulator for an ovarian-cancer drug, one of the experimental medicines the company cited as a reason for fending off Pfizer Inc’s $117 billion takeover offer this year.
 AstraZeneca said Pfizer’s hostile takeover offer undervalued the company’s pipeline of experimental drugs, including olaparib.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc and other health-care companies considered to be tax-friendly takeover targets slumped after US.
 AstraZeneca, a London-based drugmaker that spurned a takeover offer from Pfizer Inc.
 Shares in Actavis Plc, which is based in Parsippany, New Jersey, and is another potential takeover target, shed 08 percent to $22038.
 The maker of knee and hip replacements has been a takeover candidate for a decade.
 Before the deal was signed, Ergen asked for a non-standard provision to be added in the transaction, causing the takeover to break down to the chagrin of the bankers working on it, the people said.
 The gambit on spectrum may limit Dish’s appeal as a takeover target, pushing banks further away from him and casting doubt on the company’s true value, Moffett said.
 takeover rules.
 A deal is unlikely “without a sizable premium to Rio Tinto’s current share price and would need the approval of some key investors” In 2008, Rio rejected a 44 percent premium offered for a takeover by BHP Billiton Ltd.
 takeover rules it will now be barred from a renewed attempt for six months unless it obtains Rio’s board recommendation, a third party makes an offer for Rio or there are other material changes.
 Chief Executive Officer Mark Cutifani is open to takeover offers, the Wall Street Journal reported last month, citing an interview.
 “Rio shareholders are not going to stomach a nil-premium merger, or even a reverse takeover with a significant premium.
 “I don’t know whether the Chinese would be that enthralled by it all” Another possible outcome is that Rio seeks out a takeover of its own to act as a sort of poison pill against the Glencore offer, said Gait of Bernstein.
 ‘Growth Opportunities’ Toronto-Dominion expanded under Clark with takeovers, starting with its 2005 purchase of 51 percent of Portland, Maine-based Banknorth Group Inc.
 takeovers.
 His efforts there caught the attention of Clark, who joined the bank with its 2000 takeover of Canada Trust parent CT Financial Services Inc.
 The takeover bid for Flex LNG, which is expecting delivery of its two first liquefied natural gas carriers at the start of 2017, comes after the Norwegian-born billionaire last month sold more than 80 percent of his shares in shipper Golar LNG Ltd.
 The takeover frenzy could continue into 2015 as this year’s breakup byproducts become more digestible targets.
 That’s likely to shift agreater share of the market to firms such as Blackstone Group LPand Apollo Global Management LLC as smaller investors are pushedout of the market, which is the greatest source of demand forloans that help finance takeovers and provide funds to theleast-creditworthy borrowers.
 takeover code, the Baar, Switzerland-based company said in a statement yesterday.
 said it’s prepared to raise its hostile takeover bid for Allergan Inc.
 -Transfield Services Ltd, the target of an A$1 billion ($883 million) takeover attempt by Ferrovial SA, holds its annual general meeting.
 look like ideal takeover targets now that Annie’s Inc.
 Geithner also backtracked slightly from a comment he made that the government takeover of AIG gave it the power to “carve up, dismember, sell or restructure” the insurer.
 In the long term, a takeover ofPacific would boost Alfa as well, transforming the Mexican makerof chemicals and car parts into a top energy producer, MonexCasa de Bolsa and Interacciones Casa de Bolsa say.
 Pacific’s support of any acquisition would be crucial, Alfasaid yesterday, ruling out a hostile takeover.
 Chief ExecutiveOfficer Ronald Pantin said in an interview last month thatPacific has takeover defenses in place to assure shareholdersreceive an attractive premium.
 Neuhauser, the fund manager, said an Alfa takeover ofPacific would be a good fit.
 said this week that it’s on the verge of canceling its $51 billion takeover of Shire Plc, which would be the largest inversion on record.
 Some Republicans have warned that rules targeting inversions without addressing the fundamental tax advantage held by foreign-owned firms will only encourage more takeovers of US.
 Foreign Address Most deals in the current crop of transactions involve obtaining a foreign address through a takeover of a smaller company in another country.
 “We would have preferred if it had been us, rather than a common thief, who had decided the timing of this otherwise very positive announcement” Denmark’s banking industry is just starting to recover from housing and banking crises that have wiped out more than 60 lenders through takeovers or failures.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Rio Tinto Group may decide that its best defense against another takeover approach from Glencore Plc is buying the largest mining company in the US.
 takeover rules.
 Even so, a takeover-as-defense strategy wouldn’t be without precedent in this year’s manic deal market.
 when he got the news that AbbVie was reconsidering the $52 billion takeover.
 “They were incredibly impressed as they looked at us during the integration” Ornskov said that while he would prefer Dublin-based Shire to remain independent, further takeover approaches are possible.
 “I’m really pleased with that” What Ornskov also said he feels good about now is the fact that he remained focused on the business throughout the AbbVie takeover process.
 -Transfield Services Ltd, the target of an A$1 billion ($883 million) takeover attempt by Ferrovial SA, holds its annual general meeting.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Allergan Inc, the Botox maker trying to fend off an unsolicited, $54-billion takeover bid by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, asked a judge to block Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square from voting its 10 percent stake at the shareholder meeting scheduled for December.
 18 meeting to replace six board members, clearing the way for the Irvine, California-based company to accept Valeant’s takeover bid.
 Actavis also approached Allergan, which is trying to fend off a hostile takeover from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, about a takeover.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- AbbVie Inc’s board recommended that shareholders vote against a 325 billion-pound ($52 billion) takeover of Shire Plc, saying tax-rule changes would undermine the deal’s rationale.
 I haven’t done the exact work, but I imagine you could save 60 to 80 percent of that through consolidation” No Approaches Harmony hasn’t had any takeover approaches, Briggs said.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Family Dollar Stores Inc, the discount retailer at the center of a three-way takeover battle, reported earnings that missed analysts’ estimates after price cuts narrowed profit margins.
 The merger funds, which bet on companies involved in takeovers, posted smaller losses, with the Paulson Partners fund down 02 percent last month, as telecommunications and energy positions detracted from gains in health care, to pare gains to 49 percent this year.
 By contrast, Bock’s biggest deal in chemicals was the $1 billion takeover of seed-treatment supplier Becker Underwood Inc.
 Meanwhile, GE’s takeover of Alstom SA’s energy assets creates a stronger No.
 is running out of ways to avert a takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 “That’s why it tips in Valeant’s favor” There aren’t many other takeover candidates that would move the needle for Allergan, she said.
 may have to remove the $65 billion company from its list of back-up plans after AstraZeneca Plc rejected the drug giant’s takeover offer earlier this year.
 Amgen Inc, a $106 billion biotechnology company that makes treatments for cancer and kidney disease, could even get swept up in the takeover frenzy.
 A rebound in consumer demand coupled with a surge in transporting crude oil by rail is driving earnings for CSX, making it an attractive takeover target, said Gary Bradshaw, a fund manager with Hodges Capital Management Inc.
 AT&T had the right to walk away from its pending $485 billion takeover of DirecTV if the contract wasn’t renewed for the Sunday Ticket package on terms the companies had discussed.
 At least three firms that speculated on the doomed $52 billion drug industry takeover -- Paulson & Co, Taconic Capital Advisors LP and Pentwater Capital Management LP -- have reported stakes tied to Medtronic Inc’s offer for Covidien Plc, according to filings with the Irish Takeover Panel.
 While 2014 has seen more takeovers than any year since 2007, the value of terminated deals such as AbbVie-Shire has surged to a six-year high.
 Event-driven funds are those that speculate on situations such as takeovers, spinoffs or bankruptcies.
 if the business-communications firm continues to reject an unsolicited $540 million takeover.
 Castel is often mentioned as a potential takeover target for the world’s second-largest brewer, which already owns 20 percent of the French winemaker.
 Telefonica in August agreed to buy Brazilian broadband provider GVT for about $9 billion, and last month completed the takeover of German wireless carrier E-Plus.
 drugmaker that fought off a takeover attempt by Pfizer Inc, raised its forecasts for the second time this year after competition for one of its top-selling medicines failed to materialize.
 Pershing Square also holds a stake in Allergan Inc, and Ackman has been pushing that company to agree to a hostile takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 Zoetis has poison pill options to fend off a takeover, Raffat said in a note to clients.
 Publicis, the owner of the Saatchi & Saatchi agency, announced this week a $37 billion takeover of Sapient Corp.
 Buybacks, Dividends As Publicis pursues takeovers, Omnicom has resumed using much of its cash on share repurchases and dividends.
 The company’s $15 billion of notes due 2022 tumbled by the most in five weeks yesterday after interim Chief Executive Office Bayard Gontijo said Oi is evaluating whether to make a takeover bid for Tim Participacoes SA and that it’s also open to a possible merger.
 Repsol SA scrapped a takeover bid for Talisman because it couldn’t find buyers for properties it didn’t want including in the North Sea, people with knowledge of the talks said in August.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Nutreco NV, the Dutch maker of fish feed and animal-nutrition products, attracted a sweetened 299 billion euros ($37 billion) takeover bid from SHV Holdings NV as the local investment company fends off rival interest from Cargill Inc.
 The maker of Trouw livestock-nutrition products is attracting takeover interest after the failed disposal in June of its compound-feed and meat business in Spain and Portugal.
 Any suitor will have to overcome local shareholder resistance to a takeover.
 APG Groep NV, among the vocal investors to reject any takeover, said the improved bid from SHV shows more investors are realizing the value of Nutreco.
 for $346 billion in the biggest takeover of a US.
 Worldline, which generates revenue from managing transactions for customers including banks, retailers and public transport operators, is seeking takeovers to become Europe’s largest electronic payments company.
 The crux of the matter is the activist investor’s approachto the hostile takeover of Allergan: Ackman’s Pershing SquareCapital Management LP quietly amassed a stake in the drug makerfor months after he agreed to back Valeant PharmaceuticalsInternational Inc.
 Securities and Exchange Commission of Pershing Square’s takeover tactics and that it did nothing wrong.
 Securities and Exchange Commission of Pershing Square’s takeover tactics and that it did nothing wrong.
 They could both have liability” Regulators probably won’t get in the way of Valeant’stakeover pursuit of Allergan, he said.
 “It will make hedge funds much more leery about enteringinto a relationship with a strategic bidder in which they gettipped on a takeover” To contact the reporter on this story:David Welch in New York at dwelch12@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Mohammed Hadi at mhadi1@bloombergnetElizabeth Wollman Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 Its shares have been volatile in recent months due to speculation it’s a takeover target and past concerns about debt.
 We don’t need an acquisition” The insurer can’t afford the risks of a takeover, which include the danger of overpaying and the challenge of integrating resources including IT systems, because its solvency ratio has dropped, according to JanWillem Knoll, an Amsterdam-based analyst at ABN Amro Group NV.
 Yesterday’s two takeovers added to what has already been the busiest year for dealmaking since the record in 2007.
 The two often work together on hostile takeovers.
 So far this year, Jefferies’s revenue from investment banking -- which includes fees for takeover advice and arranging debt offerings -- climbed to $121 billion, almost on par with the $124 billion generated from trading.
 The deal puts an end to Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s months-long hostile takeover fight for Allergan.
 They included the $985 billion takeover of Cole Real Estate Investments Inc.
 and Pentwater Capital Management were told this month by a prominent London mining banker to prepare for an all-but-inevitable takeover of Rio Tinto Group by Glencore Plc, according to people familiar with the meeting.
 It also highlighted his work alongside Xstrata Plc, which he advised on its 2012 takeover by Glencore and earlier transactions.
 takeover rules from a bid until April, made the statement after Bloomberg News reported it was laying the groundwork for a potential merger in the next year.
 Lazard is the seventh-ranked in global takeovers this year,according to Bloomberg data, advising on $458 billion intransactions so far.
 Halliburton’s $14 billion in deals has lagged Schlumberger’s $27 billion in takeovers, the data show.
 The takeover could be the largest of a US.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- BRF SA, the Brazilian food maker, ruled out a potential takeover of Kuwait Food Co.
 Suitors have put forward a number of possible deal structures including a full takeover, an equity injection and a debt restructuring, and it’s unclear whether any transaction will be completed, the person said.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Big bank takeovers are making a comeback after years of stalled deals and stricter regulations brought on by the financial crisis.
 is one possible takeover target, he said.
 The event-driven Advantage funds, which can bet on companies involved in situations such as takeovers, spinoffs or bankruptcies, make up about 16 percent of Paulson & Co’s capital.
 He’s also committed to help finance Burger King Worldwide Inc’s proposed takeover of doughnut chain Tim Hortons Inc.
 for 150 billion rupees ($24 billion) in the largest takeover of a lender in India.
 “He’s not a gregarious, slap-on-the-back kind of executive” ‘Serious Professional’ In his operations role, Tague efficiently carried out the comeback charted by then-CEO Glenn Tilton, which culminated in the 2010 takeover of Continental Airlines, without seeking credit for himself, said O’Connor, a retired Chicago executive.
 Valeant -- which failed in the attempted takeover -- was Venus, and Allergan was Apollo, said a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be named.
 in the country’s biggest takeover for more than a decade.
 The takeover, potentially the biggest in the UK.
 Friends Life shareholders may also demand a higher takeover price, he said.
 The takeover would be the biggest among British insurers since CGU Plc’s 74 billion-pound merger in 2000 with Norwich Union Plc, which created Aviva, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The British takeover rules give Aviva a deadline of Dec.
 takeover rules to not pursue a takeover of Smith & Nephew for six months, after the Financial Times reported it was working on a bid.
 (SHOR) after the business communications firmrejected its initial takeover bid late last month.
 The cloud-computing provider, which rejected takeover offers in September, also said it may buy as much as $500 million of its own shares in the next two years.
 Richard Solomons, the hotel company’s chief executive officer, said in a June interview that InterContinental can grow without a merger or takeover and it has served investors well.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar Investment Authority and Brookfield Property Partners LP have made a preliminary joint takeover approach for Songbird Estates Plc, the London-based property developer said in a statement today.
 Dutch gross domestic product increased 11 percent in the third quarter compared to a year earlier, the nation’s statistics bureau said today, adding that the recovery remains “fragile” ABN Amro, the third-biggest lender in the Netherlands, was formed after the state took over the Dutch banking and insurance units of Fortis, which had joined a 719 billion-euro takeover of the former ABN Amro Holding NV with Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc and Banco Santander SA in 2007.
 The chairman declined to say whether the Bern-based company has identified solid takeover targets.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Nevsun Resources Ltd, a takeover target which mines gold and copper in Eritrea, is being sued for alleged complicity in human-rights abuses at its operations in the African nation.
 is amending the terms of a takeover bid for rival brokerage GFI Group Inc.
 Glassman said he’s looking at the auction as pure “game theory” Acquiring spectrum would make Mobilicity more attractive as a takeover target or potential partner for Wind or Quebecor.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- After losing out on what would have been its biggest deal ever, pumpmaker Sulzer AG still needs a transformational takeover to help reverse years of declining revenue.
 Dril-Quip Inc, which analysts last year highlighted as a top energy-equipment takeover candidate, is forecast to boost revenue about 30 percent through 2016.
 closed a takeover of Gardner Denver Inc, which makes equipment for industries including manufacturing and energy exploration.
 Among the remaining options in the industry, Chart is a logical target, said Eric Mintz, a fund manager at Eagle Asset Management, who correctly forecast the eventual takeovers of both Lufkin and Dresser-Rand.
 Those measures, which included making it harder for companies to access such foreign cash balances to finance acquisitions, were unveiled in late September and helped torpedo AbbVie Inc’s proposed $55-billion takeover of Dublin-based drugmaker Shire Plc.
 to accept a hostile takeover bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, wants his target to run an auction now that it’s in talks with a third party.
 “But if not, it’s better no deal than a bad deal” Brito’s remarks follow renewed takeover speculation in the beer industry over the past few months.
 Deals Activity The energy sector trimmed losses after the Wall Street Journal reported the talks between Halliburton and Baker Hughes, in what would be one of the largest takeovers of a US.
 adopted a poison-pill shareholder plan to help block a hostile takeover after activist investor Bill Ackman took an 85 percent stake in the animal-health company.
 Pershing Square also holds a stake in Allergan Inc, and Ackman has been pushing that company to agree to a hostile takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 Headwinds faced by Bank Asya included a botched bid by Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ, a lender that was in exclusive talks for a takeover from March through August this year.
 moved closer to a takeover -- hostile or friendly -- after a judge rebuffed the Botox maker’s bid to prevent Bill Ackman, its largest shareholder, from trying to oust directors opposed to an acquisition by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 The shares have gained 37 percent since Valeant made its first takeover bid on April 22.
 After Allergan refused to negotiate with Valeant, Ackman used his stake to push for a special meeting where shareholders could remove the majority of Allergan’s board as well as the poison-pill defense against hostile takeovers that it adopted after Valeant’s initial merger overtures in April.
 Securities and Exchange Commission of Pershing Square’s takeover tactics and that it did nothing wrong.
 27 that it’s prepared to raise its hostile takeover bid for Allergan to at least $200 a share to win support from the target’s board.
 The unions backed US Airways’ successful takeover of American after that carrier filed for bankruptcy in November 2011.
 The deal, the largest takeover of a lender in India, was announced yesterday after the close of trading.
 The biggest bank takeover in India prior to this was HDFC Bank Ltd’s purchase of Centurion Bank of Punjab Ltd.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Darden Restaurants Inc, which had its entire board replaced last month after a battle with activist investor Starboard Value LP, said it would cancel a measure meant to protect against takeovers earlier than planned.
 in the biggest takeover of a US.
 Lazard advised on three of the last four inversions announced in the US, including Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned adoption of a Canadian tax address through a takeover of Tim Hortons Inc.
 Harvard MBA Weiss, who holds a master’s of business administration degree from Harvard University and is publisher of the Paris Review literary magazine, worked on many of the largest and high-profile M&A situations in the last six years -- often involving multibillion-dollar takeovers of iconic American consumer companies.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Pacific Rubiales Energy Corp, Latin America’s largest independent oil and gas producer, will consider takeover bids that provide value to shareholders, Chief Executive Officer Ronald Pantin said.
 The $59 billion target’s profit multiple is already 60 percent higher than the median of past pharmaceutical takeovers that large, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 About two-thirds of company takeovers that exceeded $20 billion between 1996 and 2013 destroyed value, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Attempted or completed takeovers larger than $20 billion in this industry have a median multiple of just 156, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The $25 billion takeover transformed generic-drug maker Actavis into a developer of brand-name medicines.
 review of Comcast Corp’s takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc, warning that such a move will put them at a competitive disadvantage.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Of all the megamergers announced this year, Halliburton Co’s $35 billion takeover of Baker Hughes Inc.
 Shares of the Snaith, England-based company, seen as a potential takeover target, touched a two-year low on Oct.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Cell C Pty Ltd, South Africa’s third-largest wireless operator, said takeovers and other deals involving larger competitors are putting its survival at risk.
 Amendments to the fund’s mandate will render it more similar to Paulson’s event-driven Advantage funds, which wager on the outcomes of takeovers, spinoffs and corporate bankruptcies.
 takeover rules.
 The technology giant isn’t looking to do a large, transformative takeover, Schroeter said today.
 29 it dropped out of talks on a possible takeover of Stats ChipPac.
 In August, Burger King Worldwide Inc’s proposed takeover of Oakville, Ontario-based doughnut chain Tim Hortons Inc, which Buffett agreed to help finance, drew criticism.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Boskalis Westminster NV’s purchase of a 148 percent stake in deepwater-oilfield surveyor Fugro NV may be the first step in a full takeover as the maritime-salvage operator adds offshore-energy assets, analysts said.
 in 2013 and the 11 billion-euro takeover of Smit Internationale NV in 2010.
 A Jefferies Group LLC analyst said the company is viewed as the most likely takeover target for Pfizer Inc.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG is seeking more takeovers to boost its smart-grid energy division, which uses software to help utilities react to electricity demand, as software becomes a key growth pillar at Europe’s biggest engineering company.
 Stryker is considering structuring the takeover as a tax inversion, allowing the Kalamazoo, Michigan-based company to move its legal address to the UK, where Smith & Nephew is based.
 takeover rules, to make the case to antitrust regulators for further consolidation, according to Wells Fargo & Co.
 A Financial Times report May 28 said Stryker was preparing a takeover offer for the maker of artificial hips and knees, sending Smith & Nephew’s stock to a then-record price of 99350 pence.
 Their competitor Zimmer is awaiting clearance from both American and European authorities for the takeover of Biomet announced in April.
 Blackstone acquired the skyscraper in its $39 billion takeover of Sam Zell’s Equity Office Properties Trust in 2007.
 Hank, who served as CEO of Mexico City-based Interaccionesbefore stepping down last month to take over his mother’s seaton the Banorte board, has said there are no plans to push for atakeover.
 The banks committed to fund $826 billion in debt connectedto Scientific Games as part of a deal to bankroll the takeover,according to a copy of their commitment letter filed with theUS.
 Cost Savings In documents marketing its new debt for the takeover,Scientific Games told investors the company would generate $134billion in earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation andamortization, according to a presentation filed with regulatorsSept.
 He estimated a takeover price of $52 a share for Tyco, about a 20 percent premium.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- In the year’s most contentious takeover battle, both sides may come out winners.
 “We’re a public company, we’re for sale every day,” Zoetis Chief Financial Officer Paul Herendeen said during last week’s earnings call in response to a question about its takeover defenses.
 The carrier would focus on smaller takeovers in services and regions where it’s present, rather than expanding to new areas, Hans-Holger Albrecht said yesterday in an interview at a conference organized by Morgan Stanley in Barcelona.
 Boeing supported Delta’s bankruptcy restructuring plan in 2007 in the face of a hostile takeover bid by US Airways.
 Liberty Global paid 481 million pounds ($768 million) for the shares and said it didn’t have immediate plans to make a full takeover bid.
 Zoetis earlier this month adopted a poison-pill shareholder plan to help block a hostile takeover after activist investor Bill Ackman took an 85 percent stake.
 for about 56 billion pounds ($88 billion) in the biggest takeover in the UK.
 There’s a bunch of expenses that can be taken out and there are substantial revenue synergies” The takeover would be the biggest among British insurers since CGU Plc’s 74 billion-pound merger in 2000 with Norwich Union Plc, which created Aviva, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The British takeover rules give Aviva a deadline of Dec.
 and invest in the market for craft-your-own pizza with a takeover of a custom piemaker such as Pizza Studio or Project Pie, said Telsey Advisory Group.
 A representative for DineEquity declined to comment on the company’s takeover strategy.
 Any takeover would likely have to be small -- probably no more than a few hundred million, if that -- because of DineEquity’s remaining debt burden.
 DineEquity could make its own move with a takeover of a chain such as closely held Project Pie or Pizza Studio, Saleh said.
 DineEquity could also eye a takeover of an up-and-coming breakfast chain such as closely held First Watch Restaurants Inc, said John Gordon, principal at San Diego-based Pacific Management Consulting Group, an adviser to restaurants and franchisees.
 Planting revived in World War II, peaking in 1943 after the Japanese takeover of the Philippines deprived the US.
 With the Republican takeover of the US.
 moved closer to a takeover -- hostile or friendly -- after a judge rebuffed the Botox maker’s bid to prevent Bill Ackman, its largest shareholder, from trying to oust directors opposed to an acquisition by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 The shares have gained 36 percent since Valeant made its first takeover bid on April 22.
 After Allergan refused to negotiate with Valeant, Ackman used his stake to push for a special meeting where shareholders could remove the majority of Allergan’s board as well as the poison-pill defense against hostile takeovers that it adopted after Valeant’s initial merger overtures in April.
 Securities and Exchange Commission of Pershing Square’s takeover tactics and that it did nothing wrong.
 27 that it’s prepared to raise its hostile takeover bid for Allergan to at least $200 a share to win support from the target’s board.
 moved closer to a hostile takeover of Allergan Inc.
 (BHI)after takeover talks disintegrated into an argument over price.
 The company confirmed the takeover talks Nov.
 Department ofJustice proved another obstacle in the takeover, said peoplewith knowledge of the matter who asked not to be identifieddiscussing private information.
 Baker Hughes rose more than 17 percent after the takeovertalks were made public.
 A $2 billion takeover and an additional $12 billion investment later, SoftLayer was the center of IBM’s push into the cloud.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Songbird Estates Plc said its assets are worth about 23 percent more than a proposed takeover offer by Qatar Investment Authority and Brookfield Property Partners LP after the company re-evaluated its holdings following the approach.
 14, it adopted a poison-pill shareholder plan to block a potential takeover.
 A representative for BC Iron had no comment on the company’s break-even price for iron ore or the prospects of a takeover.
 Scotiabank had the biggest jump in revenue from advising on takeovers and arranging financings among the six biggest Canadian banks, based on disclosures and analysts’ estimates for the fiscal year.
 2 among domestic firms for advising on Canadian takeovers, according to data compiled by Bloomberg based on the year ended Oct.
 1 ranking for advising on takeovers and handling corporate bond sales, while Toronto-Dominion Bank took top spot for managing debt sales of governments.
 Companies raised $383 billion through Canada stock sales in the fiscal year, up 10 percent from a year earlier, while announced takeovers involving Canadian firms rose 21 percent to $2004 billion.
 The firm advised on $342 billion of global takeovers completed in the year ended Oct.
 Both office and shop floor posts will be eliminated, Rolls said, diminishing a workforce swollen by the full takeover of German industrial-engine producer Tognum AG and the addition of 2,000 jobs in the UK.
 RealPage could get as much as $30 a share in a takeover, Houston of Barrington estimated.
 Zillow, the owner of apartment-rental search site HotPadscom, or closely held Yardi Systems Inc, a competitor of RealPage, may also be interested in a takeover, said Houston of Barrington.
 The deal comes after Growthpoint failed to acquire Fountainhead Property Trust after losing a takeover battle with Johannesburg-based competitor Redefine Properties Ltd.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- British farmers’ pension and insurance funds joined a group lawsuit against Lloyds Banking Group Plc by investors who say they lost money because of the lender’s 2008 takeover of HBOS Plc.
 Lloyds said in an e-mailed statement that “the group’s position” in the cases over the HBOS takeover “remains that we do not consider there to be any legal basis to these claims and we will robustly contest this legal action” The investors argue that Lloyds and its executives should have told them that HBOS was on the verge of failure and that its shares were worthless, according their documents from the case.
 Royal DSM NV, Clariant AG and Croda International Plc have made the German chemical maker’s short list as it seeks a large European takeover target, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Even before accounting for a takeover premium, those three targets are already expensive by some measures.
 That makes more strategic sense than a transformational takeover of a conglomerate such as DSM, he said.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Allergan Inc, the Botox maker seeking to fend off a hostile takeover by Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, is in active talks with Actavis Inc.
 The Dublin-based company first approached Allergan about a takeover in August, a person familiar with the matter has said.
 It’s unlikely Actavis would ever take a hostile approach to a takeover target, CEO Saunders said yesterday on a conference call.
 Hispania has reached an agreement with creditors to buy 50 percent of the loan for 313 million euros as long as the takeover bid is successful.
 AstraZeneca, which rejected a $117 billion takeover bid from Pfizer in May, is relying on revenue from Nexium and another best-selling drug, Crestor, as it waits for new blockbuster drugs to emerge from its pipeline.
 AstraZeneca closed at 4620 pounds yesterday, roughly the price Pfizer offered Soriot and the AstraZeneca board when they first met in January to discuss a takeover, he said on a conference call with reporters today.
 takeover rules, New York-based Pfizer can make another approach after Nov.
 Soriot said today that AbbVie’s takeover offer ultimately proved to be a costly distraction for Dublin-based Shire.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Godiva chocolatier’s owner Yildiz Holding AS boosted the amount of cash it borrowed for the 21 billion pound ($33 billion) takeover of United Biscuits Holdings Ltd.
 fail to follow through on indicative takeover offers that valued the business at A$34 billion.
 Tim, which is controlled by Telecom Italia SpA, is a takeover target for Oi, which hired Banco BTG Pactual SA in August to study a potential bid for the Italian owner’s 67 percent holding.
 phone company is also awaiting regulatory approval to complete its takeover of DirecTV, the US.
 is allowed to make another takeover attempt.
 takeover panel rules, which allow a new offer after Nov.
 “He also has the experience and antenna to ensure financial reforms are designed and implemented in ways to help families and small businesses” Lazard advised on three of the four inversions most recently announced in the US, including Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned adoption of a Canadian tax address through a takeover of Tim Hortons Inc.
 Weiss, who holds a master’s of business administration degree from Harvard University and is publisher of the Paris Review literary magazine, worked on many of the largest and highest-profile M&A situations in the last six years -- often involving multibillion-dollar takeovers of iconic American consumer companies.
 Medium-Term Forecasts Alstom predicts that sales, excluding currency effects takeovers or disposals, will expand at more than 5 percent a year in the medium term, outpacing the industry’s growth rate of 28 percent, while the operating margin will rise to within a range of 5 percent to 7 percent.
 “Given that they’ve got a significant amount of their market value in cash on the balance sheet without any debt, to a degree the company is almost a partially self-funded takeover target while the rest of the assets are very attractive” A representative of QKR declined to comment.
 Brookfield and Qatar last week approached Songbird Estates Plc, the owner of London’s Canary Wharf financial district, about a possible takeover.
 is considering closing an iron ore mine in Canada after deciding an expansion plan isn’t viable, three years after acquiring the project in a $43 billion takeover.
 Old Plantation Bank of America, based in Charlotte, North Carolina, has booked more than $70 billion in expenses tied to home loans, mostly stemming from Lewis’s takeovers of Countrywide Financial Corp.
 At first blush, the $56 billion takeover makes little sense.
 Over time, people will see the value we create” Part of the drop may be explained by takeover speculation surrounding LabCorp itself.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- One of the best opportunities to make money on an Australian takeover this year may be found in a document-storage company with headquarters half a world away.
 Iron Mountain’s potential savings from a Recall takeover are large enough to justify a bid as high as A$28 billion ($24 billion), 49 percent more than yesterday’s market value, said Macquarie Group Ltd.
 29, would be the highest premium among announced takeovers in Australia this year greater than $100 million, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Shareholders approved of the takeover after Forest Oil adopted a plan in July that would prevent investors with short positions from trying to “negatively influence” the prospective merger, according to a July 10 statement.
 As soon as a deal is announced, the convertible team will know whether there’s a convertible bond outstanding and how the security is treated in the event of a takeover, she says.
 Auction Call Actavis, which makes generic drugs and products like Alzheimer’s treatment Namenda, first approached Allergan about a takeover in August, a person familiar with the matter has said, and talks between the two companies recently restarted.
 While Ackman didn’t name Norfolk Southern in remarks yesterday at the Invest for Kids conference in Chicago, he described the possible takeover target in relation to CSX.
 SABMiller has long been regarded by analysts as a possible takeover target for AB InBev, which is PepsiCo Inc’s bottling partner in Latin America.
 ‘More Difficult’ “This will make any potential ABI takeover more difficult,” Fyfe said by phone.
 The transaction puts Macerich, with its high concentration of West Coast properties, “in play” as a potential takeover candidate, JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 review of Comcast Corp’s takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 expects to sell just half the $75 billion in assets it’s committed to divest to win antitrust approval for a planned takeover of Baker Hughes Inc, according to people familiar with the deal.
 The Justice Department in 2010 required divestitures in Baker Hughes’ takeover of BJ Services Co, which the government said threatened competition in the market for specialized pumping, or stimulation services necessary for the production of oil and gas in the Gulf of Mexico.
 That would be the biggest loan taken out by a Turkish company to finance the takeover of an asset abroad, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 That sets a base multiple for Energizer’s battery unit, which itself could be a takeover target after the company completes a breakup announced in April, said SunTrust Banks Inc.
 Breakup byproducts are more digestible and more likely to become takeover targets.
 Buffett on Batteries Buffett’s takeover of Duracell could be just the start of his battery business dreams.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- RealD Inc, the company that provides 3-D technology to movie theaters, rejected an unsolicited $12-a-share takeover bid from Starboard Value LP.
 Crude prices have also plunged in the past month, which is encouraging takeovers in the industry as valuations turn cheap.
 He said he still expects the takeover to be completed.
 Christian Zahn, Molecular Partner’s chief executive officer, declined to disclose Allergan’s stake in an interview two days ago and said the company is “not seeking a takeover” Another possible Swiss IPO candidate may be biotechnology company NovImmune SA, newspaper Finanz und Wirtschaft reported.
 Orbital’s update provides assurance that it may complete a planned takeover of the aerospace and defense unit of Alliant Techsystems Inc, Steven Cahall, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets, wrote in a note after the call.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA, the Brazilian phone company that’s evaluating whether to make a takeover bid for rival Tim Participacoes SA, said it’s open to other alternatives to consolidate the market, including a possible merger.
 government’s review of Comcast Corp’s takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The company has also adopted a shareholder plan to block a takeover of the company.
 DCC spent 148 million pounds ($240 million) on takeovers in the fiscal first half through September, including the purchase of Swedish technology company CapTech near the end of the period, the Dublin-based company said in a statement today.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- The five Wall Street banks that advised on $100 billion of takeovers announced yesterday by Halliburton Co.
 3 Baker Hughes, taking advantage of plunging crude prices to set up the biggest takeover of a US.
 The company was the target of a takeover approach, later abandoned, by Monsanto earlier this year, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Halliburton would pay for the rest of the takeover in cash and has held discussions with potential lenders about borrowing those funds, the people said.
 Those measures, which included making it harder for companies to access such foreign cash balances to finance acquisitions, helped torpedo AbbVie Inc’s proposed $55-billion takeover of Dublin-based drugmaker Shire Plc.
 Then, there were those who downplayed those concerns saying those raising them were envious” American Realty Capital Properties’s acquisitions include the $985 billion takeover of rival Cole Real Estate Investments Inc, which Schorsch likened to a merger of baseball rivals the Boston Red Sox and New York Yankees.
 Hasbro investors don’t seem to be a fan of the potential takeover though, sending the stock down by as much as 58 percent.
 Vitol Chief Executive Officer Ian Taylor, who has been a director of Fortune Oil since 1993, was excluded from a takeover panel considering the bid.
 With the maker of Activia yogurts also said to be considering a sale of its 20 percent stake in Japan’s Yakult Honsha Co, speculation is mounting that the French company is looking to raise funds for a potential takeover of a bigger business such as US.
 More takeovers later in the year highlighted the firm’s experience in carving out divisions of corporations, which founders Bill Conway, Dan D’Aniello and David Rubenstein have done since Carlyle’s founding in 1987.
 and the state-run lenders will resist any attempts at a takeover, Venkatachalam said.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Club Mediterranee SA Chief Executive Officer Henri Giscard d’Estaing said he favors a takeover bid from Fosun International Ltd.
 Jefferies Group LLC’s Thomas Wei said he would have valued Avanir at $26 to $31 a share in a takeover.
 and Europe two days ago for backing Ukraine, and likened Crimea, which his government annexed in March, to Russia’s “Jerusalem” He blamed the conflict on “the coup and violent takeover of power” in Kiev, a reference to protests that prompted the flight of former Ukrainian President Viktor Yanukovych to Russia in February and subsequent elections and the establishment of a new government.
 jumped 12 percent after saying it received a takeover approach from XL Group Plc.
 franchise has benefited from the C$41 billion takeover of Milwaukee-based lender Marshall & Ilsley Corp.
 That ranks among the 10 most expensive drug-company takeovers this decade, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Desolate Landscape The high-school graduation rate, 49 percent when Christie announced the takeover, was 62 percent in June.
 Leaving Pimco Scheid, who retired in April 2012 after eight years, clashed with fund managers over the company’s leadership, and passed on takeover attempts by larger rivals.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- M&T Bank Corp’s planned takeover of Hudson City Bancorp Inc, announced in 2012, has been extended again amid a Federal Reserve review of money-laundering controls at the would-be buyer.
 The deal, struck before the credit crisis unfolded, was part of a buyout boom fueled by cheap debt that spawned super-sized takeovers.
 A campaigning Hillary Clinton told the South Dakota daily Rapid City Journal that she opposed the Smithfield takeover and would “fight consolidation” The Batista family that controls JBS wasn’t discouraged.
 Overseas Address Language proposed by Durbin would have broadened the definition of companies affected by the ban, encompassing those that took an address overseas through a takeover of a smaller foreign company.
 It acquired a Bermuda address through a takeover in 1997, and later shifted its registration to Switzerland and then Ireland.
 “The board has concluded that the proposal falls significantly short of its own view of the value of the portfolio,” Balfour, which rejected a takeover bid from rival Carillion Plc in August, said today.
 shareholders, who met today to weigh a takeover by Dollar Tree Inc, delayed the decision until next month, giving them more time to consider a competing bid.
 takeover rules from making a new bid for Rio until April, announced a $1 billion share buyback in August.
 “The Deutsche Annington takeover bid is a trigger for more consolidation,” he said.
 Balfour, which rejected a takeover bid from Carillion Plc in August, has struggled since the global recession, suffering from mismanaged projects and a lack of demand.
(Bloomberg) -- Songbird Estates Plc investors holding about 32 percent of the company’s publicly traded shares support a takeover bid for the owner of London’s Canary Wharf financial district.
 Victor Dodig, CIBC’s chief executive officer, said this month that the the Toronto-based bank would consider wealth-management takeovers of asset managers worth up C$2 billion ($175 billion), as it seeks to complement its American Century and Atlantic Trust businesses in the US.
 The private equity firm’s decision ends a two-month takeover battle in which the offer price has increased about 22 percent from Abraaj’s initial bid of 7391 a share in November.
 investor contends in a lawsuit that the drug-testing company’s board erred in relying on what the shareholder called Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s conflict-tainted advice in accepting a $61 billion takeover offer from Laboratory Corp.
 That same year, former Delaware Chancery Court Judge Leo Strine took Goldman Sachs officials to task for their work on behalf of El Paso in the $211 billion takeover by Kinder Morgan.
 Including net debt, a takeover of Talisman at its current market price would be valued at C$116 billion.
 Vodafone completed the takeover of Spanish cable provider Grupo Corporativo ONO in July.
 A successful takeover would give Iron Mountain, now the largest document-storage company, more than 70 percent of the outsourced market in the US.
 Repsol has been seeking to spend about $10 billion on takeovers since receiving compensation in May from Argentina for the 2012 nationalization of YPF SA.
 The total deal value is about $13 billion, including Talisman debt, making it the biggest foreign takeover by a Spanish company since 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Pension Board Repsol will soon seek approval from the Canadian government for the Talisman takeover, which will result in a company operating in more than 50 countries with output the equivalent of more than 680,000 barrels of oil a day and refining capacity of more than 1 million barrels a day, Kvisle said.
 The takeover is subject to the offer’s successful implementation and Chilean regulatory approval.
 “There will be a few of thosecompanies that will disappear and have to be consolidated” Oil at a five-year low is making cash more scarce forproducers that may have no choice but to sell assets or seekoutright takeovers.
 Delia’s, which has been plagued by slow website orders, said in September that it was exploring a sale or merger, or debt or equity financing after receiving inquiries about a takeover.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Songbird Estates Plc said a takeover offer by the Qatar Investment Authority and Brookfield Property Partners LP doesn’t reflect the full value of the Canary Wharf financial district owner.
 The Norwegian Competition Authority issued a statement of objections, saying that the takeover involves two of the three largest players in a mobile market that’s already highly concentrated.
 Delia’s has been running low on cash and said in September that it had received several inquiries about a takeover, merger, or debt or equity financing.
 may finally be the right size for a takeover.
 Danaher Corp, the $59 billion conglomerate with billions to spend on acquisitions, could fill gaps in its portfolio with an Agilent takeover, said FBR & Co.
 ‘Deal Machine’ Danaher, the maker of everything from dental equipment to water filters, has spent about $3 billion on takeovers since May, including the $2 billion purchase of Nobel Biocare Holding AG.
 3 free-to-air commercial broadcaster, said it’s studying takeover or refinancing proposals received from a number of parties.
 Likely Targets Private-equity firms may instead home in on smaller takeover candidates, particularly in industries such as retail, where there are a number of corporations with cheap valuations and ample cash flow.
 Oil producers are ripe for takeover after a 48 percent plunge in crude prices in the past six months stressed the balance sheets of explorers that borrowed at steep rates to finance drilling and gain footholds in North American shale.
 During his five years at the Irish carrier Mueller expanded transatlantic services and fended off takeover bids from Ryanair, Europe’s biggest low-cost airline.
 Europe’s largest engineering company hasn’t considered walking away from its planned takeover of US.
 A takeover would help Nokia add business in the US, allowing the Finnish company to close the gap with market leader Ericsson AB.
 Chief Executive Officer John Chen said in July that he wouldn’t be able to accept a takeover offer from a Chinese company even if he got one because Western governments that rely on his phones probably wouldn’t allow it.
 For now, Chen said he has no takeover offers on his desk for the $58 billion company.
 Wholesale banks have gone out of fashion since 2008, in part because of takeovers and failures, in part because of banks changing their business models, according to the study.
 That will have some producers looking for investors, or outright takeovers, he said.
 “Here is an opportunity to acquire the company at the bottom of the market when they may be in a position to be forced to sell” ‘Lean In’ Without a takeover, Talisman would have to boost its target to sell $2 billion in assets by mid-2015 to as much as $4-billion, Cox said.
 (BKW)’splanned adoption of a Canadian tax address through a takeover ofTim Hortons Inc.
 The bonuses reflect the increased duties involved in navigating the company through the Burger King takeover, the company said.
 Fitch Ratings has also said that Wall Street’s increasing appetite for insurance risks could encourage takeovers.
 Seadrill and other oil-service companies have been hit by a drop in oil prices since June that has weakened demand, leading to dividend cuts, writedowns and takeovers.
 24, three days after Britain’s second-largest insurer by market value confirmed it was in takeover talks, regulatory filings show.
 insurance industry’s biggest takeover in 15 years.
 During his five years at the Irish carrier Mueller expanded trans-Atlantic services and fended off takeover bids from Ryanair Holdings Plc, Europe’s biggest low-cost airline.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- An 18-month takeover tussle for French resort company Club Mediterranee SA took a new turn as funds associated with Italian investor Andrea Bonomi sweetened their bid just three days after the latest rival proposal.
 Fosun, which envisages that Chinese tourists would make up one-third of Club Med’s clientele should its takeover plan prevail, came back with 2350 euros, before the latest 50 cent upgrade from Bonomi today.
 A successful takeover would give Iron Mountain, now the largest document-storage company, more than 70 percent of the outsourced market in the US.
 shares jumped as much as 65 percent after the New York Post reported that the money-losing clothing chain has received a takeover offer.
 The takeover plan has been accompanied the departure of many of Walgreen’s top executives, with the company’s senior ranks being filled by managers from Bern, Switzerland-based Alliance Boots.
 To win approval under the nation’s foreign takeover law, Burger King has agreed to “work with Tim Hortons franchisees” to maintain employment levels across Canada, and accelerate expansion of new restaurants outside Canada at a “significantly greater pace than currently planned,” Industry Minister James Moore said in a statement.
 Canada reviews all foreign takeovers of businesses valued at more than C$354 million to determine if the deal represents a “net benefit” to the country.
 Telefonica could also use the money to help fund takeovers in the faster growing Brazilian market.
 grocer’s largest shareholder since making an unsuccessful takeover bid in 2007, and still owns almost 26 percent of Sainsbury’s shares.
 Usiminas’s press office declined to comment on the outperformance of voting shares and takeover speculation in an e-mail, as did press offices for Nippon and Ternium.
 The Hudson Pacific transaction marks the private-equity firm’s biggest sale of office buildings since just after the $39 billion Equity Office takeover, when it flipped many of the properties to reduce debt.
 “I expect the second leg of the story to be one where there is a focus on growth and delivering rising dividends” No Acquisitions Bulking up through acquisitions isn’t part of the plan, according to Hamers, even when restrictions on takeovers tied to its bailout expire.
 Tim Participacoes SA slid as a person familiar with the matter said three phone companies plan to make a takeover offer that’s below the valuation set by the controlling shareholder.
(Bloomberg) -- Drug and media takeovers dominated 2014.
 Here are some other possibilities in energy and other areas: BIG OIL -- Smaller oil and gas explorers with weak balance sheets are the most vulnerable to a takeover approach amid the slump in crude prices.
 Takeover Attempts? Clarity over customer tariffs with today’s ruling makes Britain’s water companies more vulnerable now to takeover attempts, Michael McVeigh, director of corporate finance at Ernst & Young Global Ltd, said on Dec.
 “There will be many factors for acquirers to consider, some of whom may be new to the industry” Severn Trent in June 2013 rejected a 53 billion-pound takeover proposal as too low that was led by Borealis Infrastructure Management Inc.
 Those measures, which include making it harder for companies to access foreign cash balances to finance acquisitions, helped torpedo AbbVie Inc’s proposed $55 billion takeover of Dublin-based drugmaker Shire Plc.
 Delaware Chancery Judge John Noble concluded that the merger amounted to a takeover by Nabors, and C&J’s directors mistakenly treated it as an acquisition of the rival company’s fracking-services unit.
 is planning a takeover bid for the UK.
 Blackstone acquired the properties as part of its $32 billion takeover of Wyndham International Inc.
 With the pension question nearing resolution, IAG said last week it had approached Aer Lingus about a possible takeover.
 A takeover of EE would give BT access to 28 million wireless customers and create the country’s largest provider of bundles of mobile, home-phone, TV and Internet service.
 The company, which acquired the former British Midland to gain slots, would need to broker a deal with 30 percent shareholder Ryanair Holdings Plc, whose takeover bids for its Irish rival have been blocked.
 The Irish discount carrier has seen a full takeover of Aer Lingus blocked by European Union regulators and may be a more willing seller in the wake of a UK.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- As Vodafone Group Plc and BT Group Plc consider billions of pounds of takeovers to be able to offer TV, Web, home phone and mobile under one monthly bill, they risk ignoring one detail: UK.
(Bloomberg) -- Repsol SA’s takeover of Talisman Energy Inc.
 Other notable purchases included Whiting Petroleum Corp’s takeover of Kodiak Oil & Gas Corp.
 16 presentation on the acquisition, the company said the takeover was “the right deal at the right time” and there was a disconnect between financial markets and the value of assets.
 is planning a takeover bid for the UK.
 and Google misfired with high-profile takeovers of handset makers, another option is to target one of the dozens of smaller, closely held manufacturers in China, according to research firm Canalys.
 That ranks among the 10 most expensive drug-company takeovers this decade, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 takeover rules.
 shareholders from voting on Dollar Tree Inc’s $85 billion takeover bid until the discount retailer’s executives seriously weigh Dollar General Corp’s offer in the takeover tussle over the seller of cut-rate diapers and toys.
 is planning a takeover bid for the UK.
 The discussions have yet to lead to any sort of takeover proposal and it remains unclear whether the Paris-based company will still pursue a sale of the brand, the people said.
(Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc is considering Spanish drugmaker Almirall SA as one of several possible takeover targets, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Stock Price In Goldman Sachs’s two biggest deals, Lemkau and Sykes led a team that advised DirecTV on AT&T Inc’s $66 billion takeover, including debt, and partner Jim Katzman spearheaded the bank’s work with Botox-maker Allergan Inc.
 -- and 2014’s biggest technology transaction, Facebook Inc’s $19 billion takeover of WhatsApp Inc.
 Goldman Sachs also whiffed on Suntory Holdings Ltd’s $16 billion takeover of Beam Inc, January’s largest acquisition.
 It bounced back with credits on DirecTV, Allergan, Medtronic Inc’s $46 billion deal for Covidien Plc, Halliburton Co’s $375 billion takeover of Baker Hughes Inc, and Holcim Ltd.
 Kroton this year became the world’s largest for-profit education company with the takeover of Anhanguera, its biggest rival.
 and DSV A/S, the Nordic region’s biggest trucking company, ended takeover talks after news of a potential acquisition of the US.
 Jeffries, 70, was long seen as an obstacle to a takeover.
 The pace is set to pick up, as Vodafone’s exploration of a deal with Liberty Global Plc and BT’s plan for a mobile takeover are prompting every big UK.
 Yesterday, cable company Altice SA took a step toward a $92 billion takeover in Portugal.
 and Actavis Plc announced a combined $100 billion in takeovers on the same day.
 DANONE-MEAD JOHNSON -- Speculation about this deal cooled when Danone said it planned to keep its medical-nutrition division, as proceeds from selling that unit could have helped fund a takeover of Mead Johnson Nutrition Co.
 Noble concluded that the merger amounted to a takeover by Nabors and C&J’s directors mistakenly treated it as an acquisition.
 Malcolm Glazer, who led a takeover of United in 2005, died in May.
 companies in four years, including the takeovers of Baldor Electric, to add electric motors, and Thomas & Betts, for low-voltage gear.
 is planning a takeover offer for the UK.
 takeover rules that required the company to make an offer in 28 days or wait six months.
 The nation’s economy likely shrank by an estimated 75 percent this year amid a separatist conflict and Russia’s takeover of Crimea.
 Nutreco attracted takeover interest after the failed disposal in June of its compound-feed and meat business in Spain and Portugal.
 was the top investment banking adviser on Canadian mergers and acquisitions in 2014, as oil and gas and cross-border deals drove takeovers to a seven-year high.
 About 77 percent of the transactions were cross-border deals, including the year’s two biggest: Burger King Worldwide Inc’s $132 billion takeover, including debt, of Tim Hortons Inc.
 Caisse de depot et placement du Quebec’s participation in the $86 billion takeover, including debt, of PetSmart Inc, led by BC Partners Holdings Ltd’s was the biggest foreign takeover involving a Canadian acquirer this year.
 American Apparel’s board confirmed last week it received a takeover proposal for as much as $140 a share, though it said it remains focused on turning the company around.
 The stock had surged 84 percent during the previous two weeks, fueled by takeover speculation, though it remains down for the year.
 Family Dollar holds another shareholder meeting on the proposed takeover by Dollar Tree.
 The takeover may end almost half a century of public listing for the Paris-based company, which started on the Mediterranean island of Mallorca in 1950 in a village of used military tents and has struggled to generate profits in recent years.
 Fosun, which envisages Chinese tourists would make up one-third of Club Med’s clientele should its takeover plan prevail, would own 626 percent of the vehicle executing the approach, with Cia de Seguros Fidelidade Mundial SA, a Portuguese insurance company Fosun controls, owning 20 percent, based on 50 percent of shareholders tendering their holdings.
 Investors are more doubtful about the deal prospects than any major pending takeover in developed Asia, based on Transfield’s 13 percent discount to the offer at yesterday’s close, Bloomberg-compiled data show.
 Adding to the intrigue: American Apparel board recently received a takeover bid, according to people familiar with the situation.
 More than $100 billion of potential takeovers unexpectedly blew up, like when drugmaker AbbVie Inc.
 and Lorillard Inc, AT&T Inc’s $66 billion purchase of DirecTV, and Comcast Corp’s $68 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc, the biggest transaction of the year.
 Going Global Deals are on the rise in other parts of the world, too, with a 31 percent jump in European takeovers and a 33 percent increase in Asia.
 The chances of picking the final outcome may be too slim, even for traders who specialize in betting on potential takeovers, said Tristan K’Nell, Sydney-based head of trading at Quay Equities.
 Those include Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned adoption of a Canadian tax address through a takeover of Tim Hortons Inc.
 This year, Alierta completed the $11 billion takeover of German wireless rival E-Plus and agreed to acquire Brazilian broadband provider GVT for $9 billion.
 wireless provider O2 from Telefonica SA as its board meets to discuss takeover targets today, according to people familiar with the matter.
 A takeover of either carrier, worth more than $14 billion, would mark BT’s return to the UK.
 Takeovers Climb Canada’s banks earned record revenue from advising on takeovers and arranging stock sales this year as mergers and acquisitions rebounded and equity financings increased.
 Chinese companies spent almost $5 billion in five major chip-related takeovers in the past 18 months, data compiled by Bloomberg show, with most deals getting state funding.
 last month, the biggest takeover of a US.
 The deal, struck before the credit crisis unfolded, was part of a buyout boom fueled by cheap debt that spawned super-sized takeovers.
 last year on the $23 billion takeover of ketchup maker HJ Heinz Co, is the principal investor in Gera Capital Venture, an education-focused investment fund, according to Gera’s LinkedIn page.
 Infratil, which also owns bus services and the main airport in Wellington, and the New Zealand Superannuation Fund will each pay A$215 million for 50 percent stakes in the takeover consortium, the companies said in an e-mailed statement today.
 Those included Merck KGaA’s $17 billion takeover of Sigma-Aldrich Corp.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Two German landlords are poised to crown a year in which property companies outperformed almost every corner of the market with a takeover that’s set to become the industry’s biggest.
 “We’ll get more prominence among generalist investors” The cash-and-shares takeover makes sense now because Deutsche Annington trades at a higher price than Gagfah relative to net assets, making the stock a strong currency in the deal.
 The news also weighed on shares of Mead Johnson Nutrition Co, which has been viewed as a possible takeover target for Danone in the event of a medical-nutrition sale.
 The takeover comes almost three months after Philips Chief Executive Officer Frans van Houten’s announcement that the 123-year-old Dutch company will be split into two, separating the lighting unit as he focuses on health-care equipment and consumer goods.
 Volcano is Philips’ largest acquisition since the $462 billion takeover of Respironics Inc.
 industry’s biggest takeover in 15 years.
 The takeover is the biggest among British insurers since CGU Plc’s 74 billion-pound merger in 2000 with Norwich Union Plc, which created Aviva, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Its largest buyout this year was the $54 billion takeover of industrial-products maker Gates Global Inc.
 The takeover, which is expected to close later this week, will shift Miami-based Burger King Worldwide’s headquarters to Canada in a so-called inversion.
 said the company’s speculated takeover of NPS Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Zoetis adopted a shareholder rights plan to help block a hostile takeover after Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management said on Nov.
 Aer Lingus Group Plc jumped 91 percent after the Financial Times reported that British Airways owner International Consolidated Airlines Group SA is considering a takeover bid.
 shareholders to vote on Dollar Tree Inc’s $85 billion takeover bid.
 MGM, which owns rights to “The Hobbit” film series, filed for bankruptcy in 2010 after spurning a takeover bid from Lions Gate and activist investor Carl Icahn.
 Oh, in addition to working on the Athlon and EP Energy deals, led Apollo’s $483 million takeover of Parallel Petroleum Corp.
 fell the most in five years as a joint venture accord with Alfa SAB, its biggest shareholder, may delay the chances of a takeover, according to Credit Suisse Group AG.
 “The agreement to form a JV makes us believe that the possibility of a takeover has been, at least, delayed,” analysts Vanessa Quiroga and Maria Madrazo said in a research report today.
 Its stake in Pacific Rubiales is just below the 20 percent threshold that would require a company to start a takeover bid in most cases under Canadian securities law.
 Matjila this year helped scupper a takeover bid for South African drugmaker Adcock Ingram Holdings Ltd.
 regulator that sets what utilities can charge until 2020 should spur takeovers in the water industry, said Michael McVeigh, director of corporate finance at Ernst & Young Global Ltd.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc’s $11 billion takeover of Kabel Deutschland Holding AG undervalued the German cable provider, an independent review proposed by activist shareholder Elliott Management Corp.
 “Unless Cargill discloses its intended offer price and more details on their takeover proposition, their offer could go hostile very quickly” Nutreco, which makes Trouw livestock-nutrition products, is attracting takeover interest after the failed disposal in June of its compound-feed and meat business in Spain and Portugal.
 Ornskov would prefer that Shire remain independent, though further takeover approaches are possible, the CEO said in an Oct.
 The Hudson Pacific transaction marks the New York-based firm’s biggest sale of office buildings since just after the $39 billion Equity Office takeover, when it flipped many of the properties to reduce debt.
 The Ferry Building was acquired in the Equity Office takeover, while 100 Montgomery was a later purchase.
 “And a deal – which helps address Afren’s corporate issues – should be well received in Nigeria” Afren, Ophir Energy Plc and Tullow Oil Plc were among potential takeover targets as oil prices slumped, BMO Capital Markets analysts said last month.
 A potential complication to the takeover is a deal sought by Isabel dos Santos, the daughter of Angola’s president and Africa’s richest woman.
 With takeovers in France and Portugal, Altice has added more than 13 billion euros in revenue this year to the 32 billion euros it reported for 2013.
 The company reserves the right to set aside the statement in the next year in accordance with Irish takeover rules, it said.
 The largest housing transaction in 2014 was Deutsche Wohnen AG’s takeover of GSW Immobilien AG, valued at about 17 billion euros.
 Even as it missed out on the year’s largest takeovers in the US.
 “If you don’t have the personality to get to the big deals, or don’t have the relationships, then you have to do the small deals” The bank’s largest technology deal this year was Vista Equity Partners LLC’s $41 billion takeover of Tibco Software Inc, where Goldman was the sole adviser for the seller.
 Outside of takeovers, Goldman Sachs advised both Hewlett-Packard Co.
 takeover offer and postpone a Dec.
 Apollo and TPG’s takeover of Caesars, arranged just as the credit crisis unfolded, was part of a buyout boom fueled by cheap debt that spawned super-sized takeovers.
 Cowdery, who personally owns a 39 million-pound stake in Friends Life, said he “absolutely” plans to hold Aviva shares after the company yesterday agreed to buy Friends in a 56 billion-pound all-stock takeover.
 Consummating those multibillion-dollar transactions would push the industry’s takeover volume well above the record $136 billion set almost a decade ago.
 Operators are looking to bundle TV, Internet and wireline services with mobile access, and they’re using takeovers to do so.
 “We intend to position the Swisscanto product brand even more strongly in the future and work even more closely with the cantonal banks” The takeover creates an asset manager with about 105 billion francs in client assets.
 The dismissal ends more than two years of contentious litigation over Apollo’s $35-per-share offer for Cooper, in what was billed as the biggest takeover of an auto-parts maker since 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
